Correlation of early metastatic response by 123I-metaiodobenzylguanidine scintigraphy with overall response and event-free survival in stage IV neuroblastoma.Metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG), specifically taken up in cells of sympathetic origin, provides a highly sensitive and specific indicator for the detection of metastases in neuroblastoma. The aim of this study was to correlate early response to therapy by MIBG scan, using a semiquantitative scoring method, with the end induction response and event-free survival (EFS) rate in stage IV neuroblastoma.Seventy-five children older than 1 year and with stage IV neuroblastoma had 123I-MIBG scans at diagnosis, after two and four cycles of induction therapy, and before autologous stem-cell transplantation. The scans were read by two independent observers (concordance > 95%) using a semiquantitative method. Absolute and relative (score divided by initial score) MIBG scores were then correlated with overall pretransplantation response, bone marrow response, and EFS.The pretransplantation response rate was 81%, and the 3-year EFS rate was 32%, similar to a concomitant group of 375 stage IV patients. The median relative MIBG scores after two, four, and six cycles were 0.5, 0.24, and 0.12, respectively. The probability of having a complete response or very good partial response before transplantation was significantly higher if the relative score after two cycles was < or = 0.5, or, if after four cycles, the relative score was < or = 0.24. Patients with a relative score of < or = 0.5 after two cycles or a score of < or = 0.24 after four cycles had an improved EFS rate (P =.053 and.045, respectively).Semiquantitative MIBG score early in therapy provides valuable prognostic information for overall response and EFS, which may be useful in tailoring treatment.Report on the Fifth International Symposium on Radiohalogens (Whistler, BC, Canada, September 11-15th, 2004).[Intracellular uptake and accumulation of metaiodobenzylguanidine in neuroblastoma cells and small cell carcinoma of the lung].Recently m-131-iodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) has been successfully used to image neurocrest-derived tumours such as neuroblastoma. In fact, our autoradiographic evidences demonstrate that MIBG is able to bind, accumulate and be released by neuroblastoma cell line CHP 100 "in vitro", as well as by surgical biopsies from tumours bearing children. Moreover, all the cell lines tested "in vitro" were able to bind MIBG: neuroblastoma (WNT, CHP-100, IMR-32), small cell lung carcinoma (LC-8) and melanoma (WMB). A fibrosarcoma line, despite that it is not neurocrest related, was also able to bind MIBG. However only WNT, CHP-100 and the LC-8 lines were able to accumulate and then release large amounts of MIBG in cytoplasmatic vesicles. The heterogeneity of MIBG uptake "in vitro" seems related to the similar variability observed in the clinical scintigraphies. This phenomenon may be related to the biochemical maturity of individual neuroblastoma tumours.Quantification of glucose utilization in liver metastases: parametric imaging of FDG uptake with PET.Positron emission tomography (PET) fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) studies are useful for identifying foci of increased FDG uptake in liver metastases, because of the high glycolytic rate of malignancies, as well as for monitoring changes in tumor glucose metabolism during treatment. We performed 15 kinetic PET FDG studies in four patients with metastatic liver disease. We produced parametric images of glucose metabolism in terms of the rate constant K (ml/min/g) for net phosphorylation of FDG. Tumor K values, estimated with nonlinear regression, correlated well with K values estimated with Patlak graphical analysis (r = 0.96), validating the assumption of low k4* values in liver metastases and supporting the use of pixel by pixel Patlak plot analysis of the data to generate parametric images. In normal liver, high levels of glucose-6-phosphatase produce much higher values of k4* than in liver metastases. Uncorrected Patlak graphical analysis underestimates K in normal liver, but this further increases the contrast between tumor and liver and facilitates both tumor detection and quantification. The technique is computationally feasible and is well suited for serial evaluations of tumor metabolism during treatment.Radiolabeled meta-iodobenzylguanidine: pharmacology and clinical studies.Much was known of the pharmacology of meta-iodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) before its clinical use, but we have since learned a good deal more about the metabolic distribution and fate of this radiopharmaceutical. And, as is the nature of science, more is yet to be discovered. This communication reviews what is known about the pharmacology of radiolabeled MIBG and how this pharmacology affects the clinical studies that use the agent.123I-MIBG scintigraphy and 18F-FDG PET in neuroblastoma.[A new imaging procedure for detecting endocrine tumors].Detection of unknown primary tumours and distant metastases in patients with cervical metastases: value of FDG-PET versus conventional modalities.In 1%-2% of head and neck oncology patients, the only symptom of a malignancy is a positive cervical node. The aim of this study was to compare the value of positron emission tomography using fluorine-18 fluoro-2-deoxy- D-glucose (FDG-PET) and conventional diagnostic modalities (CT and/or MRI, panendoscopy) in detecting unknown primary tumours and distant metastases in patients suffering from such a cervical metastasis. Fifty patients (37 men and 13 women) with cervical metastases of an unknown primary tumour were included. All patients underwent FDG-PET. In addition, CT and/or MRI was obtained and panendoscopy was performed. All clinically known metastases were detected by FDG-PET. The primary tumour could be diagnosed in 16 patients (four primary tumours were detected exclusively by FDG-PET). Seven patients had multiple distant metastases, that in six cases were detected exclusively by FDG-PET. The sensitivity and specificity of FDG-PET for detection of unknown primary tumours were 100% and 94%, respectively. For the conventional diagnostic modalities these values were 92% and 76%. FDG-PET had an exclusive effect on the applied therapy in 20% of the patients referred for diagnosis of an unknown primary tumour. The data obtained in this study strongly support the diagnostic strategy of performing FDG-PET in patients suffering from cervical metastases of an unknown primary tumour before any other diagnostic technique.Comparison of 18F-dopa PET/CT and 123I-MIBG scintigraphy in stage 3 and 4 neuroblastoma: a pilot study.(18)F-Dopa positron emission tomography (PET)/CT has proved a valuable tool for the assessment of neuroendocrine tumours. So far no data are available on (18)F-dopa utilization in neuroblastoma (NB). Our aim was to evaluate the role of (18)F-dopa PET/CT in NB and compare its diagnostic value with that of (123)I-metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) scintigraphy in patients affected by stage 3-4 NB.We prospectively evaluated 28 paired (123)I-MIBG and (18)F-dopa PET/CT scans in 19 patients: 4 at the time of the NB diagnosis and 15 when NB relapse was suspected. For both imaging modalities we performed a scan-based and a lesion-based analysis and calculated sensitivity, specificity and accuracy. The standard of reference was based on clinical, imaging and histological data.NB localizations were confirmed in 17 of 19 patients. (18)F-Dopa PET/CT and (123)I-MIBG scintigraphy properly detected disease in 16 (94%) and 11 (65%), respectively. On scan-based analysis, (18)F-dopa PET/CT showed a sensitivity and accuracy of 95 and 96%, respectively, while (123)I-MIBG scanning showed a sensitivity and accuracy of 68 and 64%, respectively (p < 0.05). No significant difference in terms of specificity was found. In 9 of 28 paired scans (32%) PET/CT results influenced the patient management. We identified 156 NB localizations, 141 of which were correctly detected by (18)F-dopa PET/CT and 88 by MIBG. On lesion-based analysis, (18)F-dopa PET/CT showed a sensitivity and accuracy of 90% whereas (123)I-MIBG scintigraphy showed a sensitivity and accuracy of 56 and 57%, respectively (p < 0.001). No significant difference in terms of specificity was found.In our NB population (18)F-dopa PET/CT displayed higher overall accuracy than (123)I-MIBG scintigraphy. Consequently, we suggest (18)F-dopa PET/CT as a new opportunity for NB assessment.123I-Metaiodobenzylguanidine uptake in the nape of the neck of children: likely visualization of brown adipose tissue.The distribution of radioiodinated metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) has been studied primarily in patients with neuroendocrine tumors-in pediatrics, particularly with neuroblastomas. Sometimes, symmetric accumulation in which no tumor is identified is seen in the nape-of-the-neck region. We estimated visually whether accumulation was found in the nape of the neck and studied the characteristics of the accumulation.Retrospectively, we investigated 266 (123)I-MIBG scintigraphic studies performed on pediatric patients who had been treated for neuroendocrine tumors or who were suspected of having such tumors.Accumulation in the nape of the neck was seen in 32 of 266 studies (12%); in none of these cases was the accumulation identified as a tumor by other imaging modalities or follow-up studies. In the same individuals, the accumulation varied and it was observed more often during winter.Symmetric (123)I-MIBG accumulations in the nape-of-the-neck region observed in children are thought to be related to the uptake in brown adipose tissue.Iodine-123-MIBG imaging of neuroblastoma: utility of SPECT and delayed imaging.Possible incremental diagnostic benefits of SPECT and delayed planar imaging with [123I]MIBG in neuroblastoma have not yet been fully established.Whole-body delayed planar [123I]MIBG imaging at 48 hr and SPECT imaging of the chest-abdomen or other suspected sites obtained at 24 hr were compared with routine planar imaging at 24 hr in 83 studies of 29 children with neuroblastoma. The sensitivity for each of the [123I]MIBG imaging methods was calculated on a study-by-study and on a lesion-by-lesion basis.Fifty-one planar imaging studies were performed in 20 patients with evidence of disease which was detected in 48 studies by 24-hr imaging (94.1% sensitivity) and in 44 studies by 48-hr imaging (86.3% sensitivity). On a lesion-by-lesion basis, sensitivity was 88.8% for the 24-hr scan, 86.7% for the 48-hr scan and 92.2% for a combination of the two (p = ns). Forty-three SPECT studies were performed in 20 patients with evidence of disease in the field of view of the SPECT camera. Disease was detected in 40 SPECT studies (93% sensitivity), in 38 planar scans at 24 hr (84.4% sensitivity) and in 37 planar scans at 48 hr (86.0% sensitivity). On a lesion-by-lesion basis, sensitivity was 83.6% for the 24-hr planar scan, 86.1% for the 48-hr planar scan, 88.2% for a combination of the two planar scans and 97.9% for SPECT (p < 0.001 compared with planar). The anatomic locations of tumors were clearer on SPECT in 15 studies.Delayed 48-hr planar scanning may occasionally depict more lesions than 24-hr imaging, but it may also miss lesions with rapid washout. SPECT imaging significantly increases the number of lesions detected and better defines anatomic location of tumors.Does a "false-negative" MIBG scan predict a better outcome in neuroblastoma patients?Nuclear medicine maintain its dynamic growth.Intertumoural variability in functional imaging within patients suffering from neuroendocrine tumours. An observational, cross-sectional study.(123)I mIBG (meta-iodobenzylguanidine) and (111)In pentetreotide scintigraphy imaging modalities are useful in demonstrating neuroendocrine tumours. Although (111)In pentetreotide is generally held to be a more superior imaging agent than (123)I mIBG for neuroendocrine tumours, we noted a differential uptake of the two agents by different tumour sites within individual patients. In some cases, the two tracers appeared to demonstrate different lesions within the same patient. The aim of this study wasto determine the positivity of the two imaging modalities, the degree of correlation between them and to highlight any clinically useful differences between the two modalities. (123)I mIBG and (111)In pentetreotide images of 149 consecutive, biopsy-proven or biochemically confirmed, neuroendocrine tumour patients were compared. All the patients underwent whole-body imaging and upper abdominal single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT). The results of both types of imaging were compared, lesion by lesion, for each individual patient. The overall positivity rate for (111)In pentetreotide was 79%, and that for (123)I mIBG was 63%. When both agents were positive, the (111)In pentetreotide highlighted more lesions within the same patient in 33%, whilst the (123)I mIBG highlighted more lesions in 13%. In 12% of patients both agents were positive, but different lesions were seen with the two agents. (111)In pentetreotide has greater positivity than (123)I mIBG for imaging neuroendocrine tumours. However, the two modalities can highlight different tumour lesions, suggesting the presence of phenotypically diverse tumour populations within individual patients. These findings are likely to influence clinical management in the future.FDG-PET screening for cerebral metastases in patients with suspected malignancy.2-(18)F-Fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose (FDG) positron emission tomography (PET) is increasingly being used in the evaluation of patients with malignancy. Recently, imaging protocols have incorporated ¿whole-body' views acquired over multiple steps. However, with this strategy, brain metastases can potentially go undetected. The aim of this study was to determine whether a supplementary 10-min brain 18F-FDG scan provides additional clinically useful information. Accordingly, we reviewed the studies of 273 patients with various malignancies in whom both whole-body and brain images were performed. Whole-body and regional attenuation-corrected 18F-FDG images were obtained approximately 60 min post-injection. A separate 10-min scan of the brain was subsequently performed. All studies were performed using a standard PET scanner with the images being interpreted by consensus of at least two experienced observers. Altogether, 119 studies were reported as normal (n = 96) or showing anatomic or normal variants (n = 23). Abnormalities involving extracranial organs were identified in 149 (55%) patients. Cerebral metastases were reported in 4 (1.5%) patients, only two of which (0.7%) were unsuspected prior to the PET scan. Incidental pathology (encephalopathy, infarct) was reported but unconfirmed in two further patients (0.7%). We conclude that routine ¿screening' for cerebral metastases in patients with suspected malignancy has a low yield and may not be clinically useful.Molecular imaging with positron emission tomography in paediatric oncology--FDG and beyond.PET/CT in paediatric oncology: indications and pitfalls.Extending positron emission tomography scan utility to high-risk neuroblastoma: fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography as sole imaging modality in follow-up of patients.Although positron emission tomography (PET) with fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose ((18)F-FDG) has a major impact on the treatment of adult cancer, the reported experience with extracranial tumors of childhood is limited. We describe a role for PET in patients with neuroblastoma (NB).In 51 patients with high-risk NB, 92 PET scans were part of a staging evaluation that included iodine-123 or iodine-131 metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) scan, bone scan, computed tomography (and/or magnetic resonance imaging), urine catecholamine measurements, and bone marrow (BM) examinations. The minimum number of tests sufficient to detect NB was determined.Of 40 patients who were not in complete remission, only 1 (2.5%) had NB that would have been missed had a staging evaluation been limited to PET and BM studies, and 13 (32.5%) had NB detected by PET but not by BM and urine tests. PET was equal or superior to MIBG scans for identifying NB in soft tissue and extracranial skeletal structures, for revealing small lesions, and for delineating the extent and localizing sites of disease. In 36 evaluations of 22 patients with NB in soft tissue, PET failed to identify only two long-standing MIBG-negative abdominal masses. PET and MIBG scans showed more skeletal lesions than bone scans, but the normally high physiologic brain uptake of FDG blocked PET visualization of cranial vault lesions. Similar to MIBG, FDG skeletal uptake was diffusely increased with extensive or progressing BM disease but faint or absent with minimal or nonprogressing BM disease.In the absence or after resolution of cranial vault lesions, and once the primary tumor is resected, PET and BM tests suffice for monitoring NB patients at high risk for progressive disease in soft tissue and bone/BM.Locating neuroblastoma in the opsoclonus-myoclonus syndrome.We examined the role of various medical imaging modalities, particularly metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) scintigraphy in the investigation of patients presenting with the opsoclonus-myoclonus syndrome (OMS) who may harbor neuroblastomas. A retrospective analysis was therefore performed of all patients presenting with OMS in a 5 1/2 year period. Between December, 1988 and May, 1994, all 13 patients (mean age 15.2 months, range 3 days-30 months) presenting with OMS were extensively studied. A wide range of medical imaging modalities including CT, MRI and [131I] or [123I]-metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) scintigraphy (total of 21 scans) were examined as a means of detecting a structural brain lesion or locating a neuroblastoma, a tumor generally found in less than half of patients with OMS. As anticipated a minority of patients (4) were eventually found to harbor neuroblastomas. In these four cases, two tumors were revealed on preoperative MIBG scintigraphy, one gave a false negative study and one tumor was not studied preoperatively. Each patient was also subjected to extensive radiological investigations in addition to MIBG scintigraphy, many of which were repetitive, redundant or had low clinical yield. The relative merits of the various procedures are compared, and an algorithm incorporating MIBG scintigraphy and limited central nervous system and abdominal anatomical modalities for the investigation of opsoclonus-myoclonus is suggested.False-positive MIBG scans with normal computed tomography imaging in patients with high-risk neuroblastoma.SPECT/CT in tumor imaging: technical aspects and clinical applications.Diagnostic imaging has gained a major role in the management of patients with cancer and has made a further step forward with the introduction of fusion techniques into the field. This technology provides hybrid images of two independent modalities, a functional scintigraphic technique and an anatomical procedure, yielding a superior imaging study. Scintigraphy is based on the use of single photon or positron emitting tracers providing a description of function or processes, whereas computed tomography (CT), ultrasound, or magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) depict the precise localization and type of morphological changes that have occurred in the lesions. Initial attempts to coregister the functional and anatomical information following acquisition of the two imaging modalities on separate machines, in different sessions, failed to disclose the proper alignment with precise coregistration, in particular for non-head studies, and were associated with patient preparation and mathematical modeling that were too cumbersome to be used on a routine basis. The recent introduction of a hybrid imaging device containing a low dose CT system and a gamma camera on a single gantry enabled the sequential acquisition of the two imaging modalities, with subsequent merging of data into a composite image display. These hybrid studies have led to a revolution in the field of imaging, with highly accurate localization of tumor sites, assessment of invasion into surrounding tissues, and characterization of their functional status.First experiences from Copenhagen with paediatric single photon emission computed tomography/computed tomography.This study evaluates the diagnostic value of single photon emission computed tomographic (SPECT)/multislice computed tomographic (MSCT) fusion images compared with planar scintigraphy in children.Fifteen children [eight girls, mean age 13 years (range 2-17 years)] who were examined in the SPECT/16-MSCT scanner at the Department of Clinical Physiology, Nuclear Medicine and PET, Rigshospitalet were included. The studies and clinical indications were eight Tc-hydroxymethane diphosphonate bone scintigraphies (three bone abnormalities, three osteomyelitis, two bone tumours), one bone scintigraphy combined with In-labelled leukocyte study (osteomyelitis), three I-meta-iodobenzylguanidine scintigraphies (neuroblastoma), three In-octreotide scintigraphies (two carcinoid tumours, one Langerhans cell histiocytosis) and one Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy (suspected renal transplant infarction). At the evaluation of the planar scans, the decision to perform a SPECT/16-MSCT scan was taken. A specialist in nuclear medicine read the SPECT scans and the CT scans were, if performed as high resolution or when in doubt, read by the specialist in radiology, followed by a simultaneous reading. We categorized the additional information gained from the SPECT/MSCT scan into three groups: (i) structural information gained from the CT scan, (ii) additional nuclear medicine information gained from the SPECT scan and (iii) information used for biopsy guidance. Use of a CT scan of diagnostic quality was only allowed (n = 1) after referral from the clinicians, and read in collaboration with the specialist in radiology.Fourteen of the 15 planar scans gained additional structural information from SPECT/CT. Twelve of 15 planar scans gained additional nuclear medicine information. Six studies gained specific information for biopsy guidance.SPECT/CT provided additional information in all cases. SPECT/CT in children seems to be a most valuable tool and it increases the certainty of the diagnostic work-up.[Diagnosis and therapy of neuroectodermal tumors].Computed tomography (CT) and 123I- or 131I-meta-iodo-benzyl-guanidine (MIBG) scintigraphy were compared for accuracy in tumor detection in 47 patients with neuroectodermal neoplasms. MIBG concentration was found in 12 of 13 pheochromocytomas, 12 of 12 neuroblastomas, 5 of 9 carcinoids, and 1 of 4 glomus tumors. MIBG uptake was not observed in medullary thyroid carcinomas, oat-cell carcinomas, Merkel tumors, 1 gastrinoma, and 2 unclassified neuroectodermal neoplasms. With regard to the different tumor manifestations, the sensitivity in detecting pheochromocytomas, neuroblastomas, and carcinoids was 87%, 77%, and 100% for CT, and 83%, 100% and 71% for MIBG scintigraphy, MIBG scintiscan was superior in the detection of small adrenal pheochromocytomas (less than 1 cm diameter) and in the depiction of small bone metastases and bone marrow infiltration from neuroblastoma. In all, 25 cycles of high-dose MIBG therapy were performed in eight patients with surgically incurable tumors (4 malignant pheochromocytomas, 1 neuroblastoma, 3 carcinoids). The total therapeutic activity applied was 3.55-43.29 GBq 131I-MIBG. Tumor kinetics of MIBG were investigated before and during treatment. One patient with metastatic pheochromocytoma has been in complete remission for a follow-up period of 36 months since completion of treatment, and another patient is in partial remission. Tumor reduction or no change was observed in four patients. Two patients died of non-concentrating recurrence and metastases.[Role of 123-I-metaiodobenzylguanidine imaging as a component in the diagnosis and treatment of neuroblastoma].Tomoscintigraphy with 123I-metaiodobenzylguanidine reveals function of tumor tissue. It may be used for both primary diagnosis of neuroblastoma, monitoring treatment efficiency and prognosis. Before single photon emission tomography using 123I-metaiodobenzylguanidine is undertaken, MRI by means of computed tomography should be carried out in abdominal area to ensure perfect blending of multimodal images.Evaluation of pulmonary lesions with FDG-PET. Comparison of findings in patients with and without a history of prior malignancy.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the accuracy of positron emission tomography (PET) using F-18 fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) in differentiating benign from malignant pulmonary lesions both in patients with and without a history of prior malignancy.Forty-eight consecutive patients with pulmonary lesions suspicious for malignancy underwent FDG-PET scanning. Group 1 included 27 patients without and group 2 included 21 patients with a history of malignancy. Pathologic proof of diagnosis was obtained for 32 patients and 16 patients were followed up clinically and radiographically for at least 6 month. The standard uptake ratio (SUR) and the lesion to background (L/B) ratio were determined in 45 patients.Vanderbilt University Medical Center.In group 1, the average SUR and L/B ratio for malignant lesions (n=14) were 8.9 +/- 4.9 and 20.6 +/- 14.2, respectively. For benign lesions (n=12), the average SUR was 3.3 +/- 3.2 and L/B ratio was 5.2 +/- 5.5. In group 2, the average SUR and L/B ratio for malignant lesions were not significantly different from group 1. Using either a SUR greater than 2.5 or L/B ratio greater than 5 as an cutoff level to differentiate benign and malignant lesions, the sensitivity and negative predictive value in both groups were 100%. There were five false-positive studies in group 1 and one in group 2, including tuberculosis (n=2), a granulomatous lesion (n=1), an inflammatory lesion (n=1), a schwannoma (n=1), and a fibrous mesothelioma (n=1). The overall accuracy was 88%, 81% in group 1, and 95% in group 2.FDG-PET can identify malignant pulmonary lesions both in patients without and with a history of prior malignancy with a high sensitivity and negative predictive value for lesions greater than 1 cm (100% in this study). High FDG uptake by some inflammatory processes and benign tumors may cause false-positive results. Semiquantitative evaluation using SUR or L/B ratio provides similar accuracy.Sensitivity of surveillance studies for detecting asymptomatic and unsuspected relapse of high-risk neuroblastoma.Relapse-free survival (RFS) is a powerful measure of treatment efficacy. We describe the sensitivity of standard surveillance studies for detecting relapse of neuroblastoma (NB).The patients were in complete/very good partial remission of high-risk NB; routine monitoring revealed asymptomatic and, therefore, unsuspected relapses in 113 patients, whereas 41 patients had symptoms prompting urgent evaluations. Assessments every 2 to 4 months included computed tomography, iodine-131-metaiodobenzylguanidine (131)I-MIBG; through November 1999) or iodine-123-metaiodobenzylguanidine ((123)I-MIBG) scan, urine catecholamines, and bone marrow (BM) histology. Bone scan was routine through 2002.(123)I-MIBG scan was the most reliable study for revealing unsuspected relapse; it had an 82% detection rate, which was superior to the rates with (131)I-MIBG scan (64%; P = .1), bone scan (36%; P < .001), and BM histology (34%; P < .001). Among asymptomatic patients, (123)I-MIBG scan was the sole positive study indicating relapse in 25 (27%) of 91 patients compared with one (4.5%) of 22 patients for (131)I-MIBG scan (P = .04) and 0% to 6% of patients for each of the other studies (P < .001). Patients whose monitoring included (123)I-MIBG scan were significantly less likely than patients monitored by (131)I-MIBG scan to have an extensive osteomedullary relapse and had a significantly longer survival from relapse (P < .001) and from diagnosis (P = .002). They also had significantly longer survival than patients with symptomatic relapses (P = .002).(123)I-MIBG scan is essential for valid estimation of the duration of RFS of patients with high-risk NB. Without monitoring that includes (123)I-MIBG scan, caution should be used when comparing RFS between institutions and protocols.Added value of SPECT/CT for correlation of MIBG scintigraphy and diagnostic CT in neuroblastoma and pheochromocytoma.In pheochromocytoma and neuroblastoma, pathologic findings on metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) scintigraphy (planar and SPECT) and on diagnostic CT are sometimes difficult to correlate. Furthermore, CT reading may be impaired by anatomic distortion after surgery or irradiation and if contrast agent is not injected. The present study evaluates the impact of SPECT/CT fusion images on correlation and image analysis of both techniques.Eleven patients, three adults (age range, 27-64 years) with pheochromocytoma and eight children (age range, 16-72 months) with neuroblastoma, underwent 15 (123)I-MIBG scintigraphy (whole body and SPECT/CT) and diagnostic CT during follow-up after treatment, with a time interval of 2 to 30 days (mean, 12 days) between MIBG scintigraphy and diagnostic CT. The diagnostic CT scans were read twice: blindly and with knowledge of the SPECT/CT findings. The scintigraphic and anatomic data were subsequently compared and were verified by clinical outcome.Of 15 imaging studies, there were nine cases of discordance between SPECT/CT and diagnostic CT, whereas concordant findings of planar MIBG and diagnostic CT were observed in six studies. Overall, SPECT/CT provided additional information in eight of the 15 cases (53%) and in eight of nine discordant studies (89%). In one case of pheochromocytoma in which anatomy was distorted by previous surgery and contrast agent was not injected, SPECT/CT findings guided the diagnostic CT that had initially misinterpreted the right adrenal gland as the inferior vena cava. In three of 11 studies performed for neuroblastoma, SPECT/CT facilitated the diagnostic CT reading: in one study, a small paravertebral thickening was overlooked at blind CT reading and in another case, SPECT/CT localized and characterized a soft-tissue mass medial to the iliac bone, which was missed on diagnostic CT in an area of difficult differential anatomy (bowel loops and eventual involved lymph nodes). In the third case, SPECT/CT directed the diagnostic CT to the MIBG abnormality after multiple surgical procedures. In these four cases, MIBG SPECT/CT allowed for localization of the pathologic site that was difficult to visualize on diagnostic CT. In four additional neuroblastoma studies in which a residual mass was present on diagnostic CT, planar MIBG scintigraphy was negative. SPECT/CT, focused on the area of the diagnostic CT abnormality, showed no focal MIBG uptake, thus increasing the diagnostic certainty of remission.In cases of equivocal diagnostic CT, SPECT/CT bridges the gap between MIBG scintigraphy and diagnostic CT, with guidance of the diagnostic CT and characterization of its findings. In this small series, MIBG SPECT/CT increased the diagnostic certainty in 89% of discordant studies.PET in pediatric diseases.FDG-PET is being increasingly applied to pediatric conditions, particularly in oncology. PET and PET/CT scanning in children are not currently supported by Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services unless the disease condition coincides with a reimbursed adult condition. The recent merger of the Children's Cancer Group and the Pediatric Oncology Group to form the Children's Oncology Group creates an opportunity to examine the use of FDG-PET in the management of childhood tumors in multi-institutional, cooperative efforts. The interest in incorporating PET imaging technology in pediatric medicine has been evidenced by several recent review articles summarizing the ongoing progress in this area. Future data will show that FDG-PET provides useful diagnostic information and can play a pivotal role in the clinical management and care of children with disease.Clinical usefulness of iodine-123-MIBG scintigraphy for patients with neuroblastoma detected by a mass screening survey.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the usefulness in a clinical setting of iodine-123-metaiodobenzylguanidine (123I-MIBG) scintigraphy, planar and single photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) images, in patients with neuroblastoma as detected by a mass screening survey.123I-MIBG planar whole body images, and regional SPECT images of patients with neuroblastoma in 51 studies were reviewed. They were all detected by a mass screening survey performed in the 6th month after birth using vanil mandelic acid (VMA), and homovanillic acid (HVA) and the neuroblastoma had been confirmed by surgery. Scintigraphy was performed 24 hours after injection of 111 MBq of 123I-MIBG. We assessed the accuracy of the planar whole body images in order to demonstrate the extent of the lesion and the correlation between the degree and extent of the lesions of 123I-MIBG accumulation and clinical staging with tumor markers, such as urinary VMA, urinary HVA, serum neuron specific enolase (NSE) and serum lactate dehydrogenase (LDH). Additionally, we evaluated SPECT how useful supplemental SPECT might be in a clinical setting as compared with planar whole body images.123I-MIBG planar whole body images revealed all 33 (100%) primary lesions, 4 of the 5 cases (80%) with liver metastasis, 3 of the 13 (23%) with lymph nodes metastasis and 1 of 3 (33%) with bone marrow infiltration. The extent and degree of accumulation correlated with the values of urinary VMA, urinary HVA and serum NSE. SPECT images helped to understand the positional relation in all cases and provided useful additional information for clinical staging in 7 cases.123I-MIBG scintigraphy with planar and SPECT images is useful for evaluating patients with neuroblastoma, following detection by a mass screening survey.Pediatric body applications of FDG PET.18F-PET-CT in extracranial paediatric oncology: when and for whom is it useful?Skeletal involvement in infants with neuroblastoma a quality control attempt.In 1994, French authors hypothesized that positive skeletal mlBG spots in infants with stage 4 neuroblastoma were not prognostically unfavorable unless associated to abnormal standard X-ray or CT findings. In 1999, the European Infant Neuroblastoma Study adopted this definition, indeed reducing the number of patients candidate to chemotherapy. Such an approach requires high quality scans and standardized procedures. The present study critically reviewed and assessed the quality of mlBG scans performed in Italian patients enrolled in the European Infant Neuroblastoma Study.Three independent nuclear medicine specialists reviewed scans of 25 Italian patients enrolled in Trials 99.2, 99.3, and 99.4 of the European Infant Neuroblastoma Study between January 2000 and September 2002. An arbitrary quality score was attributed to each mlBG scintigraphy, ranging from 1 (less than adequate) to 3 (excellent). One radiologist and 2 oncologists reviewed the X-rays and CT scans and correlated the results with clinical assessment.The quality of mlBG scans was rated from good to excellent in 15 of 25 cases, poor in 4, and inadequate for diagnostic evaluation in 6. X-rays confirmed the presence of metastases in 3 of 7 cases with mlBG bone uptake. CT scan confirmed skull metastases in 6 of 9 mlBG-positive cases. Discrepancies in scan interpretation, making trial and stage attribution questionable, were found in 2 patients and are discussed.The quality of mlBG scans proved to be at least acceptable in most Italian pediatric oncology centers. Efforts should be made to further standardize evaluation of the scans. Additional techniques (99mTc scintigraphy, MRI, SPECT) might be useful to help understand the most complex cases.PET/CT in paediatric oncology: clinical usefulness and dosimetric concerns.Dual-time-point FDG-PET/CT for the detection of hepatic metastases.To prove the sensitivity of dual-time-point imaging with 18F-flourodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography (18F-FDG-PET) of the liver to evaluate possible changes in the tumor-to-background ratio considering an improved detection rate of liver lesions.Image acquisition for the first whole-body scan started at a mean time point of 69 min (55-110 min). The mean time interval between the injection of 18F-FDG and the second delayed scan was 100 min (85-166 min).Of 90 proven liver metastases in 34 patients, the first scan detected 53 (59%) liver lesions correctly, whereas in the second, delayed scan 81 (90%) lesions were diagnosed correctly (p<0.001). The mean Standardized uptake values in the first and second delayed scan were 6.59 g/ml versus 8.09 g/ml, respectively (p<0.001). Tumor-to-background ratio of the first and second delayed scan were 2.0 and 2.7, respectively (p=0.04).Dual-time-point-imaging of the liver showed a significant increase of tumor-to-background ratio and hypermetabolic lesion diameter. Although, 30% of all verified liver lesions could only be detected in the second delayed scan 10% of all malignant liver lesions were missed with FDG-PET.Functional imaging in phaeochromocytoma and neuroblastoma with 68Ga-DOTA-Tyr3-octreotide positron emission tomography and 123I-metaiodobenzylguanidine: a clarification.Clinical impact and prognostic value of metaiodobenzylguanidine imaging in children with metastatic neuroblastoma.The clinical value of metaiodobenzylguanidine (mIBG) scintigraphy in patients with disseminated neuroblastoma (NB) at the time of diagnosis and after induction chemotherapy was evaluated.The medical records and imaging studies of 30 patients with stage 4 NB who underwent mIBG scintigraphy and 99mTc hydroxy methylene diphosphonate bone scintigraphy at the time of diagnosis were reviewed. Scores were calculated for the mIBG and bone scintigrams, and outcome according to the initial and follow-up imaging studies was determined.Discrepancies between bone scintigraphy and mIBG osteomedullary localization were seen in six patients. For the entire cohort, 2-year event-free survival did not significantly differ for the group of patients with initial mIBG or bone scintigraphy scores > or = 10 compared to those with scores < 10 (P = 0.23 and 0.61, respectively). However, for patients older than 1 year, a trend associating worse outcome with mIBG scores > or = 10 at diagnosis was seen (P = 0.08). A trend correlating abnormal mIBG scintigraphy after induction therapy and poor outcome was also observed (P = 0.09). Outcome did not correlate with the results of the bone scintigram studies performed after induction chemotherapy (P = 0.68).Because a discordance between mIBG and bone scintigraphy results were seen in a subset of stage 4 NB patients, both imaging studies should be performed at the time of diagnosis. mIBG imaging studies performed at the time of diagnosis and after induction chemotherapy may be of prognostic value, particularly in stage 4 patients older than 1 year.Skeletal assessment in neuroblastoma--the pitfalls of iodine-123-MIBG scans.This study was carried out to compare iodine-123 metaiodobenzylguanidine ([I123I]MIBG) and technetium-99m-methylene diphosphonate bone scans (99mTc-MDP) in the detection of skeletal involvement by neuroblastoma. Forty-four children with neuroblastoma underwent both [123I] MIBG and 99mTc-MDP scans within a 4-wk period; bone marrow examination also was performed; all these investigations were done both at diagnosis and at follow-up. At diagnosis, four children with Stage 4 disease had normal [123I]MIBG scans but abnormal 99mTc-MDP scans, while at follow-up there were four children with negative [123I]MIBG studies who later died from disseminated neuroblastoma. All eight scans are considered false-negative. In 24 children, the [123I]MIBG revealed more extensive disease with 161 positive sites while the 99mTc-MDP scan showed only 100 positive sites; 34 of these sites were common to both studies. This study shows that underassessment of skeletal involvement by neuroblastoma occurred using [123I]MIBG scans and that one cannot therefore substitute [123I]MIBG for 99mTc-MDP bone scans in the staging of neuroblastoma.False-negative metaiodobenzylguanidine scintigraphy at diagnosis of neuroblastoma.[Clinical applications of radio-labelled mIBG].[Follow-up evaluation of metastatic neuroblastoma using high dose [131I-meta]iodobenzylguanidine].Between 1989 and 1990 nine children with neuroblastoma stage IV (according to Evans) have been treated with high-dose [131I-meta]Iodobenzylguanidine (HD-mIBG). The total HD-mIBG dose administered to each child was at mean 699.3 +/- 111 MBq/kg body weight. Prior to (median 28 days) and after (median 50 days) HD-mIBG treatment a diagnostic scan with [123I-meta]Iodobenzylguanidine ([123I-m]IBG) was performed. Scans performed with HD-mIBG were superior to diagnostic scans for the detection of bone lesions in 8/9 children, for the detection of soft tissue lesions in 4/9 children, and for a more precise diagnosis of the primary tumor in 1 child. In 4 children lesions which were primarily identified in the therapeutic scan could be further observed in posttherapeutical examinations.¹²³I-MIBG scintigraphy/SPECT versus ¹⁸F-FDG PET in paediatric neuroblastoma.To analyse different uptake patterns in (123)I-MIBG scintigraphy/SPECT imaging and (18)F-FDG PET in paediatric neuroblastoma patients.We compared 23 (123)I-MIBG scintigraphy scans and 23 (18)F-FDG PET scans (mean interval 10 days) in 19 patients with a suspected neuroblastic tumour (16 neuroblastoma, 1 ganglioneuroblastoma, 1 ganglioneuroma and 1 opsomyoclonus syndrome). SPECT images of the abdomen or other tumour-affected regions were available in all patients. Indications for (18)F-FDG PET were a (123)I-MIBG-negative tumour, a discrepancy in (123)I-MIBG uptake compared to the morphological imaging or imaging results inconsistent with clinical findings. A lesion was found by (123)I-MIBG scintigraphy and/or (18)F-FDG PET and/or morphological imaging.A total of 58 suspicious lesions (mean lesion diameter 3.8 cm) were evaluated and 18 were confirmed by histology and 40 by clinical follow-up. The sensitivities of (123)I-MIBG scintigraphy and (18)F-FDG PET were 50% and 78% and the specificities were 75% and 92%, respectively. False-positive results (three (123)I-MIBG scintigraphy, one (18)F-FDG PET) were due to physiological uptake or posttherapy changes. False-negative results (23 (123)I-MIBG scintigraphy, 10 (18)F-FDG PET) were due to low uptake and small lesion size. Combined (123)I-MIBG scintigraphy/(18)F-FDG PET imaging showed the highest sensitivity of 85%. In 34 lesions the (123)I-MIBG scintigraphy and morphological imaging findings were discrepant. (18)F-FDG PET correctly identified 32 of the discrepant findings. Two bone/bone marrow metastases were missed by (18)F-FDG PET.(123)I-MIBG scintigraphy and (18)F-FDG PET showed noticeable differences in their uptake patterns. (18)F-FDG PET was more sensitive and specific for the detection of neuroblastoma lesions. Our findings suggest that a (18)F-FDG PET scan may be useful in the event of discrepant or inconclusive findings on (123)I-MIBG scintigraphy/SPECT and morphological imaging.18F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography predicts survival of patients with neuroendocrine tumors.(18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) is currently not used on a routine basis for imaging of neuroendocrine (NE) tumors. The aim of this study was to investigate the prognostic value of FDG-PET in patients with NE tumors.Ninety-eight prospectively enrolled patients with NE tumors underwent FDG-PET imaging. FDG uptake was quantified by maximal standardized uptake value (SUVmax). The prognostic value of FDG uptake, proliferation index, chromogranin A, and liver metastases were assessed.During the 1-year follow-up, 14 patients died. The diagnostic sensitivity of FDG-PET was 58% (n = 57) and a positive FDG-PET result was associated with a significantly higher risk of death with a hazard ratio (HR) of 10.3 [95% confidence interval (CI), 1.3-78.9]. Thirteen of the 57 (23%) FDG-PET-positive patients died compared with 1 of 41 (2%) FDG-PET-negative patients. By univariate analysis, a SUVmax of >9 and a high Ki67 index were significant predictors of overall survival with a HR of 8.8 (95% CI, 2.7-28.7) and a HR of 2.6 (95% CI, 1.3-5.1), respectively. In a multivariate analysis including a SUVmax of >3, Ki67, and chromogranin A, SUVmax of >3 was the only predictor of progression-free survival (HR, 8.4; P < 0.001).This study shows a strong prognostic value of FDG-PET for NE tumors, which exceeds the prognostic value of traditional markers such as Ki67, chromogranin A, and liver metastases. FDG-PET may obtain an important role for NE tumors.[The value of isotopic intraoperative location of various neuroblastomas].Value of FDG PET imaging in the management of patients with thyroid, neuroendocrine, and neural crest tumors.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the value and impact on management of FDG PET imaging in patients with biopsy-proved neuroendocrine and neural crest tumors, as well as thyroid carcinoma of various types.This is a retrospective review of imaging and clinical data of 60 consecutive patients presenting for evaluation of suspected recurrence who underwent FDG PET imaging between August 1993 and February 2002. All patients were referred for PET because of equivocal findings on conventional evaluation (most often increasing tumor markers and negative conventional workup) or for restaging. The final diagnosis was established with pathology (n = 19) or at least 6 months of follow-up (n = 41). The FDG images were acquired 1 hour after the intravenous administration of 10 mCi FDG with 1 of 2 dedicated PET tomographs (Siemens ECAT 933, CTI, Knoxville, TN; and GE Advance, General Electric Medical Systems, Milwaukee, WI).Thirty-four patients had recurrent disease and 26 had no evidence of recurrence. FDG PET imaging revealed at least as many focal abnormalities as concurrent CT, magnetic resonance, or other nuclear imaging modalities in 46 of 60 patients (77%). There were 17 patients (28%) in whom FDG PET found abnormalities not seen with other modalities. In the small group (n = 18) of cases of carcinoid, pheochromocytoma, Merkel cell tumor, and neuroblastoma, all cases were true positive (T+) or true negative (T-). In the group of 42 cases of thyroid carcinoma, the sensitivity was 67%. There were 16 T+, 18 T-, and 8 false-negative (F-) cases. Six F- cases presented with increasing thyroglobulin levels and negative whole-body I-131 scans. Four of these 6 F- cases were proved by surgery, 1 by a positive post I-131 therapy scan, and 1 by normalization of thyroglobulin levels after I-131 therapy. Two of the 8 F- PET cases had a positive I-131 scan. FDG PET imaging had an impact on the management of 13 of 60 of these patients (22%) by demonstrating extensive metastases and cancelling surgery (n = 2), and by detecting recurrence and guiding surgery (n = 5) or radiation therapy (n = 6).FDG PET is helpful in the evaluation of thyroid, neuroendocrine, and neural crest tumors. Although the sensitivity was only 76%, there were no false-positive findings, and FDG PET findings changed the management of 22% of the patients.A prospective comparison between magnetic resonance imaging, meta-iodobenzylguanidine scintigraphy and marrow histology/cytology in neuroblastoma.A prospective comparison between magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), 123I meta-iodobenzylguanidine (mIBG) scintigraphy and posterior iliac crest marrow aspiration and trephine biopsy in 30 assessments (19 patients) showed concordance between the three techniques in 16 assessments (53.3%). In 10 (33.3%), MRI and mIBG revealed abnormalities not detected by marrow biopsy. MRI was the only technique to demonstrate marrow abnormality in four assessments (13.3%). In addition, MRI revealed more sites of abnormality in 16 parallel assessments. We conclude that MRI shows promise as a non-invasive means of detecting bone marrow infiltration by neuroblastoma, but that further evaluation of the specificity of MRI in this setting is indicated.Follow-up in neuroblastoma: comparison of metaiodobenzylguanidine and a chimeric anti-GD2 antibody for detection of tumor relapse and therapy response.Early and correct diagnosis of local tumor recurrence, occurrence of metastases, and therapy response are essential in patients with neuroblastoma stage IV. The aim of the study was to evaluate the diagnostic value of metaiodobenzylguanidine (mIBG) and a chimeric GD2 antibody in the follow-up of patients with neuroblastoma. In a prospective study, mIBG (N = 31 scans) and immunoscintigraphy were compared with a chimeric antiganglioside antibody, ch14.18 (MAb) (N = 31 scans), labeled with technetium Tc 99m in the follow-up of 18 patients with stage IV neuroblastoma. The findings were compared with histologic findings, other imaging examinations, and clinical changes over the course of 4 to 6 years. For the diagnosis of local tumor recurrences, sensitivity was 80% for MAb and 70% for mIBG. Specificity was 93% for MAb and 72% for mIBG. The MAb was superior for the detection of skeletal metastases, with a sensitivity of 82% compared with 72% for mIBG. Specificity was 100% for both techniques. Also, for soft tissue/lymph node metastases, sensitivity for MAb was higher (50%) than for mIBG (31%). Specificity was 100% for each technique. In sequential studies, metastases were detected earlier with MAb (mean: 2.3 m for skeletal metastases, 3.6 m for soft tissue metastases) than with mIBG. After therapy, tumor uptake was visualized longer with mIBG (mean 6.3 m) than with MAb. The chimeric antibody ch14.18 is likely to be valuable for follow-up examinations and for assessment of therapy response because of earlier detection of new metastases.Immunoscintigraphic imaging of mIBG-negative metastases in neuroblastoma.We report a study of seven children with recurrent stage IV neuroblastoma comparing the uptake pattern of 123I-metaiodobenzylguanidine (mIBG) with 99mTc-labeled monoclonal antibody (MAb) BW 575 by the tumor lesions. Immunofluorescence studies of bone marrow had verified specific binding of the antibody to the tumor cells. The majority of tumor sites was detected both by mIBG and MAb scans. However, five of 26 lesions were not detected by mIBG and eight of 26 were false negative by immunoscintigraphy. The false negative lesions by mIBG belonged to five different patients (one of five primary, four of five bone marrow). In conclusion, MAb BW 575 may detect mIBG-negative neuroblastoma sites. The presence of antibody-negative sites suggests the utilization of both scintigraphy methods together.Local evaluation of abdominal neuroblastoma stage III and IV: use of US, CT, and 123 I-meta-iodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) scintigraphy.Exploiting the MIBG-avidity of neuroblastoma for staging and treatment.Analysis of adrenal masses by 18F-FDG positron emission tomography scanning.This study aimed to analyse the characteristics of adrenal masses visible in the computerised tomography (CT) scans which have been also evaluated by 2-[18F]fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose positron emission tomography (18F-FDG PET), and to characterise the features of 18F-FDG PET scans associated with various adrenal endocrine tumours, especially benign functional tumours. 18F-FDG PET scans of 105 patients with adrenal masses on the CT scan were analysed. Positive uptakes in the 18F-FDG PET scans were seen in 60 malignant tumours (54 metastasic lesions, six primary adrenal cancers) and seven benign tumours. The positive predictive value of 18F-FDG PET imaging to characterise an adrenal mass as a malignant tumour was 90%; the corresponding negative predictive value to rule out malignancy was also 90%. Benign adrenal tumours were smaller than that of malignant lesions (p<0.05). The mean standardised uptake value max (SUVmax) of the metastatic lesions [8.4+/-6.5 (microCi/g)/microCi/kg] was significantly higher than that of the benign adrenal tumours [2.4+/-1.2 (microCi/g)/microCi/kg, p<0.001]. Examination of only the primary adrenal lesions revealed that all adrenocortical carcinomas, two of three cases of pheochromocytomas, three of five neuroblastomas and two of four cases of primary aldosteronism showed positive 18F-FDG uptake. In conclusion, for patients presenting adrenal masses with a high probability of malignancy, 18F-FDG PET can be used to differentiate malignant from benign adrenal lesions. However, the 18F-FDG PET uptake did not show an always consistent pattern for endocrine tumours, which was probably due to the variability inherent in 18F-FDG uptake. This study suggests that 18F-FDG PET scanning can offer supporting data to localise and characterise adrenal tumours.Meta-iodobenzylguanidine in neuroblastoma: from diagnosis to therapy.Neoplasms in a pediatric population: 2-[F-18]-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose PET studies.To assess the uptake of 2-[fluorine-18]-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose (FDG) in common and uncommon tumors in children and to develop a method for performing positron emission tomography (PET) studies in children with malignant neoplasms.Twenty-two pediatric patients with known or suspected malignancies (27 scans) underwent FDG PET. Tumor uptake of FDG was measured on PET scans.Tumor uptake of FDG was detected in 17 of 21 patients with malignant disease. Neuroblastomas and their metastases (including those that did not absorb metaiodobenzylguanidine) intensely accumulated FDG. In a patient with Ewing sarcoma, FDG PET showed two foci of metastatic disease not evident on bone scans. In two patients, PET showed that large areas of the tumor were necrotic.FDG PET is feasible, is useful in the study of tumors in children, and may provide unique, clinically important information.Whole-body MR imaging with the use of parallel imaging for detection of skeletal metastases in pediatric patients with small-cell neoplasms: comparison with skeletal scintigraphy and FDG PET/CT.In pediatric patients with small-cell tumors, there is an increasing demand for accurate and early detection of skeletal, especially bone marrow, metastases as new treatment protocols are introduced. Whole-body MR imaging (WB-MR) and (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose PET/CT (FDG PET/CT) are new promising imaging methods that can detect metastases before osteoblastic host response occurs, which is the basis for detection of metastases by skeletal scintigraphy (SSC).To assess the ability of WB-MR to detect marrow metastases in children with small-cell neoplasms and compare its performance with that of FDG PET/CT and SSC.During a 16-month period, 26 children and adolescents with histopathologically proven small-cell neoplasms underwent WB-MR, FDG PET/CT and Tc-phosphonate-based SSC in a random order within a 25-day period. Metastases were localized in relation to eight regions of the body.WB-MR revealed metastases in 39 out of a total of 208 regions in 26 patients (sensitivity 97.5%, specificity 99.4%, positive predictive value 97.5%, negative predictive value 99.4%), SSC in 12 regions (sensitivity 30%, specificity 99.4%, PPV 92.3%, NPV 85.6%) and FDG PET/CT in 36 regions (sensitivity 90.0%, specificity 100%, PPV 100%, NPV 97.7%). Both WB-MR and FDG PET/CT showed excellent agreement (kappa) with the final diagnosis (96.9% and 93.6% respectively), whereas SSC showed only moderate agreement (39.6%).Our results suggest that WB-MR and FDG PET/CT studies are robust imaging modalities for screening for skeletal metastases, and are far more accurate than SSC. The lack of radiation is an additional advantage of WB-MR, especially in the pediatric population.Focal fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose-avid lesions without computed tomography correlate at whole-body positron emission tomography-computed tomography in oncology patients: how often are they malignant?To retrospectively evaluate the rate of malignancy of focal fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose (18F-FDG)-avid lesions without computed tomography (CT) correlate at whole-body positron emission tomography (PET)-CT in oncology patients, because better defining these abnormalities could potentially lead to improved patient management algorithms that rely on PET-CT for detection, staging, and treatment monitoring of malignancies.We performed a computer search of all PET-CT studies performed at our institution from 2006 to 2009, and identified 87 studies with findings of focal 18F-FDG-avid lesions without correlate at CT. The rate of malignancy of such lesions was determined by reviewing findings at follow-up imaging or by clinical or histopathological follow-up. Rates of malignancy were categorized and compared by lesion location and by the type of primary malignancy.The most common locations for focal 18F-FDG-avid lesions without CT correlate were: lymph node location (without visible lymph nodes; 27/87), bone (21/87), soft tissue (17/87), liver (9/87), and gastrointestinal tract (8/87). Forty-one percent (36/87) of the focal FDG-avid lesions without CT correlate were malignant (either metastatic disease or a second malignancy) at follow-up (mean follow-up: 5 months, range: 1-25 months). Focal FDG-avid lesions in lymph node location and in bone without CT correlate had higher rates of malignancy (56%, 15/27 and 52%, 11/21, respectively) than lesions in all other locations (26%, 10/39, P=0.028). In 15 of 87 cases, the only significant finding at PET-CT was an FDG-avid lesion without CT correlate. Of those, 53% (8/15) was positive for malignancy. There were no significant differences in the rates of malignancy for the focal FDG-avid lesions without CT correlate when stratified by the type of primary malignancy in this series.Focal FDG avid lesions without CT correlate were malignant in 41% of cases in our series of oncology patients. Lesions in lymph node location and in bones had the highest rates of malignancy. Knowledge of the patterns and risk of malignancy of focal FDG-avid lesions without CT correlate in oncology patients may facilitate the management of oncology patients with such lesions on PET-CT, and could lead to an improved interpretation of PET-CT scans by imaging specialists.123I-MIBG versus 18F-FDG: which is better, or which can be eliminated?Diagnostic imaging in abdominal neuroblastoma: is there a complementary role of MIBG-scintigraphy and ultrasonography?In a retrospective study we evaluated the agreement between the results of meta-iodo benzylguanidine (MIBG) scintigraphy and abdominal ultrasonography (US) in the diagnosis and follow up of neuroblastoma (NBL) with respect to the abdominal region. Data of 28 consecutive paediatric patients with NBL or suspected NBL were included (16 M/12 F, mean age 2.9 years, range 3 weeks-13.4 years). The results (as judged by the nuclear physician or radiologist, respectively) of 60 MIBG examinations (123I and 131I) including 26 single photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) and US, respectively, performed within a period of 14 days, could be evaluated. Full agreement was reached in 37 comparisons (62%), while partial and no agreement was found in 17 (28%), and 6 (10%) comparisons respectively. In 8 out of 37 comparisons with full agreement, 12 diagnosed lesions were histopathologically proven, while 11 comparisons with negative findings were also negative in other clinical modalities. US diagnosed correctly in 68% of the histopathological proven lesions, while this was 54% for MIBG scintigraphy. In approximately 50% of the MIBG scans in which SPECT was available, SPECT provided significant additional information.Congruent results of MIBG scintigraphy and ultrasonography in the detection of abdominal lesions in patients with suspected neuroblastoma indicate a high reliability in the diagnosis and localisation. Due to the favourable results of additional SPECT, it is advisable to perform SPECT routinely in this diagnosis.Cerebral uptake of MIBG: adrenoceptors visualized?Radiolabelled metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) localizes in adrenergic neurons. A study was carried out to evaluate the uptake of this radiopharmaceutical in cerebral tissues. Twenty-three patients with neural crest tumours, who had no evidence of central nervous system disease, were evaluated. Each patient underwent a diagnostic MIBG study, followed by a therapy dose with 131I-MIBG and subsequent scintigraphy. Focal uptake was seen in the cerebellum (CB), basal nuclei and thalamic region (BNTr), 24 and 48 h postinjection on the diagnostic images. The BNTr to cerebral cortex ratio ranged from 1.05 to 1.79. Uptake was also seen on the days 2, 3, 4 and 6 post-therapy images. Single photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) clearly outlined the uptake in the CB and BNTr. The BNTr to cerebral cortex ratio ranged from 1.10 to 1.85 and CB to cerebral cortex ratio from 1.18 to 2.01. It is hypothesized that the focal uptake observed in the CB and BNTr is due to adrenergic receptor binding. It is felt that SPECT with radiolabelled MIBG may prove to be a useful tracer for mapping the adrenergic receptors in the human brain.Comparison of In-111 pentetreotide, Tc-99m (V)DMSA and I-123 mlBG scintimaging in neural crest tumors.Three radiolabelled substances, 111In-pentetreotide, 99mTc-(V)DMSA and 123I-MIBG with different kinetics but similar tumor seeking behavior, were i.v. injected to assess and correlate their clinical value in metastatic malignant pheochromocytomas (4 patients), stage III and IV neuroblastomas (7 patients) and medullary thyroid carcinomas (6 patients). All II pheochromocytoma/neuroblastoma patients received i.v. a dose of III MBq (3 mCi) of 123I-MIBG and 185 MBq (5 mCi) of 111In-pentetreotide, within approximately weeks each other. Furthermore, in 4 of these patients as well as in all medullary thyroid carcinoma patients 111 MBq (3 mCi) of 99mTc-(V)DMSA were applied i.v. I week prior to the pentetreotide/mlBG scans. Four patients (malignant pheochromocytoma) with a total of 7 foci showing MIBG accumulation had 3 sites with pentetreotide and 1 site with (V)DMSA uptake, while in 7 patients (neuroblastora) with 15 foci showing MIBG accumulation 10 sites had detectable pentetreotide and 3 sites detectable (V)DMSA. Of the three radiotracers, 111In-pentetreotide used for somatostatin receptor identification holds promise mainly in cases where foci imaged with 123I-MIBG are negative. 111In-pentetreotide is unlikely to replace 123I-MIBG as a first-line routine diagnostic scintigraphic modality; compared to pentetreotide or MIBG, (V)DMSA seems to be highly sensitive only in medullary thyroid carcinomas.[Sensitivity and specificity of meta-iodobenzylguanidine (mIBG) scintigraphy in the evaluation of neuroblastoma: analysis of 115 cases].Seventy children (3.7 +/- 3.3 y) with definitely confirmed diagnosis of neuroblastoma had 115 whole body scans carried out 24 h after injection of 3.7 MBq/kg of I-123 mIBG (83 scans) or 0.7 MBq/kg of I-131 mIBG (17 scans) or 0.9 to 4.5 GBq of I-131 mIBG (15 post-therapeutic scans). The scans were interpreted as positive in the presence of any non-physiological uptake area or of any bone uptake of the tracer, even at the level of the metaphyseal complex. For the primary tumour, the sensitivity of mIBG scans was 73%. Ten false negative patients had an overlap of the tumour with the bladder or heart images (4 cases) or with positive metastatic images (6 cases: liver, spine). Three false negative patients had neuroblastomas which did not secrete catecholamines. The specificity of mIBG was 94%. In our opinion, mIBG scans have a complementary role to assess the activity of post-therapeutic remnants. For the detection of hepatic and lymph node metastases, the sensitivity was about 50% and the specificity was 100%. The standard used for the detection of bone marrow metastases was the cytological and histological examination of 10 bone marrow aspirations and one or more biopsies (CHBMS). The sensitivity of mIBG scans was 90% and the specificity 68%. However, reviewing the data from the 16 false positive scans, we found 11 definitely proven bone metastases, 3 biological relapses and 2 cases of delayed abnormal CHBMS supporting the positivity of the mIBG scans, raising the specificity to 100%. Tc-99m diphosphonate bone scans had a sensitivity of 78% and a specificity of 51%. We suggest that positive mIBG scans may save other procedures since our data do not support false positive detection of bone or bone marrow metastases. In contrast, patients with negative mIBG findings should be further explored.[Evaluation of adrenal medullary function with scintigraphy].MIBG detection of hepatic neuroblastoma: correlation with CT, US and surgical findings.Metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) imaging is used in the diagnosis, staging and follow-up of virtually every case of neuroblastoma seen at our institution. Normal sites of MIBG uptake include the liver and therefore difficulties have been predicted and encountered in the diagnosis of hepatic neuroblastoma due to inability to separate abnormally increased tracer deposition from normal hepatic activity. We reviewed every MIBG (I123 and I131) study performed at our pediatric hospital over a 4 year period encompassing 88 patients, 67 of whom had biopsy proven neuroblastoma. Hepatic findings onMIBG studies were compared with concurrent abdominal CT and US studies in all 67 patients. The clinical records of all patients with abnormal MIBG scans or abnormal CT or US studies of the liver were also reviewed. Eight patients were found to have abnormal liver findings on one or more imaging studies (MIBG, CT, or US). There were 3 true positive MIBG studies, one of which was an early study in a patient who later went on to have one of the false positive studies. Two patients had false positive MIBG scans for liver neuroblastoma. MIBG failed to detect liver involvement in 4 patients.[Incidentally discovered adrenal tumors. Apropos of 20 cases].According to Glazer, the term of incidentaloma describes an adrenal tumor discovered incidentally during acomputed tomographyscan and by extension to all masses discovered whatever the imaging process. Twenty patients have been operated during the last 10 years. The discovering circumstances are not specific, except the ecography and CT Scan. Complementary examinations include biological tests aiming at showing a possible hormonal secretion and more specific examinations MIBG scintygraphy and magnetic resonance imaging. The tumors often large (80% more than 5 cm long) and solid (75%) have all been removed by transperitoneal approach (13) or lombotomy. Post operative course was approach unevertful. The histological study showed 6 metastasis, 5 benign kystic lesions, 3 hematomas, 3 adenomas, 2 adrenalcortical carcinoma and 1 ganglioneuroma. A review of the literature series leads us to evaluate the frequency and risk of incidentalomas and to consider the necessary examination and the strategy to be adopted in front of such lesions. The evaluation of hormone status, the recourse to specific imaging seems necessary whereas the guided needle biopsy does not present any risk and should be reserved for very special cases. A decisional scheme is proposed, which ains at removing all voluminous and/or secreting tumors. Small lesions behind 35 mm will have to be examined closely and will be removed if they grow larger or persist.[Indications for MIBG scintigraphy in the diagnosis of neuroblastoma].The significance and indications of MIBG scintigraphy are critically assessed. The results are compared with the results of whole-body bone scintigraphy, computed tomography (CT) and magnetic resonance tomography (MRT), and are related to values of catecholamine metabolites in 24-h urines. In our patients (10 histologically proven cases) MIBG scintigraphy turned out to be most useful in tumor follow-up. In contrast, the significance was much lower in primary tumor diagnosis and tumor staging as the exact primary diagnosis was established by other means such as CT, MRT, MDP whole-body scan, urine chemistry and bone marrow biopsy in all cases. MIBG scintigraphy in diagnostic imaging of neuroblastoma is an additive diagnostic tool and is called for in (1) tumour follow-up (progress, recurrencies, metastases); (2) primary diagnosis if the primary tumour has not been localized by means of CT or MRT; and (3) tumour staging to differentiate stage IV disease from lower stages as long as stage IV disease has not been established by bone-marrow biopsy or MDP whole-body scan.123I-IMT SPET: introducing another research tool into clinical neuro-oncology?Can MIBG scan replace the need for bone marrow assessment at diagnosis and reassessment in stage 4 neuroblastomas?Complete staging (extensive marrow investigation and meta-iodo benzylguanine (MIBG) scan) is considered as mandatory both at diagnosis and after chemotherapy for assessment of metastases in neuroblastomas. However the correlation between bone marrow invasion and uptake of MIBG at metastatic sites remains unclear. This study investigates whether MIBG alone is sufficiently sensitive to make these procedures redundant.20 children over one year of age, with histologically proven metastatic neuroblastoma were studied. Extensive bone marrow assessment and MIBG bone scan performed both at diagnosis and after completion of induction chemotherapy were reviewed.At diagnosis metastases were detected by marrow investigation alone in 2, MIBG alone in 2 and both procedures in 16. After induction chemotherapy metastases were detected by only marrow investigation in 2, by only MIBG in 3, by both procedures in 6 patients, and by none in 9.Whether marrow investigations and MIBG scan explore the same phenomenon remains unclear. However it appears that marrow disease that is histologically detectable may remain MIBG negative both at diagnosis and after treatment. Both procedures are still justified at time of diagnosis and evaluation of response.[Scintigraphic imaging of benign and malignant tumors of the sympathetic nervous system with meta-iodobenzylguanidine].The authors report on their experiences with metaiodine-benzylguanidine (MIBG) scintiscanning in a total of 36 patients. 7 of these patients had a benign pheochromocytoma, 4 a malignant one; neuroblastoma was seen in 10 patients. Scintiscan diagnosis was supplemented by measurements of irradiation exposure and attainable tumour dose. It was also shown that it is possible to mark neuroblastoma cells in cultures. The results of these studies are discussed and compared with those of other working groups. If the physiological pattern of distribution is taken into consideration, and if the proper imaging technique is adopted, MIBG scintiscan is a sensitive and highly specific method in diagnosing pheochromocytomas and neuroblastomas.Usefulness of whole body FDG18 PET-CT imaging in comprehensive oncologic management--initial experience.Retrospective analysis of outcome with PET-CT imaging used for various clinical situations.Whole body PET-CT scan of 29 patients was evaluated. In first group, PET-CT was used for response evaluation after curative radio-chemotherapy. In second group, PET-CT was used as an additional diagnostic tool. In third group, PET-CT was used for delineating target volume. For first and second group, uptake was recorded with respect to primary, regional and distant site of involvement and confirmed through PET-CT guided biopsies whenever required. For third group, hypermetabolic volume delineated on PET image was compared with gross target volume delineated on CT image.In first group, 50 % (6/12) of the patients had distant systemic disease, 33% (4/12) had residual regional disease and 58% (7/12) had residual/recurrent local disease. In second group, 30% (3/10) patients had distant systemic disease on PET-CT where CT was inconclusive. 25% (4/10) had variable extent of disease involvement on PET-CT that changed the technique of radiotherapy treatment. In 20% (2/10) patients, PET-CT changed the sequence of treatment. In third group (n = 7), PET delineated volume was significantly higher (10-50%) than CT delineated volume for local site but for regional targets the difference was <10%.With the initial use of FDG18 PET-CT imaging, we realized that rate of distant metastasis is much higher which usually remain unnoticed because of conventional approach of investigation. PET-CT imaging has potential to improve the method of conventional IMRT planning.After bench to bedside: the impact of disease progression, commercial opportunities and available instrumentation on clinical outcome.Adrenal scintigraphy.Evaluation of optimal acquisition duration or injected activity for pediatric 18F-FDG PET/CT.Pediatric (18)F-FDG dosing and acquisition durations are generally based on coarse extrapolation from adult guidelines. This study sought to determine whether shorter acquisition durations or a lower (18)F-FDG injected activity could be used for pediatric (18)F-FDG PET/CT examinations while maintaining diagnostic utility. Reduction of overall scan time potentially reduces motion artifacts, improves patient comfort, and decreases length of sedation. Alternatively, decreased (18)F-FDG dose minimizes radiation risk.Fourteen whole-body (18)F-FDG PET/CT examinations were performed on 13 patients (weight, 13-109 kg; age range, 1-23 y) with a weight-based injected activity (5.3 MBq/kg [0.144 mCi/kg]), fixed acquisition durations (3 min/field of view [FOV] if < 22 kg, 5 min/FOV if > 22 kg), and list-mode acquisition. For each examination, the list-mode data were truncated to form multiple datasets with shorter acquisition durations down to a minimum of 1 min/FOV (i.e., 1, 2, 3, 4, and 5 min/FOV data were formed from single 5 min/FOV acquisition). Fifty-six image volumes were generated, randomized, and reviewed in a masked manner with corresponding CT image volumes by 5 radiologists. Overall, subjective adequacy and objective lesion detection accuracy by body region were evaluated.All examinations with maximum acquisition duration were graded as adequate and were used as the reference standard for detection accuracy. For patients less than 22 kg, 1 of the 3 PET/CT examinations was graded as inadequate for clinical tasks when acquisition duration was reduced to 2 min/FOV, and all examinations were graded as inadequate when reduced to 1 min/FOV. For patients more than 22 kg, all 3-5 min/FOV studies were graded as adequate, and 2 of the 9 studies were graded as inadequate for 2 min/FOV studies. Lesion detection accuracy was perfect for acquisition times between 3 min/FOV and 5 min/FOV for all regions of the body. However, lesion detection became less accurate when imaging acquisition time was reduced more than 40%.Evaluation of image volumes generated from simulated shorter acquisition durations suggests that imaging times for larger patients (>22 kg) can be reduced from 5 min/FOV to 3 min/FOV without a loss of diagnostic utility. Using decreased acquisition times as a surrogate for (18)F-FDG dose, (18)F-FDG dose can be reduced by approximately 40% when all patients were scanned for 5 min/FOV.[123I]MIBG scintigraphy in neuroblastoma: a comparison between planar and SPECT imaging.The aim of the present study was to assess the utility of SPECT imaging with [123I]MIBG in patients with neuroblastoma (NB). Twenty-two children were studied (11 males and 11 females: age range: newborn to 11 years). A total of 39 studies were performed in different clinical phases. Both planar (at 24 and occasionally 48 hours) and SPECT (at 24 hours) imaging were performed in all cases. Planar studies gave a sensitivity of 87.5% (evidence of the disease in 21 of 24 studies performed in children with known NB lesions) and a specificity of 93.3% (true negative results in 14 of 15 studies performed in disease-free patients). In the same patients SPECT gave a sensitivity of 95.8% (23 of 24 positive studies and a specificity equal to that of planar scanning. In 5 of 21 studies positive at planar scanning SPECT showed 9 additional lesions. In conclusion, [123I]MIBG SPECT imaging compared to planar scanning can demonstrate a greater number of lesions. Its use seems to be indicated mainly in cases in which diagnostic assessment is difficult, such as small residual tumors or in the follow up of children no longer in therapy, in whom it can lead to an early diagnosis of relapse.Specificity of radioiodinated MIBG for neural crest tumors in childhood.The high sensitivity of metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) scintigraphy for sympathomedullary tumors such as neuroblastoma and pheochromocytoma is well documented. The specificity of MIBG scintigraphy for these tumors is also high but has been incompletely characterized for other neural crest tumors and non-neural crest tumors of childhood.The medical records and MIBG scans of all children who had undergone MIBG scintigraphy for known or suspected neuroblastoma or pheochromocytoma were retrospectively reviewed at five major referral centers. Those patients found to have pathologies other than neuroblastoma or pheochromocytoma form the basis of this study.One hundred children with a total of 110 lesions met the inclusion criteria. All had negative MIBG scans except 1 of 2 children with infantile myofibromatosis, 1 of 2 with neuroendocrine carcinomas, 1 of 2 with pancreaticoblastomas and 1 of 10 with primitive neuroectodermal tumors.MIBG scintigraphy is highly specific for neuroblastoma and pheochromocytoma. Only 4% (4/100) of nonsympathomedullary tumors (non-pheochromocytoma and non-neuroblastoma) in childhood showed MIBG uptake, of which only 2% (2/100) were of non-neural crest origin.Imaging of abdominal neuroblastoma in children.The aims of the study were: 1) to assess the efficacy of different imaging methods for use prior to treatment; 2) to compare the surgico-histopathologically-based International Neuroblastoma Staging System (INSS) staging with the imaging results; and 3) to suggest a localisation scheme for abdominal neuroblastoma.Thirty-one children with an abdominal neuroblastoma (median age 2 years), underwent abdominal US, CT of chest and abdomen, MR imaging of abdomen and spine, chest radiography, skeletal survey, radionuclide bone scintigraphy, MIBG scintigraphy, and bone marrow biopsy.In the evaluation of local disease, CT and MR were superior to US. There was no significant difference between CT and MR in assessment of the location or size of the tumour. Evaluation of invasive growth and lymphadenopathy was uncertain irrespective of imaging modality. Intraspinal extension was more distinctly demonstrated with MR. Tissue characterization with CT and MR did not contribute in the assessment of the tumours. Contrast enhancement at CT and MR examinations both improved demarcation between tumour and kidney, and was a necessity for evaluation of vessel encasement with CT. The local disease was best assessed by either CT or MR, while metastatic disease was best revealed by CT, MR, scintigraphy or bone marrow biopsy.Imaging may be a valuable basis for clinical assessment and pretreatment staging of abdominal neuroblastoma.Utility of thallium-201 and iodine-123 metaiodobenzylguanidine in the scintigraphic detection of neuroendocrine neoplasia.Metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) is a specific marker for neuroendocrine tumours, such as phaeochromocytoma, neuroblastoma, medullary thyroid cancer (MTC) and paraganglioma, but it suffers in some cases (especially in MTC) from a lack of sensitivity. Thallium is a well-known marker of cellularity with a great sensitivity and a lack of specificity. In order to determine whether the association of these two markers is able to improve the detection of neuroendocrine lesions, 137 scintigraphic examinations using MIBG and thallium were performed in 101 patients referred for suspicion or follow-up of neuroendocrine tumours. Thallium chloride was first injected (1 MBq/kg), images being acquired about 20 min after injection; 123I-MIBG (4 MBq/kg) was then injected and images acquired 5 and 24 h later. In patients with phaeochromocytoma or neuroblastoma, thallium scintigraphy appeared of little help since no tumoural site was discovered by thallium accumulation alone. In contrast, thallium examination seemed of interest in the detection of paraganglioma and MTC, the association of the two radiopharmaceuticals increasing the number of detected sites.Contributions of nuclear endocrinology to the diagnosis of adrenal tumors.Whole-body PET/CT with 11C-meta-hydroxyephedrine in tumors of the sympathetic nervous system: feasibility study and comparison with 123I-MIBG SPECT/CT.The 11C-labeled tracer meta-hydroxyephedrine (11C-HED) is a noradrenaline analog that was developed to visualize the sympathetic nervous system with PET. Initial clinical studies show a rapid uptake of 11C-HED in localized tumors of this system. Whole-body imaging with 11C-HED PET is now possible as PET/CT scanners allow a rather short examination time. The aim of this study was to evaluate the feasibility of whole-body 11C-HED PET/CT for examination of tumors of the sympathetic nervous system and to directly compare the results with 123I-labeled meta-iodobenzylguanidine (123I-MIBG) scintigraphy, including SPECT/CT.In 19 consecutive patients, 9 mo to 68 y old (median, 32 y), 24 whole-body 11C-HED PET/CT (low-dose CT) examinations were performed. Scans were compared with attenuation-corrected 123I-MIBG SPECT/CT scans (24-h scan, low-dose CT). The intensity of tracer accumulation above background was visually analyzed in both scans, PET and SPECT, using a 4-value scale. In 11C-HED PET, mean and maximum standardized uptake values were determined for all lesions.In 14 patients with 19 pairs of examinations, the following tumors were confirmed histologically: 6 neuroblastomas, 5 pheochromocytomas, 1 ganglioneuroblastoma, and 2 paragangliomas. In 5 patients, each having 1 pair of examinations, clinical follow-up and/or histologic examination did not reveal any tumor deriving from the sympathetic nervous system. 11C-HED PET/CT detected 80 of 81 totally depicted tumor lesions (sensitivity, 0.99; soft tissue, 61; bone, 19). 123I-MIBG SPECT/CT detected 75 of 81 lesions (sensitivity, 0.93; soft tissue, 56; bone, 19). With both methods, there were no false-positive lesions. The tumor-to-background contrast of 11C-HED uptake was higher in comparison with 123I-MIBG uptake in 26 lesions (0.32; soft tissue, 18; bone, 8), equal in 39 lesions (0.48; soft tissue, 30; bone, 9), and lower than 123I-MIBG uptake in 16 lesions (0.20; soft tissue, 14; bone, 2).Whole-body imaging using 11C-HED PET/CT is feasible in the clinical setting of patients with tumors of the sympathetic nervous system. 11C-HED PET/CT detected more tumor lesions than 123I-MIBG SPECT/CT. However, tumor-to-background contrast of 11C-HED in lesions can be higher, equal, or lower compared with 123I-MIBG.Paraneoplastic syndromes of the CNS.Major advances in the management of paraneoplastic neurologic disorders (PND) include the detection of new antineuronal antibodies, the improved characterisation of known syndromes, the discovery of new syndromes, and the use of CT and PET to reveal the associated tumours at an early stage. In addition, the definition of useful clinical criteria has facilitated the early recognition and treatment of these disorders. In this article, we review some classic concepts about PND and recent clinical and immunological developments, focusing on paraneoplastic cerebellar degeneration, opsoclonus-myoclonus, and encephalitides affecting the limbic system.Value of MRI and MIBG-I123 scintigraphy in the diagnosis of spinal bone marrow involvement in neuroblastoma in children.The results of MRI and MIBG scintigraphy performed on the spine of 14 children with neuroblastoma are reported. In 6 cases of diffuse spinal bone marrow tumor infiltration, diagnosis is easier with MIBG scintigraphy than with MRI. In 5 cases, MRI detected hyposignal of the vertebral body without any spinal abnormality on MIBG scintigraphy. A discussion of the reasons for negative MIBG scintigraphy is presented and in these 5 cases, it is suggested that a lateral view of MIBG scintigraphy and HMDP-Tc99m scintigraphy may be performed, even vertebral body biopsy in order to assess bone marrow tumoral infiltration.Diagnosis and treatment of neuroblastoma using metaiodobenzylguanidine.Neuroblastoma is a lethal and not uncommon tumor in childhood. Early detection and display of the spread of the tumor is highly desirable for proper treatment. Nine children suspected of having neuroblastomas were examined by I-131 metaiodobenzylguanidine (I-131 MIBG) imaging. In two recent studies I-123 metaiodobenzylguanidine (I-123 MIBG) was used. A primary adrenal neuroblastoma was correctly identified in three cases. In two patients additional tumor sites were found. In one patient, who was in complete remission, no pathologic accumulation of I-131 MIBG was found. I-131 MIBG images were also normal in four patients with other types of neoplastic diseases. A boy with multiple metastases was treated with 100 mCi of I-131 MIBG. He developed transient gastrointestinal illness and there was no regression of the tumor deposits. In one girl with a large adrenal neuroblastoma high uptake of I-131 MIBG was observed. She received two therapy doses of I-131 MIBG (35 mCi and 75 mCi) with curative intention giving a total absorbed dose in the tumor of approximately 76 Gy. In spite of high retention of radioactivity in the tumor, regression did not occur, but her general condition was improved. In the present study, images of superior quality were obtained with I-123 MIBG imaging. It is concluded that imaging using I-131 MIBG or I-123 MIBG should be used in both the initial evaluation and the follow-up of children with neuroblastoma.Imaging of catecholamine-secreting tumours: uses of MIBG in diagnosis and treatment.MIBG radiolabelled with 131I or 123I is a radiopharmaceutical which is concentrated in neuroendocrine tumours, particularly phaeochromocytomas and neuroblastomas. This permits non-invasive whole-body scintigraphic screening for benign and malignant, familial and sporadic, intra-adrenal and extra-adrenal phaeochromocytomas and primary and metastatic neuroblastomas, with high sensitivity (85-90%) and specificity (> 95%). MIBG is also concentrated in presynaptic terminals of adrenergic, autonomically innervated organs such as the heart, and may be used as a non-invasive in vivo probe to study this system. Large doses of 131I-MIBG and 125I-MIBG have been used experimentally to selectively deliver therapeutic doses of radiotherapy to malignant phaeochromocytomas and refractory advanced neuroblastomas.VMA-negative, MIBG scan-positive neuroblastoma in children.Metaiodobenzylguanidine assessment of metastatic neuroblastoma: observer dependency and chemosensitivity evaluation. The SFOP Group.In children over 1 year of age with metastatic neuroblastoma, clearance of metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) skeletal uptake after four courses of induction chemotherapy is one of the most powerful prognostic factors. How subjective is quantification of MIBG uptake, and can earlier MIBG scintigraphy separate good and bad responders?The data from 47 patients who received uniform induction therapy were reviewed. A novel scoring system of MIBG update intensity was proposed. Initial, intermediate (after two courses), and final (after four courses) intensities were scored (0 to 21 points) independently by six different observers. The initial global score and the relative score (calculated by dividing the global score after two courses by the initial score) were compared to the final score. Good responders were those who scored 0 at final MIBG.Between two observers, the correlation coefficient for the global score was superior to 0.80, in nine of ten comparisons established between observers 1-5. The initial score did not predict the final score insofar as only nine of fourteen patients with low initial scores were good responders. The relative score also failed to predict outcome; only six of ten patients with favorable relative score (i.e., <20%), were good responders.This scoring system is reliable and may be used in multicentric trials. However, both initial and relative scores failed to predict final outcome. Thus, intermediate MIBG may be omitted during induction therapy assessment.Comparison of ¹²³I-metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) and ¹³¹I-MIBG semi-quantitative scores in predicting survival in patients with stage 4 neuroblastoma: a report from the Children's Oncology Group.¹²³I-metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) scans are preferable to ¹³¹I-MIBG for neuroblastoma imaging as they deliver less patient radiation yet have greater sensitivity in disease detection. Both ¹²³I-MIBG and ¹³¹I-MIBG scans were used for disease assessments of neuroblastoma patients enrolled on Children's Oncology Group (COG) high-risk study A3973. The hypothesis was that ¹²³I-MIBG and ¹³¹I-MIBG scans were sufficiently similar for clinical purposes in terms of ability to predict survival.Patients enrolled on COG A3973 with stage 4 disease who completed ¹²³I-MIBG or ¹³¹I-MIBG scans at diagnosis, post-induction, post-transplant, or post-biotherapy were analyzed. The performance of the Curie score for each MIBG scan type in predicting survival was evaluated. At each time point, survival curves for ¹²³I-MIBG versus ¹³¹I-MIBG were compared using the log-rank test.Of the 413 patients on A3973 with at least one MIBG scan, 350 were stage 4. The 5-year event-free survival (EFS) and overall survival (OS) rates were 33.4 ± 3.6% and 45.6 ± 4.0% (N = 350). At post-induction, EFS (P = 0.3501) and OS (P = 0.5337) for ¹²³I-MIBG versus ¹³¹I-MIBG were not significantly different. Similarly, comparisons at the three other time points were non-significant.We found no evidence of a statistically significant difference in outcome by type of scan. For future survival analyses of MIBG Curie scores, ¹²³I-MIBG and ¹³¹I-MIBG results may be combined and analyzed overall, without adjustment for scan type.The MIBG super scan.Does a "false negative" MIBG scan predict a better outcome in neuroblastoma patients?MIBG in diagnosis and therapy. Letter from the editors.The diagnostic and therapeutic utility of radioiodinated metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG). 5 years of experience.The authors' experience of more than 5 years in the diagnostic and therapeutic use of radioiodinated MIBG in neural crest tumors is reported. 123I/131I-MIBG scintigraphy was performed in 158 patients: 75 suspected (24 proven) pheochromocytomas (pheos), 43 neuroblastomas (NB), 20 medullary thyroid carcinomas (MTC), 6 ganglioneuromas, 5 carcinoids and 1 insulinoma. Eight cases of tumors not originating from the neural crest were also investigated. The diagnostic sensitivity of the method was above 90% both in pheos and NB (primary tumors and bone metastases). The examination was less effective in localizing MTC (sensitivity = 64.4% in primary or residual/recurrent tumors). The scintigraphic outcome was negative in ganglioneuromas, carcinoids and insulinoma. Specificity was very high (greater than 95%), and no false positive results were found in tumors not deriving from the neural crest. 131I-MIBG treatment was administered to four patients with malignant pheo, nine with NB and four with MTC. Therapy resulted in a complete response in one pheo, two NB and one MTC treated after surgery or at diagnosis (one NB); it gave partial response and prolonged remission in five advanced cases (one pheo, two NB and two MTC); it resulted in temporary stabilization of the disease in one pheo and two NBs; it was ineffective in four cases.Early experience with PET/CT scan in the evaluation of pediatric abdominal neoplasms.Positron emission tomography/computerized tomography (PET/CT) scan provides both functional and anatomical information in a single diagnostic test. It has the potential to be a valuable tool in the evaluation of pediatric abdominal tumors. The goal of this study is to report our early experience with this technology.Children who underwent PET/CT scan in the workup for abdominal neoplasms between July 2005 and January 2008 were identified. Retrospective review of all radiologic studies, operative notes, and pathologic reports was undertaken.A total of 36 patients were collected. These included Burkitt's lymphoma (8), neuroblastoma (7), rhabdomyosarcoma (6), ovarian tumor (3), Wilms' tumor (2), hepatocellular carcinoma (2), paraganglioma (1), germ cell tumor (1), undifferentiated sarcoma (1), renal primitive neuroectodermal tumor (1), gastrointestinal stromal tumor (1), adrenocortical carcinoma (1), inflammatory pseudotumor (1), and adrenal adenoma (1). All neoplasms were fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) were avid. Our experience identified several potential uses for PET/CT scan in this group of patients. These include (1) preoperative staging, (2) selection of appropriate site for biopsy, (3) identification of occult metastatic disease, (4) follow-up for residual or recurrent disease, and (5) assessment of response to chemotherapy. It can also be valuable when the standard diagnostic studies are equivocal or conflicting.Preliminary data indicate that PET/CT is a promising tool in the evaluation of pediatric abdominal malignancies. The delineation of the exact role of this diagnostic modality will require additional experience.Diagnostic value of PET/CT for the staging and restaging of pediatric tumors.The objective of this retrospective study was to compare the diagnostic value of 2-[(18)F]fluoro-2-deoxy-D: -glucose positron emission tomography ((18)F-FDG PET)/CT versus (18)F-FDG PET and CT alone for staging and restaging of pediatric solid tumors.Forty-three children and adolescents (19 females and 24 males; mean age, 15.2 years; age range, 6-20 years) with osteosarcoma (n = 1), squamous cell carcinoma (n = 1), synovial sarcoma (n = 2), germ cell tumor (n = 2), neuroblastoma (n = 2), desmoid tumor (n = 2), melanoma (n = 3), rhabdomyosarcoma (n = 5), Hodgkin's lymphoma (n = 7), non-Hodgkin-lymphoma (n = 9), and Ewing's sarcoma (n = 9) who had undergone (18)F-FDG PET/CT imaging for primary staging or follow-up of metastases were included in this study. The presence, location, and size of primary tumors was determined separately for PET/CT, PET, and CT by two experienced reviewers. The diagnosis of the primary tumor was confirmed by histopathology. The presence or absence of metastases was confirmed by histopathology (n = 62) or clinical and imaging follow-up (n = 238).The sensitivities for the detection of solid primary tumors using integrated (18)F-FDG PET/CT (95%), (18)F-FDG PET alone (73%), and CT alone (93%) were not significantly different (p > 0.05). Seventeen patients showed a total of 153 distant metastases. Integrated PET/CT had a significantly higher sensitivity for the detection of these metastases (91%) than PET alone (37%; p < 0.05), but not CT alone (83%; p > 0.05). When lesions with a diameter of less than 0.5 cm were excluded, PET/CT (89%) showed a significantly higher specificity compared to PET (45%; p < 0.05) and CT (55%; p < 0.05). In a sub-analysis of pulmonary metastases, the values for sensitivity and specificity were 90%, 14%, 82% and 63%, 78%, 65%, respectively, for integrated PET/CT, stand-alone PET, and stand-alone CT. For the detection of regional lymph node metastases, (18)F-FDG PET/CT, (18)F-FDG PET alone, and CT alone were diagnostically correct in 83%, 61%, and 42%. A sub-analysis focusing on the ability of PET/CT, PET, and CT to detect osseous metastases showed no statistically significant difference between the three imaging modalities (p > 0.05).Our study showed a significantly increased sensitivity of PET/CT over that of PET for the detection of distant metastases but not over that of CT alone. However, the specificity of PET/CT for the characterization of pulmonary metastases with a diameter > 0.5 cm and lymph node metastases with a diameter of <1 cm was significantly increased over that of CT alone.[Detection of neural crest tumors by 123I-MIBG scintigraphy].From January 1993 to January 1994, scintigraphy with 123I-MIBG and/or 131I-MIBG were performed in 22 patients and their scintigraphic usefulness was evaluated. Iodine-123 MIBG and 131I-MIBG scintigrams were obtained 24 hours after injection of 222 MBq of 123I-MIBG and 48 hours after injection of 20 MBq of 131I-MIBG, respectively. In two patients with pheochromocytoma, the 123I-MIBG and 131I-MIBG scans were performed and both images were compared. In a patient with single intraadrenal pheochromocytoma, the lesion not detected with 131I-MIBG was clearly visualized with 123I-MIBG. In the other patient with multiple metastatic pheochromocytoma, much more lesions were distinctly demonstrated on the 123I-MIBG images than on the 131I-MIBG images. All of the lesions were detected with 123I-MIBG in a patient with pheochromocytoma, 3 patients with neuroblastoma and a patient with medullary thyroid cancer. Most of the normal adrenal glands (86%) were visualized on the 123I-MIBG scintigrams, in 7 patients without neural crest tumor and adrenal diseases, while 131I-MIBG scintigraphy failed to visualize normal adrenal glands in 2 hypertensive patients. The main reason for the superiority of 123I-MIBG to 131I-MIBG is considered to be as follows: 1) higher specific activity of 123I-MIBG. 2) the larger amount of 123I-MIBG used. 3) gamma ray energy of 123I is ideal for gamma camera. In conclusion, 123I-MIBG appears to be a more suitable imaging agent than 131I-MIBG in depicting neural crest tumors.Comments from the Editor-in-Chief.123I-MIBG scintigraphy and 18F-FDG PET in neuroblastoma.The purpose of this study was to compare the diagnostic utility of (123)I-metaiodobenzylguanidine ((123)I-MIBG) scintigraphy and (18)F-FDG PET in neuroblastoma.A total of 113 paired (123)I-MIBG and (18)F-FDG PET scans in 60 patients with neuroblastoma were retrospectively reviewed. Paired scans were acquired within 14 days of each other.For stage 1 and 2 neuroblastoma (13 scans, 10 patients), (18)F-FDG depicted more extensive primary or residual neuroblastoma in 9 of 13 scans. (123)I-MIBG and (18)F-FDG showed equal numbers of lesions in 1 of 13 scans, and 3 of 13 scan results were normal. For stage 3 neuroblastoma (15 scans, 10 patients), (123)I-MIBG depicted more extensive primary neuroblastoma or local or regional metastases in 5 of 15 scans. (18)F-FDG depicted more extensive primary neuroblastoma or local or regional metastases in 4 of 15 scans. (123)I-MIBG and (18)F-FDG were equal in 2 of 15 scans, and 4 of 15 scan results were normal. For stage 4 neuroblastoma (85 scans, 40 patients), (123)I-MIBG depicted more neuroblastoma sites in 44 of 85 scans. (18)F-FDG depicted more neuroblastoma sites in 11 of 85 scans. (123)I-MIBG and (18)F-FDG were equivalent or complementary in 13 of 85 scans, and 17 of 85 scan results were normal.(18)F-FDG is superior in depicting stage 1 and 2 neuroblastoma, although (123)I-MIBG may be needed to exclude higher-stage disease. (18)F-FDG also provides important information for patients with tumors that weakly accumulate (123)I-MIBG and at major decision points during therapy (i.e., before stem cell transplantation or before surgery). (18)F-FDG can also better delineate disease extent in the chest, abdomen, and pelvis. (123)I-MIBG is overall superior in the evaluation of stage 4 neuroblastoma, especially during initial chemotherapy, primarily because of the better detection of bone or marrow metastases.Comparison of diagnostic value of I-123 MIBG and high-dose I-131 MIBG scintigraphy including incremental value of SPECT/CT over planar image in patients with malignant pheochromocytoma/paraganglioma and neuroblastoma.to compare lesion detectability of I-123 MIBG scintigraphy with that of high-dose I-131 MIBG and to evaluate incremental benefit of SPECT/CT over planar image for the detection and localization of the lesions in patients with I-131 MIBG therapy for malignant pheochromocytoma/paraganglioma and neuroblastoma.we retrospectively investigated 16 patients with malignant pheochromocytoma/paraganglioma and neuroblastoma, who were referred for I-131 MIBG therapy. We investigated the lesion detectability in 10 pairs of I-123 and high-dose I-131 MIBG studies of the same patient, obtained within 2 weeks. In 31 studies of I-123 MIBG scintigraphy in 16 patients and 17 studies of high-dose I-131 MIBG scintigraphy in 12 patients, we compared planar and SPECT/CT images for the lesion detectability and localization.the number of lesions detected by I-123 MIBG planer image and SPECT/CT and high-dose planer I-131 MIBG and SPECT/CT were 3.0 and 3.7, 7.3 and 7.7 per study, respectively. SPECT/CT images provided additional diagnostic information over planar images in 25 studies (81%) of 12 patients (75%) in I-123 MIBG scintigraphy and in 9 studies (53%) of 9 patients (75%) in high-dose I-131 MIBG scintigraphy.post-therapy high-dose I-131 MIBG scintigraphy is superior to I-123 MIBG scintigraphy in lesion detectability even in comparison with I-123 MIBG SPECT/CT images and high-dose I-131 MIBG planar images in patients with malignant neuroendocrine tumors. SPECT/CT images are helpful for accurate identification of anatomic localization compared with planar images.Role of MR imaging and iodine 123 MIBG scintigraphy in staging of pediatric neuroblastoma.Comparison of MR and PET imaging for the evaluation of liver metastases.To compare the accuracy of fluoro-18-deoxyglucose positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) and dynamic-enhanced magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) scans in the diagnosis of liver metastatic lesions from colon and other sources.Thirty consecutive patients with known or suspected metastatic lesions were scanned by both MRI and PET. Histopathology and/or clinical outcome, including cross-sectional imaging follow up, were used as a gold standard.Of 30 patients, 16 were positive by pathology and/or clinical outcome and 14 were negative for liver metastases. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values on MRI were 85.7%, 100%, 100%, and 89%, respectively, compared to 71%, 93.7%, 90.9%, and 79% on FDG-PET. The difference between the two methods was not significant (X(2) = 0.2, P > 0.05).Our study showed no significant difference in detection of liver metastases using MRI or FDG-PET. However, MRI has advantages in spatial resolution and lesion characterization.Radioiodinated iodobenzylguanidines for diagnosis and therapy.Radiolabelled meta-iodobenzylguanidine has been one of the most successful of recent radiopharmaceuticals. In the short period of five years it has been shown to have high diagnostic sensitivity and specificity for many tumours of neuroectodermal origin. Furthermore its excellent concentration in many malignant tumours of this type offers a novel alternative treatment to those available at present.Single-photon emission computed tomography/computed tomography in endocrinology.The introduction of fusion of functional and anatomical imaging modalities into the field of endocrinology led to a major breakthrough in diagnosis, staging, and follow-up of patients with endocrine tumors. The management of endocrine tumors is based on a wide variety of conventional techniques, including computed tomography, ultrasound, or magnetic resonance imaging, and on scintigraphic functional techniques, associated with unique uptake and transport mechanisms and with the presence of high density of membrane receptors on some of these tumors. Anatomical modalities provide accurate detection and localization of morphological abnormalities, whereas nuclear medicine studies reflect the pathophysiological status of the disease process. Lack of structural delineation and relatively low contrast hamper the precise anatomical localization of the abnormal functional findings in the presence of potential concurrent foci related to the physiological biodistribution of the radiotracer or to processes unrelated to the evaluated disease entity. The notion that anatomical high-resolution and functional imaging data act as complementary methods led to various combination techniques of these modalities. However, coregistration of the functional and anatomical data after the acquisition of the 2 imaging modalities on separate machines, in different sessions, fails to provide accurate alignment of data, and the mathematical modeling is too cumbersome to be used on a routine basis. In contrast, hybrid imaging devices of single-photon emission computed tomography/computed tomography in a single gantry enable the sequential acquisition of the two modalities, with subsequent merging of data into a composite image display. These hybrid studies have led to a revolution in the field of imaging, providing clinically relevant information that is not apparent on separate images. The present review evaluates the contribution of the integrated single-photon emission computed tomography/computed tomography technology to image analysis and management of patients with endocrine tumors.The role of single-photon emission computed tomography and SPECT/computed tomography in oncologic imaging.Single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) and hybrid SPECT/computed tomography (SPECT/CT) cameras have emerged as a dominant technology providing invaluable tools in the diagnosis, staging, therapy planning, and treatment monitoring of multiple cancers over the past decade. In the same way that positron emission tomography (PET) benefited from the addition of CT, functional SPECT and anatomic CT data obtained as a single study have shown improvements in diagnostic imaging sensitivity and specificity by improving lesion conspicuity, reducing false positives, and clarifying indeterminate lesions. Furthermore, the anatomic imaging better localizes the functional data, which can be critical in surgical and therapy planning. As more disease-specific imaging agents become available, the role of SPECT/CT in the new paradigms of molecular imaging for personalized medicine will expand. Established and emerging uses of SPECT/CT in a wide variety of oncologic diseases, as well as radiation exposure issues, are reviewed.Utility of follow-up studies using meta-[123 I]iodobenzylguanidine scintigraphy for detecting recurrent neuroblastoma.Neuroblastomas sometimes recur after the initial disappearance of the tumour. We evaluated the utility of meta-[123I]iodobenzylguanidine (123I-MIBG) scintigraphy for the detection of recurrent neuroblastomas by comparing with the measurement of biochemical markers and clinical findings. Forty patients who had received treatment for neuroblastomas were included in the study. After the disappearance of the initial tumours, periodic measurements of urinary vanillyl mandelic acid, homovanillic acid and serum neuron specific enolase values, and an 123I-MIBG scintigraphy were performed. Whenever an abnormal finding was observed, other appropriate examinations and/or follow-up examinations were performed to elucidate the true state of the patient. Eleven recurrent episodes in eight patients were observed. Most of them occurred in the bone marrow or bone. Corresponding symptoms were observed in only two episodes; the other episodes were asymptomatic, and discovered by the periodic examinations. 123I-MIBG scintigrams visualized the recurrent tumours in 10 (91%) episodes. Elevated tumour markers were observed in only three episodes. 123I-MIBG scintigrams visualized most of the recurrent tumours, unless they were accompanied by any symptoms or elevations in biochemical tumour markers. Periodic examinations with 123I-MIBG scintigraphy appears to be a useful technique for the detection of the recurrences.Functional imaging in phaeochromocytoma and neuroblastoma with 68Ga-DOTA-Tyr 3-octreotide positron emission tomography and 123I-metaiodobenzylguanidine.(68)Ga-DOTA-Tyr(3)-octreotide positron emission tomography ((68)Ga-DOTA-TOC PET) has proven to be superior to (111)In-DTPA-D-Phe(1)-octreotide ((111)In-octreotide) planar scintigraphy and SPECT imaging in neuroendocrine tumours (NETs). Because of these promising results, we compared the accuracy of (123)I-metaiodobenzylguanidine ((123)I-MIBG) imaging with PET in the diagnosis and staging of metastatic phaeochromocytoma and neuroblastoma, referring to radiological imaging as reference standard.Three male and eight female patients (age range 3 to 68 years) with biochemically and histologically proven disease were included in this study. Three male and three female patients were suffering from phaeochromocytoma, and five female patients from neuroblastoma. Comparative evaluation included morphological imaging with CT or MRI, functional imaging with (68)Ga-DOTA-TOC PET and (123)I-MIBG imaging. Imaging results were analysed on a per-patient and on a per-lesion basis.On a per-patient basis, both (68)Ga-DOTA-TOC and (123)I-MIBG showed a sensitivity of 100%, when compared with anatomical imaging. In phaeochromocytoma patients, on a per-lesion basis, the sensitivity of (68)Ga-DOTA-TOC was 91.7% and that of (123)I-MIBG was 63.3%. In neuroblastoma patients, on a per-lesion basis, the sensitivity of (68)Ga-DOTA-TOC was 97.2% and that of (123)I-MIBG was 90.7%. Overall, in this patient cohort, (68)Ga-DOTA-TOC PET identified 257 lesions, anatomical imaging identified 216 lesions, and (123)I-MIBG identified only 184 lesions. In this patient group, the overall sensitivity of (68)Ga-DOTA-TOC PET on a lesion basis was 94.4% (McNemar p<0.0001) and that of (123)I-MIBG was 76.9% (McNemar p<0.0001).Our analysis in this relatively small patient cohort indicates that (68)Ga-DOTA-TOC PET may be superior to (123)I-MIBG gamma-scintigraphy and even to the reference CT/MRI technique in providing particularly valuable information for pretherapeutic staging of phaeochromocytoma and neuroblastoma.SPECT/CT.In view of the commercial success of integrated PET/CT scanners, there is an increasing interest in comparable SPECT/CT systems. SPECT in combination with CT enables a direct correlation of anatomic information and functional information, resulting in better localization and definition of scintigraphic findings. Besides anatomic referencing, the added value of CT coregistration is based on the attenuation correction capabilities of CT. The number of clinical studies is limited, but pilot studies have indicated a higher specificity and a significant reduction in indeterminate findings. The superiority of SPECT/CT over planar imaging or SPECT has been demonstrated in bone scintigraphy, somatostatin receptor scintigraphy, parathyroid scintigraphy, and adrenal gland scintigraphy. Also, rates of detection of sentinel nodes by biopsy can be increased with SPECT/CT. This review highlights recent technical developments in integrated SPECT/CT systems and summarizes the current literature on potential clinical uses and future directions for SPECT/CT in cardiac, neurologic, and oncologic applications.Re: Commentary by G.J. D'Angio to the article by S. Biasotti et al.Refining interpretation of MIBG scans in children.In pediatrics, the distribution of radioiodinated metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) has been studied primarily in neuroblastoma. However, normal patterns in children show a number of particularities and pitfalls related to the context of pediatric oncology which must be identified.We report on 28 equivocal scans in 24 children. In all cases, two experienced observers judged the scans to be equivocal and the definite interpretations were confirmed by follow-up.Difficulties in interpreting the scans were observed at the level of the thorax (15 patients), the abdomen (5 patients), the head (4 patients) or elsewhere (4 patients). The final interpretation of the scans was attributed to an unusual physiological pattern linked to age (9 patients), tumoral context (17 patients) or artifacts (2 patients).A number of important physiological areas of uptake in soft tissues can lead to false-positive interpretations of normal scans, such as the physiological upper thoracic uptake which has never been previously described. Numerous technical and physiological possibilities exist and those pitfalls must be ruled out. A precise knowledge of these technical difficulties and physiological variants can reduce the number of equivocal MIBG scans.[Diagnostic and therapeutic possibilities of meta-iodobenzylguanidine in neuroblastoma].MIBG is taken up preferentially by neuroblastoma cells. Owing to its high concentration in the neuroblastoma lesions, *I-MIBG scan is one of the most specific and effective tools in the diagnosis and staging of the disease. For most imaging purpose 123I-MIBG is the optimal agent. A rational approach 131I-MIBG has the potential for specifically delivering very large radiation doses to the malignant cells. The results obtained in more institutions are encouraging and this therapeutic modality should be included in the therapeutic strategy of neuroblastoma.Neuroblastoma: positron emission tomography with 2-[fluorine-18]-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose compared with metaiodobenzylguanidine scintigraphy.To assess the uptake in neuroblastoma of 2-[fluorine-18] -fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose (FDG) versus metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG).Seventeen patients with known or suspected neuroblastoma underwent FDG positron emission tomography (PET) (20 scans) and MIBG scintigraphy. Tumor uptake of FDG was quantified on positive PET scans.Tumor uptake of FDG was detected in 16 of 17 patients (18 of 20 scans). Neuroblastomas and their metastases avidly concentrated FDG prior to chemotherapy or radiation therapy. Uptake after therapy was variable. Uptake of FDG was intense in one patient with neuroblastoma that failed to accumulate MIBG. In 13 of the 20 scans, however, MIBG was rated superior to FDG for delineation of tumor compared with background and normal organs.Most neuroblastomas accumulate FDG. The mechanism of MIBG uptake is more intense prior to therapy. Concentration of FDG is not dependent on type 1 catecholamine uptake. FDG PET helps define the distribution of neuroblastomas that fail to concentrate MIBG.Evaluation of semi-quantitative scoring system for metaiodobenzylguanidine (mIBG) scans in patients with relapsed neuroblastoma.The purpose of this study was to determine the accuracy of two semi-quantitative scoring systems to assess response to (131)I-metaiodobenzylguanidine (mIBG) therapy in recurrent neuroblastoma.Diagnostic mIBG scan pairs (n = 57) were collected for patients who underwent (131)I-mIBG therapy for relapsed neuroblastoma. Two scoring systems were designated: Method 1, which divided the body into nine segments to view osteomedullary lesions with an additional tenth segment to assess soft tissue involvement; and Method 2, which divided the body into seven segments without a corresponding compartment for soft tissue involvement. Four nuclear medicine physicians independently assigned extension and intensity scores utilizing both methods, and separately recorded their impression of whether the post-therapy scan had improved, not changed, or worsened. Inter- and intra-observer concordance and correlation with overall response and progression-free survival (PFS) were performed.Method 1 produced the highest inter-observer concordance and was used to calculate the relative extension scores (post-therapy score divided by pre-therapy score), which correlated significantly with overall response. Patients who achieved complete response (CR) or partial response (PR) (n = 21) had lower relative extension scores, compared to those without response (P < 0.001). The readers' overall impression associated highly (P < 0.001) with the relative extension scores though results were less quantitative. Concordance was higher if initial scores were >5. Relative extension score did not predict PFS.Semi-quantitative scoring of mIBG scans provides a more reliable method of assessing response in patients with relapsed neuroblastoma than qualitative impression. The reproducibility and high inter-observer concordance makes mIBG score an important component of overall response criteria in patients with recurrent neuroblastoma.[Results of scintigraphy with m-[123I]iodobenzylguanidine in neuroblastoma in children].From 46 [123I]m IBG scans performed in 33 children, excellent specificity (96%) and good sensitivity (90%) appeared in the detection of neuroblastoma; less differentiated non catecholamine-excreting tumours remained undetected. As any localization to be seen was clearly visualized on the 24-h scan, the use of the [123I]m IBG (p, 5n) is recommended for the diagnosis, staging and follow-up of neuroblastoma in children.Positive MIBG scanning at the time of relapse in neuroblastoma which was MIBG negative at diagnosis.Positive MIBG scanning at the time of relapse in neuroblastoma which was MIBG negative at diagnosis.Has PET become an important clinical tool in paediatric imaging?New semi-quantitative 123I-MIBG estimation method compared with scoring system in follow-up of advanced neuroblastoma: utility of total MIBG retention ratio versus scoring method.The purpose of this study is to evaluate a new semi-quantitative estimation method using (123)I-MIBG retention ratio to assess response to chemotherapy for advanced neuroblastoma.Thirteen children with advanced neuroblastoma (International Neuroblastoma Risk Group Staging System: stage M) were examined for a total of 51 studies with (123)I-MIBG scintigraphy (before and during chemotherapy). We proposed a new semi-quantitative method using MIBG retention ratio (count obtained with delayed image/count obtained with early image with decay correction) to estimate MIBG accumulation. We analyzed total (123)I-MIBG retention ratio (TMRR: total body count obtained with delayed image/total body count obtained with early image with decay correction) and compared with a scoring method in terms of correlation with tumor markers.TMRR showed significantly higher correlations with urinary catecholamine metabolites before chemotherapy (VMA: r(2) = 0.45, P < 0.05, HVA: r(2) = 0.627, P < 0.01) than MIBG score (VMA: r(2) = 0.19, P = 0.082, HVA: r(2) = 0.25, P = 0.137). There were relatively good correlations between serial change of TMRR and those of urinary catecholamine metabolites (VMA: r(2) = 0.274, P < 0.001, HVA: r(2) = 0.448, P < 0.0001) compared with serial change of MIBG score and those of tumor markers (VMA: r(2) = 0.01, P = 0.537, HVA: 0.084, P = 0.697) during chemotherapy for advanced neuroblastoma.TMRR could be a useful semi-quantitative method for estimating early response to chemotherapy of advanced neuroblastoma because of its high correlation with urine catecholamine metabolites.Endocrine imaging: parathyroid, adrenal cortex and medulla, and other endocrine tumors. Part II.PET-CT scan in pediatric oncology: where, when, how and at what price?Use of 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography in patients with rare head and neck cancers.The clinical utility of (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) positron emission tomography (PET) has been demonstrated in major head and neck cancers (HNCs) but is unclear in rare HNCs. We therefore evaluated FDG PET in the management of patients with rare HNCs.FDG PET and CT/MRI scanning were performed at the initial staging and/or the follow-up in 24 patients with rare HNCs, 10 with melanoma, 9 with sarcoma, 3 with olfactory neuroblastomas, and 2 with basal cell carcinoma. The diagnostic accuracy of CT and FDG PET for detecting primary tumors and metastases were compared with a histopathologic reference. The association between the PET results and the clinicopathologic parameters predicting tumor invasion, histologic grade and disease-free survival (DFS), was assessed.The overall accuracies of FDG PET and CT/MRI were 92% and 79%, respectively, for detecting primary tumors and 91% and 74%, respectively, for nodal metastases, but the differences were not significant due to the small number of patients. The sensitivity and specificity of FDG PET for detecting distant metastases and second primary tumors were 100% and 87%, respectively. Follow-up FDG PET correctly diagnosed locoregional recurrence in all 12 patients, as shown by biopsy, and distant metastases in 6 patients. However, thickness of melanoma, histologic grade of sarcoma, and DFS were not associated with tumor FDG uptake.FDG PET may be useful for staging, posttreatment monitoring, and detection of distant metastases and second primary tumors in patients with rare HNCs.[Metaiodobenzylguanidine scintigraphy in the diagnosis and followup of neuroblastoma. Apropos of 16 cases].The aim of this study is to evaluate meta-iodo-benzyl-guanidine scintigraphy in the diagnosis and the management of neuroblastoma.betwen september 1999 and jun 2004, 16 children aging from 4 months to 6 years, with neuroblastoma, underwent mIBG scintigraphy in military hospital nuclear medicine department.23 mIBG scans were done. The exam was indicated for the initial staging in 7 cases, to evaluate chemotherapy or surgery in 12 cases and to seek for reccurences in 3 cases. The sensitivity of mIBG was 57% in the detection of the primary tumor, 100% for liver metastases and 67% for medullar involvement.mIBG scintigraphy should be a standard in the initial staging of neuroblastoma and in evaluating therapy response.Evaluation of catecholamine metabolites, mIBG scan, and bone marrow cytology as response markers in stage 4 neuroblastoma.The early biological response has been proved an excellent predictor in acute lymphoblastic leukemia and nephroblastoma. We asked whether catecholamine metabolites, mIBG scan, and bone marrow evaluation might be relevant response markers in disseminated neuroblastoma.Three hundred sixty-seven unselected stage 4 neuroblastoma patients treated according the German cooperative trial NB90 were entered into the study. Catecholamine plasma and urine levels were centrally determined by gas chromatography/ mass spectrometry. Bone marrow cytology and mIBG scans were evaluated by local investigators.At diagnosis, mIBG scan was positive in 306 patients (92%), borderline in seven patients (2%), and negative in 19 patients (6%). Bone marrow aspirates were cytologically positive in 292 patients (84%) and negative in 57 patients (16%). Plasma catecholamine levels were elevated in 79% (206 of 260 patients.), urinary levels in 91% (307 of 338 patients). The outcome of patients with normalized mIBG scan after four courses of chemotherapy [5 year EFS (event free survival) 0.22 +/- 0.07] was not superior to the outcome of patients with still abnormal uptake (5 year EFS 0.30 +/- 0.05). The event free survival of patients with still positive bone marrow aspirates after four courses (0.16 +/- 0.06) was inferior to the EFS of patients with negative bone marrow aspirates (0.26 +/- 0.04, P = 0.0054). Urinary catecholamine normalization after four cycles of chemotherapy (5 year EFS 0.35 +/- 0.06 versus 0.26 +/- 0.10) had no influence on outcome, whereas plasma catecholamine normalization after the first (5 year EFS 0.40 +/- 0.09 versus 0.14 +/- 0.07, P= 0.0364) or the fourth cycle (5 year EFS 0.35 +/- 0.06 versus 0.26 +/- 0.10, P = 0.0242) indicated a better outcome.These data show that serial plasma catecholamine levels and bone marrow aspirates in the course of the disease are useful tools in predicting outcome.123iodine meta-iodobenzylguanidine single photon emission computed tomography in the assessment of children with neuroblastoma.[The place of 99mTc-MDP skeletal scintigraphy in neuroblastoma. Is a new assessment necessary?].The present study compares the reliability of MIBG and MDP bone scans in detecting bone metastases of neuroblastoma. Out of 57 patients, 23 had both 99mTc-MDP and 123I/131I-MIBG scans within a 2-week period. In 10 patients at primary diagnosis there was an underestimation of skeletal involvement by MIBG in 1/5, in 13 patients at follow-up in 3/9; 99mTc-MDP scans were able to visualize skeletal involvement in all those cases. There was only one false positive MDP scan. These results suggest that MIBG alone may fail to visualize skeletal involvement of neuroblastoma and should therefore be complemented by additional 99mTc-MDP scintigraphy.Imaging neural crest tumours with 123I-metaiodobenzylguanidine and X-ray computed tomography: a comparative study.Iodine-123 metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) has been used as a diagnostic agent for imaging neural crest tumours. In a retrospective study of 27 patients, the role of 123I MIBG scintigraphy and X-ray computed tomography (CT) for detection of disease was compared. Both imaging techniques were accurate in the identification of these tumours. Iodine-123 MIBG was slightly more accurate in detecting metastatic disease. Computed tomography of tumours was useful in planning appropriate metastatic intervention. We suggest 123I MIBG should be the primary imaging procedure followed by CT in the investigation of these patients.[Bone marrow metastases of neuroblastoma: MRT in comparison with bone marrow cytology and mIBG scintigraphy].Thirteen MRT investigations of the knee region of nine children with neuroblastoma stage IV/III were performed in order to demonstrate bone-marrow metastases. The MRT-findings were correlated with bone-marrow cytology, immunofluorescence, and mIBG-scintigraphy. MRT showed a high sensitivity in demonstrating bone-marrow abnormalities, although bone-marrow aspiration and mIBG-scintigraphy will still be needed to make a specific diagnosis. On the other hand, signs of bone-marrow involvement in MRT investigations without positive findings in bone-marrow cytology and mIBG-scintigraphy may be the first evidence of bone-marrow metastases.Nuclear medicine imaging of the pediatric musculoskeletal system.Bone scintigraphy is a common pediatric nuclear medicine procedure and plays a significant role in the diagnosis of skeletal infection, trauma, and benign and malignant bone tumors. There is a complementary role for bone scintigraphy in the assessment of a child with suspected nonaccidental injury. High-quality images require careful attention to technique and positioning in children. Additional techniques such as magnification and single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) can be used for special indications and localization. Combined functional and anatomic imaging using SPECT/computed tomography (CT) imaging systems can improve diagnostic accuracy. Positron emission tomography (PET) using fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) is being applied with increasing frequency in the evaluation of children with malignancy. To interpret (18)F-FDG PET appropriately, it is essential to know the normal physiological distribution. Using combined (18)F-FDG PET/CT improves specificity and localization. This article reviews the common indications for bone scintigraphy and (18)F-FDG PET/CT in benign and malignant pediatric musculoskeletal disease.[123I-MIBG scintigraphy in patients with neuroblastoma].123I-meta-iodobenzylguanidine (123I-MIBG) scintigraphy was performed in 9 patients who were suspected to have a neuroblastoma. Positive images were obtained in 4 patients who had a neuroblastoma. Negative images were obtained in 5 patients who did not have a neuroblastoma. 123I-MIBG scan revealed an active tumor in a patient who had received intensive chemotherapy for the recurrence of neuroblastoma with returning of all tumor markers including neuron specific enolase to normal range. This indicated that 123I-MIBG scan can be used to assess the effect of therapy.Specificity of iodobenzylguanidine scanning in neuroblastoma.What is the prognostic value of osteomedullary uptake on MIBG scan in neuroblastoma patients under one year of age?Twenty-seven infants under one year of age with metastatic neuroblastoma were studied for osteomedullary metastases. They were evaluated by at least two imaging procedures: X-ray films and MIBG scan. Taking into account the results of these investigations, 3 groups were defined: osteomedullary metastases were detected in 8 infants by both X-ray and MIBG scan, no osteomedullary sites were detected by either technique in 13 patients, and 6 had osteomedullary foci with positive MIBG uptake but no radiological abnormality. These three groups were apparently different in terms of median age, response to chemotherapy, and long-term survival. The third group, which has not been previously described, appears to have a better prognosis than patients with radiologically detectable bone lesions. Nevertheless it was necessary to use intensive chemotherapy to obtain remission in these particular patients. It should be mandatory to specify the investigatory technique used to describe osteomedullary metastases in infants and treatment should be adapted according to this grouping system.Correlation of early metastatic response by 123I-metaiodobenzylguanidine scintigraphy with overall response and event-free survival in stage IV neuroblastoma.Metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG), specifically taken up in cells of sympathetic origin, provides a highly sensitive and specific indicator for the detection of metastases in neuroblastoma. The aim of this study was to correlate early response to therapy by MIBG scan, using a semiquantitative scoring method, with the end induction response and event-free survival (EFS) rate in stage IV neuroblastoma.Seventy-five children older than 1 year and with stage IV neuroblastoma had 123I-MIBG scans at diagnosis, after two and four cycles of induction therapy, and before autologous stem-cell transplantation. The scans were read by two independent observers (concordance > 95%) using a semiquantitative method. Absolute and relative (score divided by initial score) MIBG scores were then correlated with overall pretransplantation response, bone marrow response, and EFS.The pretransplantation response rate was 81%, and the 3-year EFS rate was 32%, similar to a concomitant group of 375 stage IV patients. The median relative MIBG scores after two, four, and six cycles were 0.5, 0.24, and 0.12, respectively. The probability of having a complete response or very good partial response before transplantation was significantly higher if the relative score after two cycles was < or = 0.5, or, if after four cycles, the relative score was < or = 0.24. Patients with a relative score of < or = 0.5 after two cycles or a score of < or = 0.24 after four cycles had an improved EFS rate (P =.053 and.045, respectively).Semiquantitative MIBG score early in therapy provides valuable prognostic information for overall response and EFS, which may be useful in tailoring treatment.Report on the Fifth International Symposium on Radiohalogens (Whistler, BC, Canada, September 11-15th, 2004).[Intracellular uptake and accumulation of metaiodobenzylguanidine in neuroblastoma cells and small cell carcinoma of the lung].Recently m-131-iodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) has been successfully used to image neurocrest-derived tumours such as neuroblastoma. In fact, our autoradiographic evidences demonstrate that MIBG is able to bind, accumulate and be released by neuroblastoma cell line CHP 100 "in vitro", as well as by surgical biopsies from tumours bearing children. Moreover, all the cell lines tested "in vitro" were able to bind MIBG: neuroblastoma (WNT, CHP-100, IMR-32), small cell lung carcinoma (LC-8) and melanoma (WMB). A fibrosarcoma line, despite that it is not neurocrest related, was also able to bind MIBG. However only WNT, CHP-100 and the LC-8 lines were able to accumulate and then release large amounts of MIBG in cytoplasmatic vesicles. The heterogeneity of MIBG uptake "in vitro" seems related to the similar variability observed in the clinical scintigraphies. This phenomenon may be related to the biochemical maturity of individual neuroblastoma tumours.Quantification of glucose utilization in liver metastases: parametric imaging of FDG uptake with PET.Positron emission tomography (PET) fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) studies are useful for identifying foci of increased FDG uptake in liver metastases, because of the high glycolytic rate of malignancies, as well as for monitoring changes in tumor glucose metabolism during treatment. We performed 15 kinetic PET FDG studies in four patients with metastatic liver disease. We produced parametric images of glucose metabolism in terms of the rate constant K (ml/min/g) for net phosphorylation of FDG. Tumor K values, estimated with nonlinear regression, correlated well with K values estimated with Patlak graphical analysis (r = 0.96), validating the assumption of low k4* values in liver metastases and supporting the use of pixel by pixel Patlak plot analysis of the data to generate parametric images. In normal liver, high levels of glucose-6-phosphatase produce much higher values of k4* than in liver metastases. Uncorrected Patlak graphical analysis underestimates K in normal liver, but this further increases the contrast between tumor and liver and facilitates both tumor detection and quantification. The technique is computationally feasible and is well suited for serial evaluations of tumor metabolism during treatment.Radiolabeled meta-iodobenzylguanidine: pharmacology and clinical studies.Much was known of the pharmacology of meta-iodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) before its clinical use, but we have since learned a good deal more about the metabolic distribution and fate of this radiopharmaceutical. And, as is the nature of science, more is yet to be discovered. This communication reviews what is known about the pharmacology of radiolabeled MIBG and how this pharmacology affects the clinical studies that use the agent.123I-MIBG scintigraphy and 18F-FDG PET in neuroblastoma.[A new imaging procedure for detecting endocrine tumors].Detection of unknown primary tumours and distant metastases in patients with cervical metastases: value of FDG-PET versus conventional modalities.In 1%-2% of head and neck oncology patients, the only symptom of a malignancy is a positive cervical node. The aim of this study was to compare the value of positron emission tomography using fluorine-18 fluoro-2-deoxy- D-glucose (FDG-PET) and conventional diagnostic modalities (CT and/or MRI, panendoscopy) in detecting unknown primary tumours and distant metastases in patients suffering from such a cervical metastasis. Fifty patients (37 men and 13 women) with cervical metastases of an unknown primary tumour were included. All patients underwent FDG-PET. In addition, CT and/or MRI was obtained and panendoscopy was performed. All clinically known metastases were detected by FDG-PET. The primary tumour could be diagnosed in 16 patients (four primary tumours were detected exclusively by FDG-PET). Seven patients had multiple distant metastases, that in six cases were detected exclusively by FDG-PET. The sensitivity and specificity of FDG-PET for detection of unknown primary tumours were 100% and 94%, respectively. For the conventional diagnostic modalities these values were 92% and 76%. FDG-PET had an exclusive effect on the applied therapy in 20% of the patients referred for diagnosis of an unknown primary tumour. The data obtained in this study strongly support the diagnostic strategy of performing FDG-PET in patients suffering from cervical metastases of an unknown primary tumour before any other diagnostic technique.Comparison of 18F-dopa PET/CT and 123I-MIBG scintigraphy in stage 3 and 4 neuroblastoma: a pilot study.(18)F-Dopa positron emission tomography (PET)/CT has proved a valuable tool for the assessment of neuroendocrine tumours. So far no data are available on (18)F-dopa utilization in neuroblastoma (NB). Our aim was to evaluate the role of (18)F-dopa PET/CT in NB and compare its diagnostic value with that of (123)I-metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) scintigraphy in patients affected by stage 3-4 NB.We prospectively evaluated 28 paired (123)I-MIBG and (18)F-dopa PET/CT scans in 19 patients: 4 at the time of the NB diagnosis and 15 when NB relapse was suspected. For both imaging modalities we performed a scan-based and a lesion-based analysis and calculated sensitivity, specificity and accuracy. The standard of reference was based on clinical, imaging and histological data.NB localizations were confirmed in 17 of 19 patients. (18)F-Dopa PET/CT and (123)I-MIBG scintigraphy properly detected disease in 16 (94%) and 11 (65%), respectively. On scan-based analysis, (18)F-dopa PET/CT showed a sensitivity and accuracy of 95 and 96%, respectively, while (123)I-MIBG scanning showed a sensitivity and accuracy of 68 and 64%, respectively (p < 0.05). No significant difference in terms of specificity was found. In 9 of 28 paired scans (32%) PET/CT results influenced the patient management. We identified 156 NB localizations, 141 of which were correctly detected by (18)F-dopa PET/CT and 88 by MIBG. On lesion-based analysis, (18)F-dopa PET/CT showed a sensitivity and accuracy of 90% whereas (123)I-MIBG scintigraphy showed a sensitivity and accuracy of 56 and 57%, respectively (p < 0.001). No significant difference in terms of specificity was found.In our NB population (18)F-dopa PET/CT displayed higher overall accuracy than (123)I-MIBG scintigraphy. Consequently, we suggest (18)F-dopa PET/CT as a new opportunity for NB assessment.123I-Metaiodobenzylguanidine uptake in the nape of the neck of children: likely visualization of brown adipose tissue.The distribution of radioiodinated metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) has been studied primarily in patients with neuroendocrine tumors-in pediatrics, particularly with neuroblastomas. Sometimes, symmetric accumulation in which no tumor is identified is seen in the nape-of-the-neck region. We estimated visually whether accumulation was found in the nape of the neck and studied the characteristics of the accumulation.Retrospectively, we investigated 266 (123)I-MIBG scintigraphic studies performed on pediatric patients who had been treated for neuroendocrine tumors or who were suspected of having such tumors.Accumulation in the nape of the neck was seen in 32 of 266 studies (12%); in none of these cases was the accumulation identified as a tumor by other imaging modalities or follow-up studies. In the same individuals, the accumulation varied and it was observed more often during winter.Symmetric (123)I-MIBG accumulations in the nape-of-the-neck region observed in children are thought to be related to the uptake in brown adipose tissue.Iodine-123-MIBG imaging of neuroblastoma: utility of SPECT and delayed imaging.Possible incremental diagnostic benefits of SPECT and delayed planar imaging with [123I]MIBG in neuroblastoma have not yet been fully established.Whole-body delayed planar [123I]MIBG imaging at 48 hr and SPECT imaging of the chest-abdomen or other suspected sites obtained at 24 hr were compared with routine planar imaging at 24 hr in 83 studies of 29 children with neuroblastoma. The sensitivity for each of the [123I]MIBG imaging methods was calculated on a study-by-study and on a lesion-by-lesion basis.Fifty-one planar imaging studies were performed in 20 patients with evidence of disease which was detected in 48 studies by 24-hr imaging (94.1% sensitivity) and in 44 studies by 48-hr imaging (86.3% sensitivity). On a lesion-by-lesion basis, sensitivity was 88.8% for the 24-hr scan, 86.7% for the 48-hr scan and 92.2% for a combination of the two (p = ns). Forty-three SPECT studies were performed in 20 patients with evidence of disease in the field of view of the SPECT camera. Disease was detected in 40 SPECT studies (93% sensitivity), in 38 planar scans at 24 hr (84.4% sensitivity) and in 37 planar scans at 48 hr (86.0% sensitivity). On a lesion-by-lesion basis, sensitivity was 83.6% for the 24-hr planar scan, 86.1% for the 48-hr planar scan, 88.2% for a combination of the two planar scans and 97.9% for SPECT (p < 0.001 compared with planar). The anatomic locations of tumors were clearer on SPECT in 15 studies.Delayed 48-hr planar scanning may occasionally depict more lesions than 24-hr imaging, but it may also miss lesions with rapid washout. SPECT imaging significantly increases the number of lesions detected and better defines anatomic location of tumors.Does a "false-negative" MIBG scan predict a better outcome in neuroblastoma patients?Nuclear medicine maintain its dynamic growth.Intertumoural variability in functional imaging within patients suffering from neuroendocrine tumours. An observational, cross-sectional study.(123)I mIBG (meta-iodobenzylguanidine) and (111)In pentetreotide scintigraphy imaging modalities are useful in demonstrating neuroendocrine tumours. Although (111)In pentetreotide is generally held to be a more superior imaging agent than (123)I mIBG for neuroendocrine tumours, we noted a differential uptake of the two agents by different tumour sites within individual patients. In some cases, the two tracers appeared to demonstrate different lesions within the same patient. The aim of this study wasto determine the positivity of the two imaging modalities, the degree of correlation between them and to highlight any clinically useful differences between the two modalities. (123)I mIBG and (111)In pentetreotide images of 149 consecutive, biopsy-proven or biochemically confirmed, neuroendocrine tumour patients were compared. All the patients underwent whole-body imaging and upper abdominal single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT). The results of both types of imaging were compared, lesion by lesion, for each individual patient. The overall positivity rate for (111)In pentetreotide was 79%, and that for (123)I mIBG was 63%. When both agents were positive, the (111)In pentetreotide highlighted more lesions within the same patient in 33%, whilst the (123)I mIBG highlighted more lesions in 13%. In 12% of patients both agents were positive, but different lesions were seen with the two agents. (111)In pentetreotide has greater positivity than (123)I mIBG for imaging neuroendocrine tumours. However, the two modalities can highlight different tumour lesions, suggesting the presence of phenotypically diverse tumour populations within individual patients. These findings are likely to influence clinical management in the future.FDG-PET screening for cerebral metastases in patients with suspected malignancy.2-(18)F-Fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose (FDG) positron emission tomography (PET) is increasingly being used in the evaluation of patients with malignancy. Recently, imaging protocols have incorporated ¿whole-body' views acquired over multiple steps. However, with this strategy, brain metastases can potentially go undetected. The aim of this study was to determine whether a supplementary 10-min brain 18F-FDG scan provides additional clinically useful information. Accordingly, we reviewed the studies of 273 patients with various malignancies in whom both whole-body and brain images were performed. Whole-body and regional attenuation-corrected 18F-FDG images were obtained approximately 60 min post-injection. A separate 10-min scan of the brain was subsequently performed. All studies were performed using a standard PET scanner with the images being interpreted by consensus of at least two experienced observers. Altogether, 119 studies were reported as normal (n = 96) or showing anatomic or normal variants (n = 23). Abnormalities involving extracranial organs were identified in 149 (55%) patients. Cerebral metastases were reported in 4 (1.5%) patients, only two of which (0.7%) were unsuspected prior to the PET scan. Incidental pathology (encephalopathy, infarct) was reported but unconfirmed in two further patients (0.7%). We conclude that routine ¿screening' for cerebral metastases in patients with suspected malignancy has a low yield and may not be clinically useful.Molecular imaging with positron emission tomography in paediatric oncology--FDG and beyond.PET/CT in paediatric oncology: indications and pitfalls.Extending positron emission tomography scan utility to high-risk neuroblastoma: fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography as sole imaging modality in follow-up of patients.Although positron emission tomography (PET) with fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose ((18)F-FDG) has a major impact on the treatment of adult cancer, the reported experience with extracranial tumors of childhood is limited. We describe a role for PET in patients with neuroblastoma (NB).In 51 patients with high-risk NB, 92 PET scans were part of a staging evaluation that included iodine-123 or iodine-131 metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) scan, bone scan, computed tomography (and/or magnetic resonance imaging), urine catecholamine measurements, and bone marrow (BM) examinations. The minimum number of tests sufficient to detect NB was determined.Of 40 patients who were not in complete remission, only 1 (2.5%) had NB that would have been missed had a staging evaluation been limited to PET and BM studies, and 13 (32.5%) had NB detected by PET but not by BM and urine tests. PET was equal or superior to MIBG scans for identifying NB in soft tissue and extracranial skeletal structures, for revealing small lesions, and for delineating the extent and localizing sites of disease. In 36 evaluations of 22 patients with NB in soft tissue, PET failed to identify only two long-standing MIBG-negative abdominal masses. PET and MIBG scans showed more skeletal lesions than bone scans, but the normally high physiologic brain uptake of FDG blocked PET visualization of cranial vault lesions. Similar to MIBG, FDG skeletal uptake was diffusely increased with extensive or progressing BM disease but faint or absent with minimal or nonprogressing BM disease.In the absence or after resolution of cranial vault lesions, and once the primary tumor is resected, PET and BM tests suffice for monitoring NB patients at high risk for progressive disease in soft tissue and bone/BM.Locating neuroblastoma in the opsoclonus-myoclonus syndrome.We examined the role of various medical imaging modalities, particularly metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) scintigraphy in the investigation of patients presenting with the opsoclonus-myoclonus syndrome (OMS) who may harbor neuroblastomas. A retrospective analysis was therefore performed of all patients presenting with OMS in a 5 1/2 year period. Between December, 1988 and May, 1994, all 13 patients (mean age 15.2 months, range 3 days-30 months) presenting with OMS were extensively studied. A wide range of medical imaging modalities including CT, MRI and [131I] or [123I]-metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) scintigraphy (total of 21 scans) were examined as a means of detecting a structural brain lesion or locating a neuroblastoma, a tumor generally found in less than half of patients with OMS. As anticipated a minority of patients (4) were eventually found to harbor neuroblastomas. In these four cases, two tumors were revealed on preoperative MIBG scintigraphy, one gave a false negative study and one tumor was not studied preoperatively. Each patient was also subjected to extensive radiological investigations in addition to MIBG scintigraphy, many of which were repetitive, redundant or had low clinical yield. The relative merits of the various procedures are compared, and an algorithm incorporating MIBG scintigraphy and limited central nervous system and abdominal anatomical modalities for the investigation of opsoclonus-myoclonus is suggested.False-positive MIBG scans with normal computed tomography imaging in patients with high-risk neuroblastoma.SPECT/CT in tumor imaging: technical aspects and clinical applications.Diagnostic imaging has gained a major role in the management of patients with cancer and has made a further step forward with the introduction of fusion techniques into the field. This technology provides hybrid images of two independent modalities, a functional scintigraphic technique and an anatomical procedure, yielding a superior imaging study. Scintigraphy is based on the use of single photon or positron emitting tracers providing a description of function or processes, whereas computed tomography (CT), ultrasound, or magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) depict the precise localization and type of morphological changes that have occurred in the lesions. Initial attempts to coregister the functional and anatomical information following acquisition of the two imaging modalities on separate machines, in different sessions, failed to disclose the proper alignment with precise coregistration, in particular for non-head studies, and were associated with patient preparation and mathematical modeling that were too cumbersome to be used on a routine basis. The recent introduction of a hybrid imaging device containing a low dose CT system and a gamma camera on a single gantry enabled the sequential acquisition of the two imaging modalities, with subsequent merging of data into a composite image display. These hybrid studies have led to a revolution in the field of imaging, with highly accurate localization of tumor sites, assessment of invasion into surrounding tissues, and characterization of their functional status.First experiences from Copenhagen with paediatric single photon emission computed tomography/computed tomography.This study evaluates the diagnostic value of single photon emission computed tomographic (SPECT)/multislice computed tomographic (MSCT) fusion images compared with planar scintigraphy in children.Fifteen children [eight girls, mean age 13 years (range 2-17 years)] who were examined in the SPECT/16-MSCT scanner at the Department of Clinical Physiology, Nuclear Medicine and PET, Rigshospitalet were included. The studies and clinical indications were eight Tc-hydroxymethane diphosphonate bone scintigraphies (three bone abnormalities, three osteomyelitis, two bone tumours), one bone scintigraphy combined with In-labelled leukocyte study (osteomyelitis), three I-meta-iodobenzylguanidine scintigraphies (neuroblastoma), three In-octreotide scintigraphies (two carcinoid tumours, one Langerhans cell histiocytosis) and one Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy (suspected renal transplant infarction). At the evaluation of the planar scans, the decision to perform a SPECT/16-MSCT scan was taken. A specialist in nuclear medicine read the SPECT scans and the CT scans were, if performed as high resolution or when in doubt, read by the specialist in radiology, followed by a simultaneous reading. We categorized the additional information gained from the SPECT/MSCT scan into three groups: (i) structural information gained from the CT scan, (ii) additional nuclear medicine information gained from the SPECT scan and (iii) information used for biopsy guidance. Use of a CT scan of diagnostic quality was only allowed (n = 1) after referral from the clinicians, and read in collaboration with the specialist in radiology.Fourteen of the 15 planar scans gained additional structural information from SPECT/CT. Twelve of 15 planar scans gained additional nuclear medicine information. Six studies gained specific information for biopsy guidance.SPECT/CT provided additional information in all cases. SPECT/CT in children seems to be a most valuable tool and it increases the certainty of the diagnostic work-up.[Diagnosis and therapy of neuroectodermal tumors].Computed tomography (CT) and 123I- or 131I-meta-iodo-benzyl-guanidine (MIBG) scintigraphy were compared for accuracy in tumor detection in 47 patients with neuroectodermal neoplasms. MIBG concentration was found in 12 of 13 pheochromocytomas, 12 of 12 neuroblastomas, 5 of 9 carcinoids, and 1 of 4 glomus tumors. MIBG uptake was not observed in medullary thyroid carcinomas, oat-cell carcinomas, Merkel tumors, 1 gastrinoma, and 2 unclassified neuroectodermal neoplasms. With regard to the different tumor manifestations, the sensitivity in detecting pheochromocytomas, neuroblastomas, and carcinoids was 87%, 77%, and 100% for CT, and 83%, 100% and 71% for MIBG scintigraphy, MIBG scintiscan was superior in the detection of small adrenal pheochromocytomas (less than 1 cm diameter) and in the depiction of small bone metastases and bone marrow infiltration from neuroblastoma. In all, 25 cycles of high-dose MIBG therapy were performed in eight patients with surgically incurable tumors (4 malignant pheochromocytomas, 1 neuroblastoma, 3 carcinoids). The total therapeutic activity applied was 3.55-43.29 GBq 131I-MIBG. Tumor kinetics of MIBG were investigated before and during treatment. One patient with metastatic pheochromocytoma has been in complete remission for a follow-up period of 36 months since completion of treatment, and another patient is in partial remission. Tumor reduction or no change was observed in four patients. Two patients died of non-concentrating recurrence and metastases.[Role of 123-I-metaiodobenzylguanidine imaging as a component in the diagnosis and treatment of neuroblastoma].Tomoscintigraphy with 123I-metaiodobenzylguanidine reveals function of tumor tissue. It may be used for both primary diagnosis of neuroblastoma, monitoring treatment efficiency and prognosis. Before single photon emission tomography using 123I-metaiodobenzylguanidine is undertaken, MRI by means of computed tomography should be carried out in abdominal area to ensure perfect blending of multimodal images.Evaluation of pulmonary lesions with FDG-PET. Comparison of findings in patients with and without a history of prior malignancy.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the accuracy of positron emission tomography (PET) using F-18 fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) in differentiating benign from malignant pulmonary lesions both in patients with and without a history of prior malignancy.Forty-eight consecutive patients with pulmonary lesions suspicious for malignancy underwent FDG-PET scanning. Group 1 included 27 patients without and group 2 included 21 patients with a history of malignancy. Pathologic proof of diagnosis was obtained for 32 patients and 16 patients were followed up clinically and radiographically for at least 6 month. The standard uptake ratio (SUR) and the lesion to background (L/B) ratio were determined in 45 patients.Vanderbilt University Medical Center.In group 1, the average SUR and L/B ratio for malignant lesions (n=14) were 8.9 +/- 4.9 and 20.6 +/- 14.2, respectively. For benign lesions (n=12), the average SUR was 3.3 +/- 3.2 and L/B ratio was 5.2 +/- 5.5. In group 2, the average SUR and L/B ratio for malignant lesions were not significantly different from group 1. Using either a SUR greater than 2.5 or L/B ratio greater than 5 as an cutoff level to differentiate benign and malignant lesions, the sensitivity and negative predictive value in both groups were 100%. There were five false-positive studies in group 1 and one in group 2, including tuberculosis (n=2), a granulomatous lesion (n=1), an inflammatory lesion (n=1), a schwannoma (n=1), and a fibrous mesothelioma (n=1). The overall accuracy was 88%, 81% in group 1, and 95% in group 2.FDG-PET can identify malignant pulmonary lesions both in patients without and with a history of prior malignancy with a high sensitivity and negative predictive value for lesions greater than 1 cm (100% in this study). High FDG uptake by some inflammatory processes and benign tumors may cause false-positive results. Semiquantitative evaluation using SUR or L/B ratio provides similar accuracy.Sensitivity of surveillance studies for detecting asymptomatic and unsuspected relapse of high-risk neuroblastoma.Relapse-free survival (RFS) is a powerful measure of treatment efficacy. We describe the sensitivity of standard surveillance studies for detecting relapse of neuroblastoma (NB).The patients were in complete/very good partial remission of high-risk NB; routine monitoring revealed asymptomatic and, therefore, unsuspected relapses in 113 patients, whereas 41 patients had symptoms prompting urgent evaluations. Assessments every 2 to 4 months included computed tomography, iodine-131-metaiodobenzylguanidine (131)I-MIBG; through November 1999) or iodine-123-metaiodobenzylguanidine ((123)I-MIBG) scan, urine catecholamines, and bone marrow (BM) histology. Bone scan was routine through 2002.(123)I-MIBG scan was the most reliable study for revealing unsuspected relapse; it had an 82% detection rate, which was superior to the rates with (131)I-MIBG scan (64%; P = .1), bone scan (36%; P < .001), and BM histology (34%; P < .001). Among asymptomatic patients, (123)I-MIBG scan was the sole positive study indicating relapse in 25 (27%) of 91 patients compared with one (4.5%) of 22 patients for (131)I-MIBG scan (P = .04) and 0% to 6% of patients for each of the other studies (P < .001). Patients whose monitoring included (123)I-MIBG scan were significantly less likely than patients monitored by (131)I-MIBG scan to have an extensive osteomedullary relapse and had a significantly longer survival from relapse (P < .001) and from diagnosis (P = .002). They also had significantly longer survival than patients with symptomatic relapses (P = .002).(123)I-MIBG scan is essential for valid estimation of the duration of RFS of patients with high-risk NB. Without monitoring that includes (123)I-MIBG scan, caution should be used when comparing RFS between institutions and protocols.Added value of SPECT/CT for correlation of MIBG scintigraphy and diagnostic CT in neuroblastoma and pheochromocytoma.In pheochromocytoma and neuroblastoma, pathologic findings on metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) scintigraphy (planar and SPECT) and on diagnostic CT are sometimes difficult to correlate. Furthermore, CT reading may be impaired by anatomic distortion after surgery or irradiation and if contrast agent is not injected. The present study evaluates the impact of SPECT/CT fusion images on correlation and image analysis of both techniques.Eleven patients, three adults (age range, 27-64 years) with pheochromocytoma and eight children (age range, 16-72 months) with neuroblastoma, underwent 15 (123)I-MIBG scintigraphy (whole body and SPECT/CT) and diagnostic CT during follow-up after treatment, with a time interval of 2 to 30 days (mean, 12 days) between MIBG scintigraphy and diagnostic CT. The diagnostic CT scans were read twice: blindly and with knowledge of the SPECT/CT findings. The scintigraphic and anatomic data were subsequently compared and were verified by clinical outcome.Of 15 imaging studies, there were nine cases of discordance between SPECT/CT and diagnostic CT, whereas concordant findings of planar MIBG and diagnostic CT were observed in six studies. Overall, SPECT/CT provided additional information in eight of the 15 cases (53%) and in eight of nine discordant studies (89%). In one case of pheochromocytoma in which anatomy was distorted by previous surgery and contrast agent was not injected, SPECT/CT findings guided the diagnostic CT that had initially misinterpreted the right adrenal gland as the inferior vena cava. In three of 11 studies performed for neuroblastoma, SPECT/CT facilitated the diagnostic CT reading: in one study, a small paravertebral thickening was overlooked at blind CT reading and in another case, SPECT/CT localized and characterized a soft-tissue mass medial to the iliac bone, which was missed on diagnostic CT in an area of difficult differential anatomy (bowel loops and eventual involved lymph nodes). In the third case, SPECT/CT directed the diagnostic CT to the MIBG abnormality after multiple surgical procedures. In these four cases, MIBG SPECT/CT allowed for localization of the pathologic site that was difficult to visualize on diagnostic CT. In four additional neuroblastoma studies in which a residual mass was present on diagnostic CT, planar MIBG scintigraphy was negative. SPECT/CT, focused on the area of the diagnostic CT abnormality, showed no focal MIBG uptake, thus increasing the diagnostic certainty of remission.In cases of equivocal diagnostic CT, SPECT/CT bridges the gap between MIBG scintigraphy and diagnostic CT, with guidance of the diagnostic CT and characterization of its findings. In this small series, MIBG SPECT/CT increased the diagnostic certainty in 89% of discordant studies.PET in pediatric diseases.FDG-PET is being increasingly applied to pediatric conditions, particularly in oncology. PET and PET/CT scanning in children are not currently supported by Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services unless the disease condition coincides with a reimbursed adult condition. The recent merger of the Children's Cancer Group and the Pediatric Oncology Group to form the Children's Oncology Group creates an opportunity to examine the use of FDG-PET in the management of childhood tumors in multi-institutional, cooperative efforts. The interest in incorporating PET imaging technology in pediatric medicine has been evidenced by several recent review articles summarizing the ongoing progress in this area. Future data will show that FDG-PET provides useful diagnostic information and can play a pivotal role in the clinical management and care of children with disease.Clinical usefulness of iodine-123-MIBG scintigraphy for patients with neuroblastoma detected by a mass screening survey.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the usefulness in a clinical setting of iodine-123-metaiodobenzylguanidine (123I-MIBG) scintigraphy, planar and single photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) images, in patients with neuroblastoma as detected by a mass screening survey.123I-MIBG planar whole body images, and regional SPECT images of patients with neuroblastoma in 51 studies were reviewed. They were all detected by a mass screening survey performed in the 6th month after birth using vanil mandelic acid (VMA), and homovanillic acid (HVA) and the neuroblastoma had been confirmed by surgery. Scintigraphy was performed 24 hours after injection of 111 MBq of 123I-MIBG. We assessed the accuracy of the planar whole body images in order to demonstrate the extent of the lesion and the correlation between the degree and extent of the lesions of 123I-MIBG accumulation and clinical staging with tumor markers, such as urinary VMA, urinary HVA, serum neuron specific enolase (NSE) and serum lactate dehydrogenase (LDH). Additionally, we evaluated SPECT how useful supplemental SPECT might be in a clinical setting as compared with planar whole body images.123I-MIBG planar whole body images revealed all 33 (100%) primary lesions, 4 of the 5 cases (80%) with liver metastasis, 3 of the 13 (23%) with lymph nodes metastasis and 1 of 3 (33%) with bone marrow infiltration. The extent and degree of accumulation correlated with the values of urinary VMA, urinary HVA and serum NSE. SPECT images helped to understand the positional relation in all cases and provided useful additional information for clinical staging in 7 cases.123I-MIBG scintigraphy with planar and SPECT images is useful for evaluating patients with neuroblastoma, following detection by a mass screening survey.Pediatric body applications of FDG PET.18F-PET-CT in extracranial paediatric oncology: when and for whom is it useful?Skeletal involvement in infants with neuroblastoma a quality control attempt.In 1994, French authors hypothesized that positive skeletal mlBG spots in infants with stage 4 neuroblastoma were not prognostically unfavorable unless associated to abnormal standard X-ray or CT findings. In 1999, the European Infant Neuroblastoma Study adopted this definition, indeed reducing the number of patients candidate to chemotherapy. Such an approach requires high quality scans and standardized procedures. The present study critically reviewed and assessed the quality of mlBG scans performed in Italian patients enrolled in the European Infant Neuroblastoma Study.Three independent nuclear medicine specialists reviewed scans of 25 Italian patients enrolled in Trials 99.2, 99.3, and 99.4 of the European Infant Neuroblastoma Study between January 2000 and September 2002. An arbitrary quality score was attributed to each mlBG scintigraphy, ranging from 1 (less than adequate) to 3 (excellent). One radiologist and 2 oncologists reviewed the X-rays and CT scans and correlated the results with clinical assessment.The quality of mlBG scans was rated from good to excellent in 15 of 25 cases, poor in 4, and inadequate for diagnostic evaluation in 6. X-rays confirmed the presence of metastases in 3 of 7 cases with mlBG bone uptake. CT scan confirmed skull metastases in 6 of 9 mlBG-positive cases. Discrepancies in scan interpretation, making trial and stage attribution questionable, were found in 2 patients and are discussed.The quality of mlBG scans proved to be at least acceptable in most Italian pediatric oncology centers. Efforts should be made to further standardize evaluation of the scans. Additional techniques (99mTc scintigraphy, MRI, SPECT) might be useful to help understand the most complex cases.PET/CT in paediatric oncology: clinical usefulness and dosimetric concerns.Dual-time-point FDG-PET/CT for the detection of hepatic metastases.To prove the sensitivity of dual-time-point imaging with 18F-flourodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography (18F-FDG-PET) of the liver to evaluate possible changes in the tumor-to-background ratio considering an improved detection rate of liver lesions.Image acquisition for the first whole-body scan started at a mean time point of 69 min (55-110 min). The mean time interval between the injection of 18F-FDG and the second delayed scan was 100 min (85-166 min).Of 90 proven liver metastases in 34 patients, the first scan detected 53 (59%) liver lesions correctly, whereas in the second, delayed scan 81 (90%) lesions were diagnosed correctly (p<0.001). The mean Standardized uptake values in the first and second delayed scan were 6.59 g/ml versus 8.09 g/ml, respectively (p<0.001). Tumor-to-background ratio of the first and second delayed scan were 2.0 and 2.7, respectively (p=0.04).Dual-time-point-imaging of the liver showed a significant increase of tumor-to-background ratio and hypermetabolic lesion diameter. Although, 30% of all verified liver lesions could only be detected in the second delayed scan 10% of all malignant liver lesions were missed with FDG-PET.Functional imaging in phaeochromocytoma and neuroblastoma with 68Ga-DOTA-Tyr3-octreotide positron emission tomography and 123I-metaiodobenzylguanidine: a clarification.Clinical impact and prognostic value of metaiodobenzylguanidine imaging in children with metastatic neuroblastoma.The clinical value of metaiodobenzylguanidine (mIBG) scintigraphy in patients with disseminated neuroblastoma (NB) at the time of diagnosis and after induction chemotherapy was evaluated.The medical records and imaging studies of 30 patients with stage 4 NB who underwent mIBG scintigraphy and 99mTc hydroxy methylene diphosphonate bone scintigraphy at the time of diagnosis were reviewed. Scores were calculated for the mIBG and bone scintigrams, and outcome according to the initial and follow-up imaging studies was determined.Discrepancies between bone scintigraphy and mIBG osteomedullary localization were seen in six patients. For the entire cohort, 2-year event-free survival did not significantly differ for the group of patients with initial mIBG or bone scintigraphy scores > or = 10 compared to those with scores < 10 (P = 0.23 and 0.61, respectively). However, for patients older than 1 year, a trend associating worse outcome with mIBG scores > or = 10 at diagnosis was seen (P = 0.08). A trend correlating abnormal mIBG scintigraphy after induction therapy and poor outcome was also observed (P = 0.09). Outcome did not correlate with the results of the bone scintigram studies performed after induction chemotherapy (P = 0.68).Because a discordance between mIBG and bone scintigraphy results were seen in a subset of stage 4 NB patients, both imaging studies should be performed at the time of diagnosis. mIBG imaging studies performed at the time of diagnosis and after induction chemotherapy may be of prognostic value, particularly in stage 4 patients older than 1 year.Skeletal assessment in neuroblastoma--the pitfalls of iodine-123-MIBG scans.This study was carried out to compare iodine-123 metaiodobenzylguanidine ([I123I]MIBG) and technetium-99m-methylene diphosphonate bone scans (99mTc-MDP) in the detection of skeletal involvement by neuroblastoma. Forty-four children with neuroblastoma underwent both [123I] MIBG and 99mTc-MDP scans within a 4-wk period; bone marrow examination also was performed; all these investigations were done both at diagnosis and at follow-up. At diagnosis, four children with Stage 4 disease had normal [123I]MIBG scans but abnormal 99mTc-MDP scans, while at follow-up there were four children with negative [123I]MIBG studies who later died from disseminated neuroblastoma. All eight scans are considered false-negative. In 24 children, the [123I]MIBG revealed more extensive disease with 161 positive sites while the 99mTc-MDP scan showed only 100 positive sites; 34 of these sites were common to both studies. This study shows that underassessment of skeletal involvement by neuroblastoma occurred using [123I]MIBG scans and that one cannot therefore substitute [123I]MIBG for 99mTc-MDP bone scans in the staging of neuroblastoma.False-negative metaiodobenzylguanidine scintigraphy at diagnosis of neuroblastoma.[Clinical applications of radio-labelled mIBG].[Follow-up evaluation of metastatic neuroblastoma using high dose [131I-meta]iodobenzylguanidine].Between 1989 and 1990 nine children with neuroblastoma stage IV (according to Evans) have been treated with high-dose [131I-meta]Iodobenzylguanidine (HD-mIBG). The total HD-mIBG dose administered to each child was at mean 699.3 +/- 111 MBq/kg body weight. Prior to (median 28 days) and after (median 50 days) HD-mIBG treatment a diagnostic scan with [123I-meta]Iodobenzylguanidine ([123I-m]IBG) was performed. Scans performed with HD-mIBG were superior to diagnostic scans for the detection of bone lesions in 8/9 children, for the detection of soft tissue lesions in 4/9 children, and for a more precise diagnosis of the primary tumor in 1 child. In 4 children lesions which were primarily identified in the therapeutic scan could be further observed in posttherapeutical examinations.¹²³I-MIBG scintigraphy/SPECT versus ¹⁸F-FDG PET in paediatric neuroblastoma.To analyse different uptake patterns in (123)I-MIBG scintigraphy/SPECT imaging and (18)F-FDG PET in paediatric neuroblastoma patients.We compared 23 (123)I-MIBG scintigraphy scans and 23 (18)F-FDG PET scans (mean interval 10 days) in 19 patients with a suspected neuroblastic tumour (16 neuroblastoma, 1 ganglioneuroblastoma, 1 ganglioneuroma and 1 opsomyoclonus syndrome). SPECT images of the abdomen or other tumour-affected regions were available in all patients. Indications for (18)F-FDG PET were a (123)I-MIBG-negative tumour, a discrepancy in (123)I-MIBG uptake compared to the morphological imaging or imaging results inconsistent with clinical findings. A lesion was found by (123)I-MIBG scintigraphy and/or (18)F-FDG PET and/or morphological imaging.A total of 58 suspicious lesions (mean lesion diameter 3.8 cm) were evaluated and 18 were confirmed by histology and 40 by clinical follow-up. The sensitivities of (123)I-MIBG scintigraphy and (18)F-FDG PET were 50% and 78% and the specificities were 75% and 92%, respectively. False-positive results (three (123)I-MIBG scintigraphy, one (18)F-FDG PET) were due to physiological uptake or posttherapy changes. False-negative results (23 (123)I-MIBG scintigraphy, 10 (18)F-FDG PET) were due to low uptake and small lesion size. Combined (123)I-MIBG scintigraphy/(18)F-FDG PET imaging showed the highest sensitivity of 85%. In 34 lesions the (123)I-MIBG scintigraphy and morphological imaging findings were discrepant. (18)F-FDG PET correctly identified 32 of the discrepant findings. Two bone/bone marrow metastases were missed by (18)F-FDG PET.(123)I-MIBG scintigraphy and (18)F-FDG PET showed noticeable differences in their uptake patterns. (18)F-FDG PET was more sensitive and specific for the detection of neuroblastoma lesions. Our findings suggest that a (18)F-FDG PET scan may be useful in the event of discrepant or inconclusive findings on (123)I-MIBG scintigraphy/SPECT and morphological imaging.18F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography predicts survival of patients with neuroendocrine tumors.(18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) is currently not used on a routine basis for imaging of neuroendocrine (NE) tumors. The aim of this study was to investigate the prognostic value of FDG-PET in patients with NE tumors.Ninety-eight prospectively enrolled patients with NE tumors underwent FDG-PET imaging. FDG uptake was quantified by maximal standardized uptake value (SUVmax). The prognostic value of FDG uptake, proliferation index, chromogranin A, and liver metastases were assessed.During the 1-year follow-up, 14 patients died. The diagnostic sensitivity of FDG-PET was 58% (n = 57) and a positive FDG-PET result was associated with a significantly higher risk of death with a hazard ratio (HR) of 10.3 [95% confidence interval (CI), 1.3-78.9]. Thirteen of the 57 (23%) FDG-PET-positive patients died compared with 1 of 41 (2%) FDG-PET-negative patients. By univariate analysis, a SUVmax of >9 and a high Ki67 index were significant predictors of overall survival with a HR of 8.8 (95% CI, 2.7-28.7) and a HR of 2.6 (95% CI, 1.3-5.1), respectively. In a multivariate analysis including a SUVmax of >3, Ki67, and chromogranin A, SUVmax of >3 was the only predictor of progression-free survival (HR, 8.4; P < 0.001).This study shows a strong prognostic value of FDG-PET for NE tumors, which exceeds the prognostic value of traditional markers such as Ki67, chromogranin A, and liver metastases. FDG-PET may obtain an important role for NE tumors.[The value of isotopic intraoperative location of various neuroblastomas].Value of FDG PET imaging in the management of patients with thyroid, neuroendocrine, and neural crest tumors.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the value and impact on management of FDG PET imaging in patients with biopsy-proved neuroendocrine and neural crest tumors, as well as thyroid carcinoma of various types.This is a retrospective review of imaging and clinical data of 60 consecutive patients presenting for evaluation of suspected recurrence who underwent FDG PET imaging between August 1993 and February 2002. All patients were referred for PET because of equivocal findings on conventional evaluation (most often increasing tumor markers and negative conventional workup) or for restaging. The final diagnosis was established with pathology (n = 19) or at least 6 months of follow-up (n = 41). The FDG images were acquired 1 hour after the intravenous administration of 10 mCi FDG with 1 of 2 dedicated PET tomographs (Siemens ECAT 933, CTI, Knoxville, TN; and GE Advance, General Electric Medical Systems, Milwaukee, WI).Thirty-four patients had recurrent disease and 26 had no evidence of recurrence. FDG PET imaging revealed at least as many focal abnormalities as concurrent CT, magnetic resonance, or other nuclear imaging modalities in 46 of 60 patients (77%). There were 17 patients (28%) in whom FDG PET found abnormalities not seen with other modalities. In the small group (n = 18) of cases of carcinoid, pheochromocytoma, Merkel cell tumor, and neuroblastoma, all cases were true positive (T+) or true negative (T-). In the group of 42 cases of thyroid carcinoma, the sensitivity was 67%. There were 16 T+, 18 T-, and 8 false-negative (F-) cases. Six F- cases presented with increasing thyroglobulin levels and negative whole-body I-131 scans. Four of these 6 F- cases were proved by surgery, 1 by a positive post I-131 therapy scan, and 1 by normalization of thyroglobulin levels after I-131 therapy. Two of the 8 F- PET cases had a positive I-131 scan. FDG PET imaging had an impact on the management of 13 of 60 of these patients (22%) by demonstrating extensive metastases and cancelling surgery (n = 2), and by detecting recurrence and guiding surgery (n = 5) or radiation therapy (n = 6).FDG PET is helpful in the evaluation of thyroid, neuroendocrine, and neural crest tumors. Although the sensitivity was only 76%, there were no false-positive findings, and FDG PET findings changed the management of 22% of the patients.A prospective comparison between magnetic resonance imaging, meta-iodobenzylguanidine scintigraphy and marrow histology/cytology in neuroblastoma.A prospective comparison between magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), 123I meta-iodobenzylguanidine (mIBG) scintigraphy and posterior iliac crest marrow aspiration and trephine biopsy in 30 assessments (19 patients) showed concordance between the three techniques in 16 assessments (53.3%). In 10 (33.3%), MRI and mIBG revealed abnormalities not detected by marrow biopsy. MRI was the only technique to demonstrate marrow abnormality in four assessments (13.3%). In addition, MRI revealed more sites of abnormality in 16 parallel assessments. We conclude that MRI shows promise as a non-invasive means of detecting bone marrow infiltration by neuroblastoma, but that further evaluation of the specificity of MRI in this setting is indicated.Follow-up in neuroblastoma: comparison of metaiodobenzylguanidine and a chimeric anti-GD2 antibody for detection of tumor relapse and therapy response.Early and correct diagnosis of local tumor recurrence, occurrence of metastases, and therapy response are essential in patients with neuroblastoma stage IV. The aim of the study was to evaluate the diagnostic value of metaiodobenzylguanidine (mIBG) and a chimeric GD2 antibody in the follow-up of patients with neuroblastoma. In a prospective study, mIBG (N = 31 scans) and immunoscintigraphy were compared with a chimeric antiganglioside antibody, ch14.18 (MAb) (N = 31 scans), labeled with technetium Tc 99m in the follow-up of 18 patients with stage IV neuroblastoma. The findings were compared with histologic findings, other imaging examinations, and clinical changes over the course of 4 to 6 years. For the diagnosis of local tumor recurrences, sensitivity was 80% for MAb and 70% for mIBG. Specificity was 93% for MAb and 72% for mIBG. The MAb was superior for the detection of skeletal metastases, with a sensitivity of 82% compared with 72% for mIBG. Specificity was 100% for both techniques. Also, for soft tissue/lymph node metastases, sensitivity for MAb was higher (50%) than for mIBG (31%). Specificity was 100% for each technique. In sequential studies, metastases were detected earlier with MAb (mean: 2.3 m for skeletal metastases, 3.6 m for soft tissue metastases) than with mIBG. After therapy, tumor uptake was visualized longer with mIBG (mean 6.3 m) than with MAb. The chimeric antibody ch14.18 is likely to be valuable for follow-up examinations and for assessment of therapy response because of earlier detection of new metastases.Immunoscintigraphic imaging of mIBG-negative metastases in neuroblastoma.We report a study of seven children with recurrent stage IV neuroblastoma comparing the uptake pattern of 123I-metaiodobenzylguanidine (mIBG) with 99mTc-labeled monoclonal antibody (MAb) BW 575 by the tumor lesions. Immunofluorescence studies of bone marrow had verified specific binding of the antibody to the tumor cells. The majority of tumor sites was detected both by mIBG and MAb scans. However, five of 26 lesions were not detected by mIBG and eight of 26 were false negative by immunoscintigraphy. The false negative lesions by mIBG belonged to five different patients (one of five primary, four of five bone marrow). In conclusion, MAb BW 575 may detect mIBG-negative neuroblastoma sites. The presence of antibody-negative sites suggests the utilization of both scintigraphy methods together.Local evaluation of abdominal neuroblastoma stage III and IV: use of US, CT, and 123 I-meta-iodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) scintigraphy.Exploiting the MIBG-avidity of neuroblastoma for staging and treatment.Analysis of adrenal masses by 18F-FDG positron emission tomography scanning.This study aimed to analyse the characteristics of adrenal masses visible in the computerised tomography (CT) scans which have been also evaluated by 2-[18F]fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose positron emission tomography (18F-FDG PET), and to characterise the features of 18F-FDG PET scans associated with various adrenal endocrine tumours, especially benign functional tumours. 18F-FDG PET scans of 105 patients with adrenal masses on the CT scan were analysed. Positive uptakes in the 18F-FDG PET scans were seen in 60 malignant tumours (54 metastasic lesions, six primary adrenal cancers) and seven benign tumours. The positive predictive value of 18F-FDG PET imaging to characterise an adrenal mass as a malignant tumour was 90%; the corresponding negative predictive value to rule out malignancy was also 90%. Benign adrenal tumours were smaller than that of malignant lesions (p<0.05). The mean standardised uptake value max (SUVmax) of the metastatic lesions [8.4+/-6.5 (microCi/g)/microCi/kg] was significantly higher than that of the benign adrenal tumours [2.4+/-1.2 (microCi/g)/microCi/kg, p<0.001]. Examination of only the primary adrenal lesions revealed that all adrenocortical carcinomas, two of three cases of pheochromocytomas, three of five neuroblastomas and two of four cases of primary aldosteronism showed positive 18F-FDG uptake. In conclusion, for patients presenting adrenal masses with a high probability of malignancy, 18F-FDG PET can be used to differentiate malignant from benign adrenal lesions. However, the 18F-FDG PET uptake did not show an always consistent pattern for endocrine tumours, which was probably due to the variability inherent in 18F-FDG uptake. This study suggests that 18F-FDG PET scanning can offer supporting data to localise and characterise adrenal tumours.Meta-iodobenzylguanidine in neuroblastoma: from diagnosis to therapy.Neoplasms in a pediatric population: 2-[F-18]-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose PET studies.To assess the uptake of 2-[fluorine-18]-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose (FDG) in common and uncommon tumors in children and to develop a method for performing positron emission tomography (PET) studies in children with malignant neoplasms.Twenty-two pediatric patients with known or suspected malignancies (27 scans) underwent FDG PET. Tumor uptake of FDG was measured on PET scans.Tumor uptake of FDG was detected in 17 of 21 patients with malignant disease. Neuroblastomas and their metastases (including those that did not absorb metaiodobenzylguanidine) intensely accumulated FDG. In a patient with Ewing sarcoma, FDG PET showed two foci of metastatic disease not evident on bone scans. In two patients, PET showed that large areas of the tumor were necrotic.FDG PET is feasible, is useful in the study of tumors in children, and may provide unique, clinically important information.Whole-body MR imaging with the use of parallel imaging for detection of skeletal metastases in pediatric patients with small-cell neoplasms: comparison with skeletal scintigraphy and FDG PET/CT.In pediatric patients with small-cell tumors, there is an increasing demand for accurate and early detection of skeletal, especially bone marrow, metastases as new treatment protocols are introduced. Whole-body MR imaging (WB-MR) and (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose PET/CT (FDG PET/CT) are new promising imaging methods that can detect metastases before osteoblastic host response occurs, which is the basis for detection of metastases by skeletal scintigraphy (SSC).To assess the ability of WB-MR to detect marrow metastases in children with small-cell neoplasms and compare its performance with that of FDG PET/CT and SSC.During a 16-month period, 26 children and adolescents with histopathologically proven small-cell neoplasms underwent WB-MR, FDG PET/CT and Tc-phosphonate-based SSC in a random order within a 25-day period. Metastases were localized in relation to eight regions of the body.WB-MR revealed metastases in 39 out of a total of 208 regions in 26 patients (sensitivity 97.5%, specificity 99.4%, positive predictive value 97.5%, negative predictive value 99.4%), SSC in 12 regions (sensitivity 30%, specificity 99.4%, PPV 92.3%, NPV 85.6%) and FDG PET/CT in 36 regions (sensitivity 90.0%, specificity 100%, PPV 100%, NPV 97.7%). Both WB-MR and FDG PET/CT showed excellent agreement (kappa) with the final diagnosis (96.9% and 93.6% respectively), whereas SSC showed only moderate agreement (39.6%).Our results suggest that WB-MR and FDG PET/CT studies are robust imaging modalities for screening for skeletal metastases, and are far more accurate than SSC. The lack of radiation is an additional advantage of WB-MR, especially in the pediatric population.Focal fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose-avid lesions without computed tomography correlate at whole-body positron emission tomography-computed tomography in oncology patients: how often are they malignant?To retrospectively evaluate the rate of malignancy of focal fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose (18F-FDG)-avid lesions without computed tomography (CT) correlate at whole-body positron emission tomography (PET)-CT in oncology patients, because better defining these abnormalities could potentially lead to improved patient management algorithms that rely on PET-CT for detection, staging, and treatment monitoring of malignancies.We performed a computer search of all PET-CT studies performed at our institution from 2006 to 2009, and identified 87 studies with findings of focal 18F-FDG-avid lesions without correlate at CT. The rate of malignancy of such lesions was determined by reviewing findings at follow-up imaging or by clinical or histopathological follow-up. Rates of malignancy were categorized and compared by lesion location and by the type of primary malignancy.The most common locations for focal 18F-FDG-avid lesions without CT correlate were: lymph node location (without visible lymph nodes; 27/87), bone (21/87), soft tissue (17/87), liver (9/87), and gastrointestinal tract (8/87). Forty-one percent (36/87) of the focal FDG-avid lesions without CT correlate were malignant (either metastatic disease or a second malignancy) at follow-up (mean follow-up: 5 months, range: 1-25 months). Focal FDG-avid lesions in lymph node location and in bone without CT correlate had higher rates of malignancy (56%, 15/27 and 52%, 11/21, respectively) than lesions in all other locations (26%, 10/39, P=0.028). In 15 of 87 cases, the only significant finding at PET-CT was an FDG-avid lesion without CT correlate. Of those, 53% (8/15) was positive for malignancy. There were no significant differences in the rates of malignancy for the focal FDG-avid lesions without CT correlate when stratified by the type of primary malignancy in this series.Focal FDG avid lesions without CT correlate were malignant in 41% of cases in our series of oncology patients. Lesions in lymph node location and in bones had the highest rates of malignancy. Knowledge of the patterns and risk of malignancy of focal FDG-avid lesions without CT correlate in oncology patients may facilitate the management of oncology patients with such lesions on PET-CT, and could lead to an improved interpretation of PET-CT scans by imaging specialists.123I-MIBG versus 18F-FDG: which is better, or which can be eliminated?Diagnostic imaging in abdominal neuroblastoma: is there a complementary role of MIBG-scintigraphy and ultrasonography?In a retrospective study we evaluated the agreement between the results of meta-iodo benzylguanidine (MIBG) scintigraphy and abdominal ultrasonography (US) in the diagnosis and follow up of neuroblastoma (NBL) with respect to the abdominal region. Data of 28 consecutive paediatric patients with NBL or suspected NBL were included (16 M/12 F, mean age 2.9 years, range 3 weeks-13.4 years). The results (as judged by the nuclear physician or radiologist, respectively) of 60 MIBG examinations (123I and 131I) including 26 single photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) and US, respectively, performed within a period of 14 days, could be evaluated. Full agreement was reached in 37 comparisons (62%), while partial and no agreement was found in 17 (28%), and 6 (10%) comparisons respectively. In 8 out of 37 comparisons with full agreement, 12 diagnosed lesions were histopathologically proven, while 11 comparisons with negative findings were also negative in other clinical modalities. US diagnosed correctly in 68% of the histopathological proven lesions, while this was 54% for MIBG scintigraphy. In approximately 50% of the MIBG scans in which SPECT was available, SPECT provided significant additional information.Congruent results of MIBG scintigraphy and ultrasonography in the detection of abdominal lesions in patients with suspected neuroblastoma indicate a high reliability in the diagnosis and localisation. Due to the favourable results of additional SPECT, it is advisable to perform SPECT routinely in this diagnosis.Cerebral uptake of MIBG: adrenoceptors visualized?Radiolabelled metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) localizes in adrenergic neurons. A study was carried out to evaluate the uptake of this radiopharmaceutical in cerebral tissues. Twenty-three patients with neural crest tumours, who had no evidence of central nervous system disease, were evaluated. Each patient underwent a diagnostic MIBG study, followed by a therapy dose with 131I-MIBG and subsequent scintigraphy. Focal uptake was seen in the cerebellum (CB), basal nuclei and thalamic region (BNTr), 24 and 48 h postinjection on the diagnostic images. The BNTr to cerebral cortex ratio ranged from 1.05 to 1.79. Uptake was also seen on the days 2, 3, 4 and 6 post-therapy images. Single photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) clearly outlined the uptake in the CB and BNTr. The BNTr to cerebral cortex ratio ranged from 1.10 to 1.85 and CB to cerebral cortex ratio from 1.18 to 2.01. It is hypothesized that the focal uptake observed in the CB and BNTr is due to adrenergic receptor binding. It is felt that SPECT with radiolabelled MIBG may prove to be a useful tracer for mapping the adrenergic receptors in the human brain.Comparison of In-111 pentetreotide, Tc-99m (V)DMSA and I-123 mlBG scintimaging in neural crest tumors.Three radiolabelled substances, 111In-pentetreotide, 99mTc-(V)DMSA and 123I-MIBG with different kinetics but similar tumor seeking behavior, were i.v. injected to assess and correlate their clinical value in metastatic malignant pheochromocytomas (4 patients), stage III and IV neuroblastomas (7 patients) and medullary thyroid carcinomas (6 patients). All II pheochromocytoma/neuroblastoma patients received i.v. a dose of III MBq (3 mCi) of 123I-MIBG and 185 MBq (5 mCi) of 111In-pentetreotide, within approximately weeks each other. Furthermore, in 4 of these patients as well as in all medullary thyroid carcinoma patients 111 MBq (3 mCi) of 99mTc-(V)DMSA were applied i.v. I week prior to the pentetreotide/mlBG scans. Four patients (malignant pheochromocytoma) with a total of 7 foci showing MIBG accumulation had 3 sites with pentetreotide and 1 site with (V)DMSA uptake, while in 7 patients (neuroblastora) with 15 foci showing MIBG accumulation 10 sites had detectable pentetreotide and 3 sites detectable (V)DMSA. Of the three radiotracers, 111In-pentetreotide used for somatostatin receptor identification holds promise mainly in cases where foci imaged with 123I-MIBG are negative. 111In-pentetreotide is unlikely to replace 123I-MIBG as a first-line routine diagnostic scintigraphic modality; compared to pentetreotide or MIBG, (V)DMSA seems to be highly sensitive only in medullary thyroid carcinomas.[Sensitivity and specificity of meta-iodobenzylguanidine (mIBG) scintigraphy in the evaluation of neuroblastoma: analysis of 115 cases].Seventy children (3.7 +/- 3.3 y) with definitely confirmed diagnosis of neuroblastoma had 115 whole body scans carried out 24 h after injection of 3.7 MBq/kg of I-123 mIBG (83 scans) or 0.7 MBq/kg of I-131 mIBG (17 scans) or 0.9 to 4.5 GBq of I-131 mIBG (15 post-therapeutic scans). The scans were interpreted as positive in the presence of any non-physiological uptake area or of any bone uptake of the tracer, even at the level of the metaphyseal complex. For the primary tumour, the sensitivity of mIBG scans was 73%. Ten false negative patients had an overlap of the tumour with the bladder or heart images (4 cases) or with positive metastatic images (6 cases: liver, spine). Three false negative patients had neuroblastomas which did not secrete catecholamines. The specificity of mIBG was 94%. In our opinion, mIBG scans have a complementary role to assess the activity of post-therapeutic remnants. For the detection of hepatic and lymph node metastases, the sensitivity was about 50% and the specificity was 100%. The standard used for the detection of bone marrow metastases was the cytological and histological examination of 10 bone marrow aspirations and one or more biopsies (CHBMS). The sensitivity of mIBG scans was 90% and the specificity 68%. However, reviewing the data from the 16 false positive scans, we found 11 definitely proven bone metastases, 3 biological relapses and 2 cases of delayed abnormal CHBMS supporting the positivity of the mIBG scans, raising the specificity to 100%. Tc-99m diphosphonate bone scans had a sensitivity of 78% and a specificity of 51%. We suggest that positive mIBG scans may save other procedures since our data do not support false positive detection of bone or bone marrow metastases. In contrast, patients with negative mIBG findings should be further explored.[Evaluation of adrenal medullary function with scintigraphy].MIBG detection of hepatic neuroblastoma: correlation with CT, US and surgical findings.Metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) imaging is used in the diagnosis, staging and follow-up of virtually every case of neuroblastoma seen at our institution. Normal sites of MIBG uptake include the liver and therefore difficulties have been predicted and encountered in the diagnosis of hepatic neuroblastoma due to inability to separate abnormally increased tracer deposition from normal hepatic activity. We reviewed every MIBG (I123 and I131) study performed at our pediatric hospital over a 4 year period encompassing 88 patients, 67 of whom had biopsy proven neuroblastoma. Hepatic findings onMIBG studies were compared with concurrent abdominal CT and US studies in all 67 patients. The clinical records of all patients with abnormal MIBG scans or abnormal CT or US studies of the liver were also reviewed. Eight patients were found to have abnormal liver findings on one or more imaging studies (MIBG, CT, or US). There were 3 true positive MIBG studies, one of which was an early study in a patient who later went on to have one of the false positive studies. Two patients had false positive MIBG scans for liver neuroblastoma. MIBG failed to detect liver involvement in 4 patients.[Incidentally discovered adrenal tumors. Apropos of 20 cases].According to Glazer, the term of incidentaloma describes an adrenal tumor discovered incidentally during acomputed tomographyscan and by extension to all masses discovered whatever the imaging process. Twenty patients have been operated during the last 10 years. The discovering circumstances are not specific, except the ecography and CT Scan. Complementary examinations include biological tests aiming at showing a possible hormonal secretion and more specific examinations MIBG scintygraphy and magnetic resonance imaging. The tumors often large (80% more than 5 cm long) and solid (75%) have all been removed by transperitoneal approach (13) or lombotomy. Post operative course was approach unevertful. The histological study showed 6 metastasis, 5 benign kystic lesions, 3 hematomas, 3 adenomas, 2 adrenalcortical carcinoma and 1 ganglioneuroma. A review of the literature series leads us to evaluate the frequency and risk of incidentalomas and to consider the necessary examination and the strategy to be adopted in front of such lesions. The evaluation of hormone status, the recourse to specific imaging seems necessary whereas the guided needle biopsy does not present any risk and should be reserved for very special cases. A decisional scheme is proposed, which ains at removing all voluminous and/or secreting tumors. Small lesions behind 35 mm will have to be examined closely and will be removed if they grow larger or persist.[Indications for MIBG scintigraphy in the diagnosis of neuroblastoma].The significance and indications of MIBG scintigraphy are critically assessed. The results are compared with the results of whole-body bone scintigraphy, computed tomography (CT) and magnetic resonance tomography (MRT), and are related to values of catecholamine metabolites in 24-h urines. In our patients (10 histologically proven cases) MIBG scintigraphy turned out to be most useful in tumor follow-up. In contrast, the significance was much lower in primary tumor diagnosis and tumor staging as the exact primary diagnosis was established by other means such as CT, MRT, MDP whole-body scan, urine chemistry and bone marrow biopsy in all cases. MIBG scintigraphy in diagnostic imaging of neuroblastoma is an additive diagnostic tool and is called for in (1) tumour follow-up (progress, recurrencies, metastases); (2) primary diagnosis if the primary tumour has not been localized by means of CT or MRT; and (3) tumour staging to differentiate stage IV disease from lower stages as long as stage IV disease has not been established by bone-marrow biopsy or MDP whole-body scan.123I-IMT SPET: introducing another research tool into clinical neuro-oncology?Can MIBG scan replace the need for bone marrow assessment at diagnosis and reassessment in stage 4 neuroblastomas?Complete staging (extensive marrow investigation and meta-iodo benzylguanine (MIBG) scan) is considered as mandatory both at diagnosis and after chemotherapy for assessment of metastases in neuroblastomas. However the correlation between bone marrow invasion and uptake of MIBG at metastatic sites remains unclear. This study investigates whether MIBG alone is sufficiently sensitive to make these procedures redundant.20 children over one year of age, with histologically proven metastatic neuroblastoma were studied. Extensive bone marrow assessment and MIBG bone scan performed both at diagnosis and after completion of induction chemotherapy were reviewed.At diagnosis metastases were detected by marrow investigation alone in 2, MIBG alone in 2 and both procedures in 16. After induction chemotherapy metastases were detected by only marrow investigation in 2, by only MIBG in 3, by both procedures in 6 patients, and by none in 9.Whether marrow investigations and MIBG scan explore the same phenomenon remains unclear. However it appears that marrow disease that is histologically detectable may remain MIBG negative both at diagnosis and after treatment. Both procedures are still justified at time of diagnosis and evaluation of response.[Scintigraphic imaging of benign and malignant tumors of the sympathetic nervous system with meta-iodobenzylguanidine].The authors report on their experiences with metaiodine-benzylguanidine (MIBG) scintiscanning in a total of 36 patients. 7 of these patients had a benign pheochromocytoma, 4 a malignant one; neuroblastoma was seen in 10 patients. Scintiscan diagnosis was supplemented by measurements of irradiation exposure and attainable tumour dose. It was also shown that it is possible to mark neuroblastoma cells in cultures. The results of these studies are discussed and compared with those of other working groups. If the physiological pattern of distribution is taken into consideration, and if the proper imaging technique is adopted, MIBG scintiscan is a sensitive and highly specific method in diagnosing pheochromocytomas and neuroblastomas.Usefulness of whole body FDG18 PET-CT imaging in comprehensive oncologic management--initial experience.Retrospective analysis of outcome with PET-CT imaging used for various clinical situations.Whole body PET-CT scan of 29 patients was evaluated. In first group, PET-CT was used for response evaluation after curative radio-chemotherapy. In second group, PET-CT was used as an additional diagnostic tool. In third group, PET-CT was used for delineating target volume. For first and second group, uptake was recorded with respect to primary, regional and distant site of involvement and confirmed through PET-CT guided biopsies whenever required. For third group, hypermetabolic volume delineated on PET image was compared with gross target volume delineated on CT image.In first group, 50 % (6/12) of the patients had distant systemic disease, 33% (4/12) had residual regional disease and 58% (7/12) had residual/recurrent local disease. In second group, 30% (3/10) patients had distant systemic disease on PET-CT where CT was inconclusive. 25% (4/10) had variable extent of disease involvement on PET-CT that changed the technique of radiotherapy treatment. In 20% (2/10) patients, PET-CT changed the sequence of treatment. In third group (n = 7), PET delineated volume was significantly higher (10-50%) than CT delineated volume for local site but for regional targets the difference was <10%.With the initial use of FDG18 PET-CT imaging, we realized that rate of distant metastasis is much higher which usually remain unnoticed because of conventional approach of investigation. PET-CT imaging has potential to improve the method of conventional IMRT planning.After bench to bedside: the impact of disease progression, commercial opportunities and available instrumentation on clinical outcome.Adrenal scintigraphy.Evaluation of optimal acquisition duration or injected activity for pediatric 18F-FDG PET/CT.Pediatric (18)F-FDG dosing and acquisition durations are generally based on coarse extrapolation from adult guidelines. This study sought to determine whether shorter acquisition durations or a lower (18)F-FDG injected activity could be used for pediatric (18)F-FDG PET/CT examinations while maintaining diagnostic utility. Reduction of overall scan time potentially reduces motion artifacts, improves patient comfort, and decreases length of sedation. Alternatively, decreased (18)F-FDG dose minimizes radiation risk.Fourteen whole-body (18)F-FDG PET/CT examinations were performed on 13 patients (weight, 13-109 kg; age range, 1-23 y) with a weight-based injected activity (5.3 MBq/kg [0.144 mCi/kg]), fixed acquisition durations (3 min/field of view [FOV] if < 22 kg, 5 min/FOV if > 22 kg), and list-mode acquisition. For each examination, the list-mode data were truncated to form multiple datasets with shorter acquisition durations down to a minimum of 1 min/FOV (i.e., 1, 2, 3, 4, and 5 min/FOV data were formed from single 5 min/FOV acquisition). Fifty-six image volumes were generated, randomized, and reviewed in a masked manner with corresponding CT image volumes by 5 radiologists. Overall, subjective adequacy and objective lesion detection accuracy by body region were evaluated.All examinations with maximum acquisition duration were graded as adequate and were used as the reference standard for detection accuracy. For patients less than 22 kg, 1 of the 3 PET/CT examinations was graded as inadequate for clinical tasks when acquisition duration was reduced to 2 min/FOV, and all examinations were graded as inadequate when reduced to 1 min/FOV. For patients more than 22 kg, all 3-5 min/FOV studies were graded as adequate, and 2 of the 9 studies were graded as inadequate for 2 min/FOV studies. Lesion detection accuracy was perfect for acquisition times between 3 min/FOV and 5 min/FOV for all regions of the body. However, lesion detection became less accurate when imaging acquisition time was reduced more than 40%.Evaluation of image volumes generated from simulated shorter acquisition durations suggests that imaging times for larger patients (>22 kg) can be reduced from 5 min/FOV to 3 min/FOV without a loss of diagnostic utility. Using decreased acquisition times as a surrogate for (18)F-FDG dose, (18)F-FDG dose can be reduced by approximately 40% when all patients were scanned for 5 min/FOV.[123I]MIBG scintigraphy in neuroblastoma: a comparison between planar and SPECT imaging.The aim of the present study was to assess the utility of SPECT imaging with [123I]MIBG in patients with neuroblastoma (NB). Twenty-two children were studied (11 males and 11 females: age range: newborn to 11 years). A total of 39 studies were performed in different clinical phases. Both planar (at 24 and occasionally 48 hours) and SPECT (at 24 hours) imaging were performed in all cases. Planar studies gave a sensitivity of 87.5% (evidence of the disease in 21 of 24 studies performed in children with known NB lesions) and a specificity of 93.3% (true negative results in 14 of 15 studies performed in disease-free patients). In the same patients SPECT gave a sensitivity of 95.8% (23 of 24 positive studies and a specificity equal to that of planar scanning. In 5 of 21 studies positive at planar scanning SPECT showed 9 additional lesions. In conclusion, [123I]MIBG SPECT imaging compared to planar scanning can demonstrate a greater number of lesions. Its use seems to be indicated mainly in cases in which diagnostic assessment is difficult, such as small residual tumors or in the follow up of children no longer in therapy, in whom it can lead to an early diagnosis of relapse.Specificity of radioiodinated MIBG for neural crest tumors in childhood.The high sensitivity of metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) scintigraphy for sympathomedullary tumors such as neuroblastoma and pheochromocytoma is well documented. The specificity of MIBG scintigraphy for these tumors is also high but has been incompletely characterized for other neural crest tumors and non-neural crest tumors of childhood.The medical records and MIBG scans of all children who had undergone MIBG scintigraphy for known or suspected neuroblastoma or pheochromocytoma were retrospectively reviewed at five major referral centers. Those patients found to have pathologies other than neuroblastoma or pheochromocytoma form the basis of this study.One hundred children with a total of 110 lesions met the inclusion criteria. All had negative MIBG scans except 1 of 2 children with infantile myofibromatosis, 1 of 2 with neuroendocrine carcinomas, 1 of 2 with pancreaticoblastomas and 1 of 10 with primitive neuroectodermal tumors.MIBG scintigraphy is highly specific for neuroblastoma and pheochromocytoma. Only 4% (4/100) of nonsympathomedullary tumors (non-pheochromocytoma and non-neuroblastoma) in childhood showed MIBG uptake, of which only 2% (2/100) were of non-neural crest origin.Imaging of abdominal neuroblastoma in children.The aims of the study were: 1) to assess the efficacy of different imaging methods for use prior to treatment; 2) to compare the surgico-histopathologically-based International Neuroblastoma Staging System (INSS) staging with the imaging results; and 3) to suggest a localisation scheme for abdominal neuroblastoma.Thirty-one children with an abdominal neuroblastoma (median age 2 years), underwent abdominal US, CT of chest and abdomen, MR imaging of abdomen and spine, chest radiography, skeletal survey, radionuclide bone scintigraphy, MIBG scintigraphy, and bone marrow biopsy.In the evaluation of local disease, CT and MR were superior to US. There was no significant difference between CT and MR in assessment of the location or size of the tumour. Evaluation of invasive growth and lymphadenopathy was uncertain irrespective of imaging modality. Intraspinal extension was more distinctly demonstrated with MR. Tissue characterization with CT and MR did not contribute in the assessment of the tumours. Contrast enhancement at CT and MR examinations both improved demarcation between tumour and kidney, and was a necessity for evaluation of vessel encasement with CT. The local disease was best assessed by either CT or MR, while metastatic disease was best revealed by CT, MR, scintigraphy or bone marrow biopsy.Imaging may be a valuable basis for clinical assessment and pretreatment staging of abdominal neuroblastoma.Utility of thallium-201 and iodine-123 metaiodobenzylguanidine in the scintigraphic detection of neuroendocrine neoplasia.Metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) is a specific marker for neuroendocrine tumours, such as phaeochromocytoma, neuroblastoma, medullary thyroid cancer (MTC) and paraganglioma, but it suffers in some cases (especially in MTC) from a lack of sensitivity. Thallium is a well-known marker of cellularity with a great sensitivity and a lack of specificity. In order to determine whether the association of these two markers is able to improve the detection of neuroendocrine lesions, 137 scintigraphic examinations using MIBG and thallium were performed in 101 patients referred for suspicion or follow-up of neuroendocrine tumours. Thallium chloride was first injected (1 MBq/kg), images being acquired about 20 min after injection; 123I-MIBG (4 MBq/kg) was then injected and images acquired 5 and 24 h later. In patients with phaeochromocytoma or neuroblastoma, thallium scintigraphy appeared of little help since no tumoural site was discovered by thallium accumulation alone. In contrast, thallium examination seemed of interest in the detection of paraganglioma and MTC, the association of the two radiopharmaceuticals increasing the number of detected sites.Contributions of nuclear endocrinology to the diagnosis of adrenal tumors.Whole-body PET/CT with 11C-meta-hydroxyephedrine in tumors of the sympathetic nervous system: feasibility study and comparison with 123I-MIBG SPECT/CT.The 11C-labeled tracer meta-hydroxyephedrine (11C-HED) is a noradrenaline analog that was developed to visualize the sympathetic nervous system with PET. Initial clinical studies show a rapid uptake of 11C-HED in localized tumors of this system. Whole-body imaging with 11C-HED PET is now possible as PET/CT scanners allow a rather short examination time. The aim of this study was to evaluate the feasibility of whole-body 11C-HED PET/CT for examination of tumors of the sympathetic nervous system and to directly compare the results with 123I-labeled meta-iodobenzylguanidine (123I-MIBG) scintigraphy, including SPECT/CT.In 19 consecutive patients, 9 mo to 68 y old (median, 32 y), 24 whole-body 11C-HED PET/CT (low-dose CT) examinations were performed. Scans were compared with attenuation-corrected 123I-MIBG SPECT/CT scans (24-h scan, low-dose CT). The intensity of tracer accumulation above background was visually analyzed in both scans, PET and SPECT, using a 4-value scale. In 11C-HED PET, mean and maximum standardized uptake values were determined for all lesions.In 14 patients with 19 pairs of examinations, the following tumors were confirmed histologically: 6 neuroblastomas, 5 pheochromocytomas, 1 ganglioneuroblastoma, and 2 paragangliomas. In 5 patients, each having 1 pair of examinations, clinical follow-up and/or histologic examination did not reveal any tumor deriving from the sympathetic nervous system. 11C-HED PET/CT detected 80 of 81 totally depicted tumor lesions (sensitivity, 0.99; soft tissue, 61; bone, 19). 123I-MIBG SPECT/CT detected 75 of 81 lesions (sensitivity, 0.93; soft tissue, 56; bone, 19). With both methods, there were no false-positive lesions. The tumor-to-background contrast of 11C-HED uptake was higher in comparison with 123I-MIBG uptake in 26 lesions (0.32; soft tissue, 18; bone, 8), equal in 39 lesions (0.48; soft tissue, 30; bone, 9), and lower than 123I-MIBG uptake in 16 lesions (0.20; soft tissue, 14; bone, 2).Whole-body imaging using 11C-HED PET/CT is feasible in the clinical setting of patients with tumors of the sympathetic nervous system. 11C-HED PET/CT detected more tumor lesions than 123I-MIBG SPECT/CT. However, tumor-to-background contrast of 11C-HED in lesions can be higher, equal, or lower compared with 123I-MIBG.Paraneoplastic syndromes of the CNS.Major advances in the management of paraneoplastic neurologic disorders (PND) include the detection of new antineuronal antibodies, the improved characterisation of known syndromes, the discovery of new syndromes, and the use of CT and PET to reveal the associated tumours at an early stage. In addition, the definition of useful clinical criteria has facilitated the early recognition and treatment of these disorders. In this article, we review some classic concepts about PND and recent clinical and immunological developments, focusing on paraneoplastic cerebellar degeneration, opsoclonus-myoclonus, and encephalitides affecting the limbic system.Value of MRI and MIBG-I123 scintigraphy in the diagnosis of spinal bone marrow involvement in neuroblastoma in children.The results of MRI and MIBG scintigraphy performed on the spine of 14 children with neuroblastoma are reported. In 6 cases of diffuse spinal bone marrow tumor infiltration, diagnosis is easier with MIBG scintigraphy than with MRI. In 5 cases, MRI detected hyposignal of the vertebral body without any spinal abnormality on MIBG scintigraphy. A discussion of the reasons for negative MIBG scintigraphy is presented and in these 5 cases, it is suggested that a lateral view of MIBG scintigraphy and HMDP-Tc99m scintigraphy may be performed, even vertebral body biopsy in order to assess bone marrow tumoral infiltration.Diagnosis and treatment of neuroblastoma using metaiodobenzylguanidine.Neuroblastoma is a lethal and not uncommon tumor in childhood. Early detection and display of the spread of the tumor is highly desirable for proper treatment. Nine children suspected of having neuroblastomas were examined by I-131 metaiodobenzylguanidine (I-131 MIBG) imaging. In two recent studies I-123 metaiodobenzylguanidine (I-123 MIBG) was used. A primary adrenal neuroblastoma was correctly identified in three cases. In two patients additional tumor sites were found. In one patient, who was in complete remission, no pathologic accumulation of I-131 MIBG was found. I-131 MIBG images were also normal in four patients with other types of neoplastic diseases. A boy with multiple metastases was treated with 100 mCi of I-131 MIBG. He developed transient gastrointestinal illness and there was no regression of the tumor deposits. In one girl with a large adrenal neuroblastoma high uptake of I-131 MIBG was observed. She received two therapy doses of I-131 MIBG (35 mCi and 75 mCi) with curative intention giving a total absorbed dose in the tumor of approximately 76 Gy. In spite of high retention of radioactivity in the tumor, regression did not occur, but her general condition was improved. In the present study, images of superior quality were obtained with I-123 MIBG imaging. It is concluded that imaging using I-131 MIBG or I-123 MIBG should be used in both the initial evaluation and the follow-up of children with neuroblastoma.Imaging of catecholamine-secreting tumours: uses of MIBG in diagnosis and treatment.MIBG radiolabelled with 131I or 123I is a radiopharmaceutical which is concentrated in neuroendocrine tumours, particularly phaeochromocytomas and neuroblastomas. This permits non-invasive whole-body scintigraphic screening for benign and malignant, familial and sporadic, intra-adrenal and extra-adrenal phaeochromocytomas and primary and metastatic neuroblastomas, with high sensitivity (85-90%) and specificity (> 95%). MIBG is also concentrated in presynaptic terminals of adrenergic, autonomically innervated organs such as the heart, and may be used as a non-invasive in vivo probe to study this system. Large doses of 131I-MIBG and 125I-MIBG have been used experimentally to selectively deliver therapeutic doses of radiotherapy to malignant phaeochromocytomas and refractory advanced neuroblastomas.VMA-negative, MIBG scan-positive neuroblastoma in children.Metaiodobenzylguanidine assessment of metastatic neuroblastoma: observer dependency and chemosensitivity evaluation. The SFOP Group.In children over 1 year of age with metastatic neuroblastoma, clearance of metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) skeletal uptake after four courses of induction chemotherapy is one of the most powerful prognostic factors. How subjective is quantification of MIBG uptake, and can earlier MIBG scintigraphy separate good and bad responders?The data from 47 patients who received uniform induction therapy were reviewed. A novel scoring system of MIBG update intensity was proposed. Initial, intermediate (after two courses), and final (after four courses) intensities were scored (0 to 21 points) independently by six different observers. The initial global score and the relative score (calculated by dividing the global score after two courses by the initial score) were compared to the final score. Good responders were those who scored 0 at final MIBG.Between two observers, the correlation coefficient for the global score was superior to 0.80, in nine of ten comparisons established between observers 1-5. The initial score did not predict the final score insofar as only nine of fourteen patients with low initial scores were good responders. The relative score also failed to predict outcome; only six of ten patients with favorable relative score (i.e., <20%), were good responders.This scoring system is reliable and may be used in multicentric trials. However, both initial and relative scores failed to predict final outcome. Thus, intermediate MIBG may be omitted during induction therapy assessment.Comparison of ¹²³I-metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) and ¹³¹I-MIBG semi-quantitative scores in predicting survival in patients with stage 4 neuroblastoma: a report from the Children's Oncology Group.¹²³I-metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) scans are preferable to ¹³¹I-MIBG for neuroblastoma imaging as they deliver less patient radiation yet have greater sensitivity in disease detection. Both ¹²³I-MIBG and ¹³¹I-MIBG scans were used for disease assessments of neuroblastoma patients enrolled on Children's Oncology Group (COG) high-risk study A3973. The hypothesis was that ¹²³I-MIBG and ¹³¹I-MIBG scans were sufficiently similar for clinical purposes in terms of ability to predict survival.Patients enrolled on COG A3973 with stage 4 disease who completed ¹²³I-MIBG or ¹³¹I-MIBG scans at diagnosis, post-induction, post-transplant, or post-biotherapy were analyzed. The performance of the Curie score for each MIBG scan type in predicting survival was evaluated. At each time point, survival curves for ¹²³I-MIBG versus ¹³¹I-MIBG were compared using the log-rank test.Of the 413 patients on A3973 with at least one MIBG scan, 350 were stage 4. The 5-year event-free survival (EFS) and overall survival (OS) rates were 33.4 ± 3.6% and 45.6 ± 4.0% (N = 350). At post-induction, EFS (P = 0.3501) and OS (P = 0.5337) for ¹²³I-MIBG versus ¹³¹I-MIBG were not significantly different. Similarly, comparisons at the three other time points were non-significant.We found no evidence of a statistically significant difference in outcome by type of scan. For future survival analyses of MIBG Curie scores, ¹²³I-MIBG and ¹³¹I-MIBG results may be combined and analyzed overall, without adjustment for scan type.The MIBG super scan.Does a "false negative" MIBG scan predict a better outcome in neuroblastoma patients?MIBG in diagnosis and therapy. Letter from the editors.The diagnostic and therapeutic utility of radioiodinated metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG). 5 years of experience.The authors' experience of more than 5 years in the diagnostic and therapeutic use of radioiodinated MIBG in neural crest tumors is reported. 123I/131I-MIBG scintigraphy was performed in 158 patients: 75 suspected (24 proven) pheochromocytomas (pheos), 43 neuroblastomas (NB), 20 medullary thyroid carcinomas (MTC), 6 ganglioneuromas, 5 carcinoids and 1 insulinoma. Eight cases of tumors not originating from the neural crest were also investigated. The diagnostic sensitivity of the method was above 90% both in pheos and NB (primary tumors and bone metastases). The examination was less effective in localizing MTC (sensitivity = 64.4% in primary or residual/recurrent tumors). The scintigraphic outcome was negative in ganglioneuromas, carcinoids and insulinoma. Specificity was very high (greater than 95%), and no false positive results were found in tumors not deriving from the neural crest. 131I-MIBG treatment was administered to four patients with malignant pheo, nine with NB and four with MTC. Therapy resulted in a complete response in one pheo, two NB and one MTC treated after surgery or at diagnosis (one NB); it gave partial response and prolonged remission in five advanced cases (one pheo, two NB and two MTC); it resulted in temporary stabilization of the disease in one pheo and two NBs; it was ineffective in four cases.Early experience with PET/CT scan in the evaluation of pediatric abdominal neoplasms.Positron emission tomography/computerized tomography (PET/CT) scan provides both functional and anatomical information in a single diagnostic test. It has the potential to be a valuable tool in the evaluation of pediatric abdominal tumors. The goal of this study is to report our early experience with this technology.Children who underwent PET/CT scan in the workup for abdominal neoplasms between July 2005 and January 2008 were identified. Retrospective review of all radiologic studies, operative notes, and pathologic reports was undertaken.A total of 36 patients were collected. These included Burkitt's lymphoma (8), neuroblastoma (7), rhabdomyosarcoma (6), ovarian tumor (3), Wilms' tumor (2), hepatocellular carcinoma (2), paraganglioma (1), germ cell tumor (1), undifferentiated sarcoma (1), renal primitive neuroectodermal tumor (1), gastrointestinal stromal tumor (1), adrenocortical carcinoma (1), inflammatory pseudotumor (1), and adrenal adenoma (1). All neoplasms were fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) were avid. Our experience identified several potential uses for PET/CT scan in this group of patients. These include (1) preoperative staging, (2) selection of appropriate site for biopsy, (3) identification of occult metastatic disease, (4) follow-up for residual or recurrent disease, and (5) assessment of response to chemotherapy. It can also be valuable when the standard diagnostic studies are equivocal or conflicting.Preliminary data indicate that PET/CT is a promising tool in the evaluation of pediatric abdominal malignancies. The delineation of the exact role of this diagnostic modality will require additional experience.Diagnostic value of PET/CT for the staging and restaging of pediatric tumors.The objective of this retrospective study was to compare the diagnostic value of 2-[(18)F]fluoro-2-deoxy-D: -glucose positron emission tomography ((18)F-FDG PET)/CT versus (18)F-FDG PET and CT alone for staging and restaging of pediatric solid tumors.Forty-three children and adolescents (19 females and 24 males; mean age, 15.2 years; age range, 6-20 years) with osteosarcoma (n = 1), squamous cell carcinoma (n = 1), synovial sarcoma (n = 2), germ cell tumor (n = 2), neuroblastoma (n = 2), desmoid tumor (n = 2), melanoma (n = 3), rhabdomyosarcoma (n = 5), Hodgkin's lymphoma (n = 7), non-Hodgkin-lymphoma (n = 9), and Ewing's sarcoma (n = 9) who had undergone (18)F-FDG PET/CT imaging for primary staging or follow-up of metastases were included in this study. The presence, location, and size of primary tumors was determined separately for PET/CT, PET, and CT by two experienced reviewers. The diagnosis of the primary tumor was confirmed by histopathology. The presence or absence of metastases was confirmed by histopathology (n = 62) or clinical and imaging follow-up (n = 238).The sensitivities for the detection of solid primary tumors using integrated (18)F-FDG PET/CT (95%), (18)F-FDG PET alone (73%), and CT alone (93%) were not significantly different (p > 0.05). Seventeen patients showed a total of 153 distant metastases. Integrated PET/CT had a significantly higher sensitivity for the detection of these metastases (91%) than PET alone (37%; p < 0.05), but not CT alone (83%; p > 0.05). When lesions with a diameter of less than 0.5 cm were excluded, PET/CT (89%) showed a significantly higher specificity compared to PET (45%; p < 0.05) and CT (55%; p < 0.05). In a sub-analysis of pulmonary metastases, the values for sensitivity and specificity were 90%, 14%, 82% and 63%, 78%, 65%, respectively, for integrated PET/CT, stand-alone PET, and stand-alone CT. For the detection of regional lymph node metastases, (18)F-FDG PET/CT, (18)F-FDG PET alone, and CT alone were diagnostically correct in 83%, 61%, and 42%. A sub-analysis focusing on the ability of PET/CT, PET, and CT to detect osseous metastases showed no statistically significant difference between the three imaging modalities (p > 0.05).Our study showed a significantly increased sensitivity of PET/CT over that of PET for the detection of distant metastases but not over that of CT alone. However, the specificity of PET/CT for the characterization of pulmonary metastases with a diameter > 0.5 cm and lymph node metastases with a diameter of <1 cm was significantly increased over that of CT alone.[Detection of neural crest tumors by 123I-MIBG scintigraphy].From January 1993 to January 1994, scintigraphy with 123I-MIBG and/or 131I-MIBG were performed in 22 patients and their scintigraphic usefulness was evaluated. Iodine-123 MIBG and 131I-MIBG scintigrams were obtained 24 hours after injection of 222 MBq of 123I-MIBG and 48 hours after injection of 20 MBq of 131I-MIBG, respectively. In two patients with pheochromocytoma, the 123I-MIBG and 131I-MIBG scans were performed and both images were compared. In a patient with single intraadrenal pheochromocytoma, the lesion not detected with 131I-MIBG was clearly visualized with 123I-MIBG. In the other patient with multiple metastatic pheochromocytoma, much more lesions were distinctly demonstrated on the 123I-MIBG images than on the 131I-MIBG images. All of the lesions were detected with 123I-MIBG in a patient with pheochromocytoma, 3 patients with neuroblastoma and a patient with medullary thyroid cancer. Most of the normal adrenal glands (86%) were visualized on the 123I-MIBG scintigrams, in 7 patients without neural crest tumor and adrenal diseases, while 131I-MIBG scintigraphy failed to visualize normal adrenal glands in 2 hypertensive patients. The main reason for the superiority of 123I-MIBG to 131I-MIBG is considered to be as follows: 1) higher specific activity of 123I-MIBG. 2) the larger amount of 123I-MIBG used. 3) gamma ray energy of 123I is ideal for gamma camera. In conclusion, 123I-MIBG appears to be a more suitable imaging agent than 131I-MIBG in depicting neural crest tumors.Comments from the Editor-in-Chief.123I-MIBG scintigraphy and 18F-FDG PET in neuroblastoma.The purpose of this study was to compare the diagnostic utility of (123)I-metaiodobenzylguanidine ((123)I-MIBG) scintigraphy and (18)F-FDG PET in neuroblastoma.A total of 113 paired (123)I-MIBG and (18)F-FDG PET scans in 60 patients with neuroblastoma were retrospectively reviewed. Paired scans were acquired within 14 days of each other.For stage 1 and 2 neuroblastoma (13 scans, 10 patients), (18)F-FDG depicted more extensive primary or residual neuroblastoma in 9 of 13 scans. (123)I-MIBG and (18)F-FDG showed equal numbers of lesions in 1 of 13 scans, and 3 of 13 scan results were normal. For stage 3 neuroblastoma (15 scans, 10 patients), (123)I-MIBG depicted more extensive primary neuroblastoma or local or regional metastases in 5 of 15 scans. (18)F-FDG depicted more extensive primary neuroblastoma or local or regional metastases in 4 of 15 scans. (123)I-MIBG and (18)F-FDG were equal in 2 of 15 scans, and 4 of 15 scan results were normal. For stage 4 neuroblastoma (85 scans, 40 patients), (123)I-MIBG depicted more neuroblastoma sites in 44 of 85 scans. (18)F-FDG depicted more neuroblastoma sites in 11 of 85 scans. (123)I-MIBG and (18)F-FDG were equivalent or complementary in 13 of 85 scans, and 17 of 85 scan results were normal.(18)F-FDG is superior in depicting stage 1 and 2 neuroblastoma, although (123)I-MIBG may be needed to exclude higher-stage disease. (18)F-FDG also provides important information for patients with tumors that weakly accumulate (123)I-MIBG and at major decision points during therapy (i.e., before stem cell transplantation or before surgery). (18)F-FDG can also better delineate disease extent in the chest, abdomen, and pelvis. (123)I-MIBG is overall superior in the evaluation of stage 4 neuroblastoma, especially during initial chemotherapy, primarily because of the better detection of bone or marrow metastases.Comparison of diagnostic value of I-123 MIBG and high-dose I-131 MIBG scintigraphy including incremental value of SPECT/CT over planar image in patients with malignant pheochromocytoma/paraganglioma and neuroblastoma.to compare lesion detectability of I-123 MIBG scintigraphy with that of high-dose I-131 MIBG and to evaluate incremental benefit of SPECT/CT over planar image for the detection and localization of the lesions in patients with I-131 MIBG therapy for malignant pheochromocytoma/paraganglioma and neuroblastoma.we retrospectively investigated 16 patients with malignant pheochromocytoma/paraganglioma and neuroblastoma, who were referred for I-131 MIBG therapy. We investigated the lesion detectability in 10 pairs of I-123 and high-dose I-131 MIBG studies of the same patient, obtained within 2 weeks. In 31 studies of I-123 MIBG scintigraphy in 16 patients and 17 studies of high-dose I-131 MIBG scintigraphy in 12 patients, we compared planar and SPECT/CT images for the lesion detectability and localization.the number of lesions detected by I-123 MIBG planer image and SPECT/CT and high-dose planer I-131 MIBG and SPECT/CT were 3.0 and 3.7, 7.3 and 7.7 per study, respectively. SPECT/CT images provided additional diagnostic information over planar images in 25 studies (81%) of 12 patients (75%) in I-123 MIBG scintigraphy and in 9 studies (53%) of 9 patients (75%) in high-dose I-131 MIBG scintigraphy.post-therapy high-dose I-131 MIBG scintigraphy is superior to I-123 MIBG scintigraphy in lesion detectability even in comparison with I-123 MIBG SPECT/CT images and high-dose I-131 MIBG planar images in patients with malignant neuroendocrine tumors. SPECT/CT images are helpful for accurate identification of anatomic localization compared with planar images.Role of MR imaging and iodine 123 MIBG scintigraphy in staging of pediatric neuroblastoma.Comparison of MR and PET imaging for the evaluation of liver metastases.To compare the accuracy of fluoro-18-deoxyglucose positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) and dynamic-enhanced magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) scans in the diagnosis of liver metastatic lesions from colon and other sources.Thirty consecutive patients with known or suspected metastatic lesions were scanned by both MRI and PET. Histopathology and/or clinical outcome, including cross-sectional imaging follow up, were used as a gold standard.Of 30 patients, 16 were positive by pathology and/or clinical outcome and 14 were negative for liver metastases. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values on MRI were 85.7%, 100%, 100%, and 89%, respectively, compared to 71%, 93.7%, 90.9%, and 79% on FDG-PET. The difference between the two methods was not significant (X(2) = 0.2, P > 0.05).Our study showed no significant difference in detection of liver metastases using MRI or FDG-PET. However, MRI has advantages in spatial resolution and lesion characterization.Radioiodinated iodobenzylguanidines for diagnosis and therapy.Radiolabelled meta-iodobenzylguanidine has been one of the most successful of recent radiopharmaceuticals. In the short period of five years it has been shown to have high diagnostic sensitivity and specificity for many tumours of neuroectodermal origin. Furthermore its excellent concentration in many malignant tumours of this type offers a novel alternative treatment to those available at present.Single-photon emission computed tomography/computed tomography in endocrinology.The introduction of fusion of functional and anatomical imaging modalities into the field of endocrinology led to a major breakthrough in diagnosis, staging, and follow-up of patients with endocrine tumors. The management of endocrine tumors is based on a wide variety of conventional techniques, including computed tomography, ultrasound, or magnetic resonance imaging, and on scintigraphic functional techniques, associated with unique uptake and transport mechanisms and with the presence of high density of membrane receptors on some of these tumors. Anatomical modalities provide accurate detection and localization of morphological abnormalities, whereas nuclear medicine studies reflect the pathophysiological status of the disease process. Lack of structural delineation and relatively low contrast hamper the precise anatomical localization of the abnormal functional findings in the presence of potential concurrent foci related to the physiological biodistribution of the radiotracer or to processes unrelated to the evaluated disease entity. The notion that anatomical high-resolution and functional imaging data act as complementary methods led to various combination techniques of these modalities. However, coregistration of the functional and anatomical data after the acquisition of the 2 imaging modalities on separate machines, in different sessions, fails to provide accurate alignment of data, and the mathematical modeling is too cumbersome to be used on a routine basis. In contrast, hybrid imaging devices of single-photon emission computed tomography/computed tomography in a single gantry enable the sequential acquisition of the two modalities, with subsequent merging of data into a composite image display. These hybrid studies have led to a revolution in the field of imaging, providing clinically relevant information that is not apparent on separate images. The present review evaluates the contribution of the integrated single-photon emission computed tomography/computed tomography technology to image analysis and management of patients with endocrine tumors.The role of single-photon emission computed tomography and SPECT/computed tomography in oncologic imaging.Single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) and hybrid SPECT/computed tomography (SPECT/CT) cameras have emerged as a dominant technology providing invaluable tools in the diagnosis, staging, therapy planning, and treatment monitoring of multiple cancers over the past decade. In the same way that positron emission tomography (PET) benefited from the addition of CT, functional SPECT and anatomic CT data obtained as a single study have shown improvements in diagnostic imaging sensitivity and specificity by improving lesion conspicuity, reducing false positives, and clarifying indeterminate lesions. Furthermore, the anatomic imaging better localizes the functional data, which can be critical in surgical and therapy planning. As more disease-specific imaging agents become available, the role of SPECT/CT in the new paradigms of molecular imaging for personalized medicine will expand. Established and emerging uses of SPECT/CT in a wide variety of oncologic diseases, as well as radiation exposure issues, are reviewed.Utility of follow-up studies using meta-[123 I]iodobenzylguanidine scintigraphy for detecting recurrent neuroblastoma.Neuroblastomas sometimes recur after the initial disappearance of the tumour. We evaluated the utility of meta-[123I]iodobenzylguanidine (123I-MIBG) scintigraphy for the detection of recurrent neuroblastomas by comparing with the measurement of biochemical markers and clinical findings. Forty patients who had received treatment for neuroblastomas were included in the study. After the disappearance of the initial tumours, periodic measurements of urinary vanillyl mandelic acid, homovanillic acid and serum neuron specific enolase values, and an 123I-MIBG scintigraphy were performed. Whenever an abnormal finding was observed, other appropriate examinations and/or follow-up examinations were performed to elucidate the true state of the patient. Eleven recurrent episodes in eight patients were observed. Most of them occurred in the bone marrow or bone. Corresponding symptoms were observed in only two episodes; the other episodes were asymptomatic, and discovered by the periodic examinations. 123I-MIBG scintigrams visualized the recurrent tumours in 10 (91%) episodes. Elevated tumour markers were observed in only three episodes. 123I-MIBG scintigrams visualized most of the recurrent tumours, unless they were accompanied by any symptoms or elevations in biochemical tumour markers. Periodic examinations with 123I-MIBG scintigraphy appears to be a useful technique for the detection of the recurrences.Functional imaging in phaeochromocytoma and neuroblastoma with 68Ga-DOTA-Tyr 3-octreotide positron emission tomography and 123I-metaiodobenzylguanidine.(68)Ga-DOTA-Tyr(3)-octreotide positron emission tomography ((68)Ga-DOTA-TOC PET) has proven to be superior to (111)In-DTPA-D-Phe(1)-octreotide ((111)In-octreotide) planar scintigraphy and SPECT imaging in neuroendocrine tumours (NETs). Because of these promising results, we compared the accuracy of (123)I-metaiodobenzylguanidine ((123)I-MIBG) imaging with PET in the diagnosis and staging of metastatic phaeochromocytoma and neuroblastoma, referring to radiological imaging as reference standard.Three male and eight female patients (age range 3 to 68 years) with biochemically and histologically proven disease were included in this study. Three male and three female patients were suffering from phaeochromocytoma, and five female patients from neuroblastoma. Comparative evaluation included morphological imaging with CT or MRI, functional imaging with (68)Ga-DOTA-TOC PET and (123)I-MIBG imaging. Imaging results were analysed on a per-patient and on a per-lesion basis.On a per-patient basis, both (68)Ga-DOTA-TOC and (123)I-MIBG showed a sensitivity of 100%, when compared with anatomical imaging. In phaeochromocytoma patients, on a per-lesion basis, the sensitivity of (68)Ga-DOTA-TOC was 91.7% and that of (123)I-MIBG was 63.3%. In neuroblastoma patients, on a per-lesion basis, the sensitivity of (68)Ga-DOTA-TOC was 97.2% and that of (123)I-MIBG was 90.7%. Overall, in this patient cohort, (68)Ga-DOTA-TOC PET identified 257 lesions, anatomical imaging identified 216 lesions, and (123)I-MIBG identified only 184 lesions. In this patient group, the overall sensitivity of (68)Ga-DOTA-TOC PET on a lesion basis was 94.4% (McNemar p<0.0001) and that of (123)I-MIBG was 76.9% (McNemar p<0.0001).Our analysis in this relatively small patient cohort indicates that (68)Ga-DOTA-TOC PET may be superior to (123)I-MIBG gamma-scintigraphy and even to the reference CT/MRI technique in providing particularly valuable information for pretherapeutic staging of phaeochromocytoma and neuroblastoma.SPECT/CT.In view of the commercial success of integrated PET/CT scanners, there is an increasing interest in comparable SPECT/CT systems. SPECT in combination with CT enables a direct correlation of anatomic information and functional information, resulting in better localization and definition of scintigraphic findings. Besides anatomic referencing, the added value of CT coregistration is based on the attenuation correction capabilities of CT. The number of clinical studies is limited, but pilot studies have indicated a higher specificity and a significant reduction in indeterminate findings. The superiority of SPECT/CT over planar imaging or SPECT has been demonstrated in bone scintigraphy, somatostatin receptor scintigraphy, parathyroid scintigraphy, and adrenal gland scintigraphy. Also, rates of detection of sentinel nodes by biopsy can be increased with SPECT/CT. This review highlights recent technical developments in integrated SPECT/CT systems and summarizes the current literature on potential clinical uses and future directions for SPECT/CT in cardiac, neurologic, and oncologic applications.Re: Commentary by G.J. D'Angio to the article by S. Biasotti et al.Refining interpretation of MIBG scans in children.In pediatrics, the distribution of radioiodinated metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) has been studied primarily in neuroblastoma. However, normal patterns in children show a number of particularities and pitfalls related to the context of pediatric oncology which must be identified.We report on 28 equivocal scans in 24 children. In all cases, two experienced observers judged the scans to be equivocal and the definite interpretations were confirmed by follow-up.Difficulties in interpreting the scans were observed at the level of the thorax (15 patients), the abdomen (5 patients), the head (4 patients) or elsewhere (4 patients). The final interpretation of the scans was attributed to an unusual physiological pattern linked to age (9 patients), tumoral context (17 patients) or artifacts (2 patients).A number of important physiological areas of uptake in soft tissues can lead to false-positive interpretations of normal scans, such as the physiological upper thoracic uptake which has never been previously described. Numerous technical and physiological possibilities exist and those pitfalls must be ruled out. A precise knowledge of these technical difficulties and physiological variants can reduce the number of equivocal MIBG scans.[Diagnostic and therapeutic possibilities of meta-iodobenzylguanidine in neuroblastoma].MIBG is taken up preferentially by neuroblastoma cells. Owing to its high concentration in the neuroblastoma lesions, *I-MIBG scan is one of the most specific and effective tools in the diagnosis and staging of the disease. For most imaging purpose 123I-MIBG is the optimal agent. A rational approach 131I-MIBG has the potential for specifically delivering very large radiation doses to the malignant cells. The results obtained in more institutions are encouraging and this therapeutic modality should be included in the therapeutic strategy of neuroblastoma.Neuroblastoma: positron emission tomography with 2-[fluorine-18]-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose compared with metaiodobenzylguanidine scintigraphy.To assess the uptake in neuroblastoma of 2-[fluorine-18] -fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose (FDG) versus metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG).Seventeen patients with known or suspected neuroblastoma underwent FDG positron emission tomography (PET) (20 scans) and MIBG scintigraphy. Tumor uptake of FDG was quantified on positive PET scans.Tumor uptake of FDG was detected in 16 of 17 patients (18 of 20 scans). Neuroblastomas and their metastases avidly concentrated FDG prior to chemotherapy or radiation therapy. Uptake after therapy was variable. Uptake of FDG was intense in one patient with neuroblastoma that failed to accumulate MIBG. In 13 of the 20 scans, however, MIBG was rated superior to FDG for delineation of tumor compared with background and normal organs.Most neuroblastomas accumulate FDG. The mechanism of MIBG uptake is more intense prior to therapy. Concentration of FDG is not dependent on type 1 catecholamine uptake. FDG PET helps define the distribution of neuroblastomas that fail to concentrate MIBG.Evaluation of semi-quantitative scoring system for metaiodobenzylguanidine (mIBG) scans in patients with relapsed neuroblastoma.The purpose of this study was to determine the accuracy of two semi-quantitative scoring systems to assess response to (131)I-metaiodobenzylguanidine (mIBG) therapy in recurrent neuroblastoma.Diagnostic mIBG scan pairs (n = 57) were collected for patients who underwent (131)I-mIBG therapy for relapsed neuroblastoma. Two scoring systems were designated: Method 1, which divided the body into nine segments to view osteomedullary lesions with an additional tenth segment to assess soft tissue involvement; and Method 2, which divided the body into seven segments without a corresponding compartment for soft tissue involvement. Four nuclear medicine physicians independently assigned extension and intensity scores utilizing both methods, and separately recorded their impression of whether the post-therapy scan had improved, not changed, or worsened. Inter- and intra-observer concordance and correlation with overall response and progression-free survival (PFS) were performed.Method 1 produced the highest inter-observer concordance and was used to calculate the relative extension scores (post-therapy score divided by pre-therapy score), which correlated significantly with overall response. Patients who achieved complete response (CR) or partial response (PR) (n = 21) had lower relative extension scores, compared to those without response (P < 0.001). The readers' overall impression associated highly (P < 0.001) with the relative extension scores though results were less quantitative. Concordance was higher if initial scores were >5. Relative extension score did not predict PFS.Semi-quantitative scoring of mIBG scans provides a more reliable method of assessing response in patients with relapsed neuroblastoma than qualitative impression. The reproducibility and high inter-observer concordance makes mIBG score an important component of overall response criteria in patients with recurrent neuroblastoma.[Results of scintigraphy with m-[123I]iodobenzylguanidine in neuroblastoma in children].From 46 [123I]m IBG scans performed in 33 children, excellent specificity (96%) and good sensitivity (90%) appeared in the detection of neuroblastoma; less differentiated non catecholamine-excreting tumours remained undetected. As any localization to be seen was clearly visualized on the 24-h scan, the use of the [123I]m IBG (p, 5n) is recommended for the diagnosis, staging and follow-up of neuroblastoma in children.Positive MIBG scanning at the time of relapse in neuroblastoma which was MIBG negative at diagnosis.Positive MIBG scanning at the time of relapse in neuroblastoma which was MIBG negative at diagnosis.Has PET become an important clinical tool in paediatric imaging?New semi-quantitative 123I-MIBG estimation method compared with scoring system in follow-up of advanced neuroblastoma: utility of total MIBG retention ratio versus scoring method.The purpose of this study is to evaluate a new semi-quantitative estimation method using (123)I-MIBG retention ratio to assess response to chemotherapy for advanced neuroblastoma.Thirteen children with advanced neuroblastoma (International Neuroblastoma Risk Group Staging System: stage M) were examined for a total of 51 studies with (123)I-MIBG scintigraphy (before and during chemotherapy). We proposed a new semi-quantitative method using MIBG retention ratio (count obtained with delayed image/count obtained with early image with decay correction) to estimate MIBG accumulation. We analyzed total (123)I-MIBG retention ratio (TMRR: total body count obtained with delayed image/total body count obtained with early image with decay correction) and compared with a scoring method in terms of correlation with tumor markers.TMRR showed significantly higher correlations with urinary catecholamine metabolites before chemotherapy (VMA: r(2) = 0.45, P < 0.05, HVA: r(2) = 0.627, P < 0.01) than MIBG score (VMA: r(2) = 0.19, P = 0.082, HVA: r(2) = 0.25, P = 0.137). There were relatively good correlations between serial change of TMRR and those of urinary catecholamine metabolites (VMA: r(2) = 0.274, P < 0.001, HVA: r(2) = 0.448, P < 0.0001) compared with serial change of MIBG score and those of tumor markers (VMA: r(2) = 0.01, P = 0.537, HVA: 0.084, P = 0.697) during chemotherapy for advanced neuroblastoma.TMRR could be a useful semi-quantitative method for estimating early response to chemotherapy of advanced neuroblastoma because of its high correlation with urine catecholamine metabolites.Endocrine imaging: parathyroid, adrenal cortex and medulla, and other endocrine tumors. Part II.PET-CT scan in pediatric oncology: where, when, how and at what price?Use of 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography in patients with rare head and neck cancers.The clinical utility of (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) positron emission tomography (PET) has been demonstrated in major head and neck cancers (HNCs) but is unclear in rare HNCs. We therefore evaluated FDG PET in the management of patients with rare HNCs.FDG PET and CT/MRI scanning were performed at the initial staging and/or the follow-up in 24 patients with rare HNCs, 10 with melanoma, 9 with sarcoma, 3 with olfactory neuroblastomas, and 2 with basal cell carcinoma. The diagnostic accuracy of CT and FDG PET for detecting primary tumors and metastases were compared with a histopathologic reference. The association between the PET results and the clinicopathologic parameters predicting tumor invasion, histologic grade and disease-free survival (DFS), was assessed.The overall accuracies of FDG PET and CT/MRI were 92% and 79%, respectively, for detecting primary tumors and 91% and 74%, respectively, for nodal metastases, but the differences were not significant due to the small number of patients. The sensitivity and specificity of FDG PET for detecting distant metastases and second primary tumors were 100% and 87%, respectively. Follow-up FDG PET correctly diagnosed locoregional recurrence in all 12 patients, as shown by biopsy, and distant metastases in 6 patients. However, thickness of melanoma, histologic grade of sarcoma, and DFS were not associated with tumor FDG uptake.FDG PET may be useful for staging, posttreatment monitoring, and detection of distant metastases and second primary tumors in patients with rare HNCs.[Metaiodobenzylguanidine scintigraphy in the diagnosis and followup of neuroblastoma. Apropos of 16 cases].The aim of this study is to evaluate meta-iodo-benzyl-guanidine scintigraphy in the diagnosis and the management of neuroblastoma.betwen september 1999 and jun 2004, 16 children aging from 4 months to 6 years, with neuroblastoma, underwent mIBG scintigraphy in military hospital nuclear medicine department.23 mIBG scans were done. The exam was indicated for the initial staging in 7 cases, to evaluate chemotherapy or surgery in 12 cases and to seek for reccurences in 3 cases. The sensitivity of mIBG was 57% in the detection of the primary tumor, 100% for liver metastases and 67% for medullar involvement.mIBG scintigraphy should be a standard in the initial staging of neuroblastoma and in evaluating therapy response.Evaluation of catecholamine metabolites, mIBG scan, and bone marrow cytology as response markers in stage 4 neuroblastoma.The early biological response has been proved an excellent predictor in acute lymphoblastic leukemia and nephroblastoma. We asked whether catecholamine metabolites, mIBG scan, and bone marrow evaluation might be relevant response markers in disseminated neuroblastoma.Three hundred sixty-seven unselected stage 4 neuroblastoma patients treated according the German cooperative trial NB90 were entered into the study. Catecholamine plasma and urine levels were centrally determined by gas chromatography/ mass spectrometry. Bone marrow cytology and mIBG scans were evaluated by local investigators.At diagnosis, mIBG scan was positive in 306 patients (92%), borderline in seven patients (2%), and negative in 19 patients (6%). Bone marrow aspirates were cytologically positive in 292 patients (84%) and negative in 57 patients (16%). Plasma catecholamine levels were elevated in 79% (206 of 260 patients.), urinary levels in 91% (307 of 338 patients). The outcome of patients with normalized mIBG scan after four courses of chemotherapy [5 year EFS (event free survival) 0.22 +/- 0.07] was not superior to the outcome of patients with still abnormal uptake (5 year EFS 0.30 +/- 0.05). The event free survival of patients with still positive bone marrow aspirates after four courses (0.16 +/- 0.06) was inferior to the EFS of patients with negative bone marrow aspirates (0.26 +/- 0.04, P = 0.0054). Urinary catecholamine normalization after four cycles of chemotherapy (5 year EFS 0.35 +/- 0.06 versus 0.26 +/- 0.10) had no influence on outcome, whereas plasma catecholamine normalization after the first (5 year EFS 0.40 +/- 0.09 versus 0.14 +/- 0.07, P= 0.0364) or the fourth cycle (5 year EFS 0.35 +/- 0.06 versus 0.26 +/- 0.10, P = 0.0242) indicated a better outcome.These data show that serial plasma catecholamine levels and bone marrow aspirates in the course of the disease are useful tools in predicting outcome.123iodine meta-iodobenzylguanidine single photon emission computed tomography in the assessment of children with neuroblastoma.[The place of 99mTc-MDP skeletal scintigraphy in neuroblastoma. Is a new assessment necessary?].The present study compares the reliability of MIBG and MDP bone scans in detecting bone metastases of neuroblastoma. Out of 57 patients, 23 had both 99mTc-MDP and 123I/131I-MIBG scans within a 2-week period. In 10 patients at primary diagnosis there was an underestimation of skeletal involvement by MIBG in 1/5, in 13 patients at follow-up in 3/9; 99mTc-MDP scans were able to visualize skeletal involvement in all those cases. There was only one false positive MDP scan. These results suggest that MIBG alone may fail to visualize skeletal involvement of neuroblastoma and should therefore be complemented by additional 99mTc-MDP scintigraphy.Imaging neural crest tumours with 123I-metaiodobenzylguanidine and X-ray computed tomography: a comparative study.Iodine-123 metaiodobenzylguanidine (MIBG) has been used as a diagnostic agent for imaging neural crest tumours. In a retrospective study of 27 patients, the role of 123I MIBG scintigraphy and X-ray computed tomography (CT) for detection of disease was compared. Both imaging techniques were accurate in the identification of these tumours. Iodine-123 MIBG was slightly more accurate in detecting metastatic disease. Computed tomography of tumours was useful in planning appropriate metastatic intervention. We suggest 123I MIBG should be the primary imaging procedure followed by CT in the investigation of these patients.[Bone marrow metastases of neuroblastoma: MRT in comparison with bone marrow cytology and mIBG scintigraphy].Thirteen MRT investigations of the knee region of nine children with neuroblastoma stage IV/III were performed in order to demonstrate bone-marrow metastases. The MRT-findings were correlated with bone-marrow cytology, immunofluorescence, and mIBG-scintigraphy. MRT showed a high sensitivity in demonstrating bone-marrow abnormalities, although bone-marrow aspiration and mIBG-scintigraphy will still be needed to make a specific diagnosis. On the other hand, signs of bone-marrow involvement in MRT investigations without positive findings in bone-marrow cytology and mIBG-scintigraphy may be the first evidence of bone-marrow metastases.Nuclear medicine imaging of the pediatric musculoskeletal system.Bone scintigraphy is a common pediatric nuclear medicine procedure and plays a significant role in the diagnosis of skeletal infection, trauma, and benign and malignant bone tumors. There is a complementary role for bone scintigraphy in the assessment of a child with suspected nonaccidental injury. High-quality images require careful attention to technique and positioning in children. Additional techniques such as magnification and single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) can be used for special indications and localization. Combined functional and anatomic imaging using SPECT/computed tomography (CT) imaging systems can improve diagnostic accuracy. Positron emission tomography (PET) using fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) is being applied with increasing frequency in the evaluation of children with malignancy. To interpret (18)F-FDG PET appropriately, it is essential to know the normal physiological distribution. Using combined (18)F-FDG PET/CT improves specificity and localization. This article reviews the common indications for bone scintigraphy and (18)F-FDG PET/CT in benign and malignant pediatric musculoskeletal disease.[123I-MIBG scintigraphy in patients with neuroblastoma].123I-meta-iodobenzylguanidine (123I-MIBG) scintigraphy was performed in 9 patients who were suspected to have a neuroblastoma. Positive images were obtained in 4 patients who had a neuroblastoma. Negative images were obtained in 5 patients who did not have a neuroblastoma. 123I-MIBG scan revealed an active tumor in a patient who had received intensive chemotherapy for the recurrence of neuroblastoma with returning of all tumor markers including neuron specific enolase to normal range. This indicated that 123I-MIBG scan can be used to assess the effect of therapy.Specificity of iodobenzylguanidine scanning in neuroblastoma.What is the prognostic value of osteomedullary uptake on MIBG scan in neuroblastoma patients under one year of age?Twenty-seven infants under one year of age with metastatic neuroblastoma were studied for osteomedullary metastases. They were evaluated by at least two imaging procedures: X-ray films and MIBG scan. Taking into account the results of these investigations, 3 groups were defined: osteomedullary metastases were detected in 8 infants by both X-ray and MIBG scan, no osteomedullary sites were detected by either technique in 13 patients, and 6 had osteomedullary foci with positive MIBG uptake but no radiological abnormality. These three groups were apparently different in terms of median age, response to chemotherapy, and long-term survival. The third group, which has not been previously described, appears to have a better prognosis than patients with radiologically detectable bone lesions. Nevertheless it was necessary to use intensive chemotherapy to obtain remission in these particular patients. It should be mandatory to specify the investigatory technique used to describe osteomedullary metastases in infants and treatment should be adapted according to this grouping system.